CARL WERNER.
VOL. I.
I.
With
what a sober and saintly sweetness do
these evening lights stream around us. What a
spiritual atmosphere is here! Do you not feel
it?
My friend did not immediately answer my
question
,
and when he did, his reply was rather to the
mood of mind in which I had spoken, than to the
words which I had uttered. We were walking,
towards
the close of day, in one of the deepest parts
of a German forest, through which the sunlight
penetrated
only with imperfect and broken rays. The
vista, which was limited by the dusk, was covered
with flitting shadows, and wild aspects, that won us
farther at each succeeding moment in their pursuit.
The cathedral picturesqueness of the scene
warmed
us both, and when my friend replied to me, I
felt that our fancies were the same.
You have no faith, I believe, in popular
superstitions
you
never yield yourself up to your
dreams?
Something of a feeling of self-esteem kept me
from answering sincerely to this question. I felt,
at that instant, a guilty consciousness of a
growing respect for the legends of the
wonder-loving
land in which I wandered. My answer
was evasive.
What mean you  your question is a wide
one?
Elsewhere it might be,  but here  here in
Germany  it would seem specific enough.
Briefly
you have no faith in ghosts  you do not
believe in the thousand and one stories which
imagination hourly weaves for the ear and the
apprehensions
of credulity.
To speak truly, I have not often thought of
this matter until now. The
genius loci
has
somewhat
provoked my fancy, and triumphed over my
indifferenceif indifference it be. Ghost stories,
though frequent enough, are, as frequently,
subjects
of common ridicule; and the hearer, if he
does believe, finds it prudent to keep his faith
secret
,
if it be only to escape the laughter of his
companions. This may have been the case with
me, and from seeking to deceive my neighbors
on this head, it is not improbable that I have fully
succeeded in at last deceiving myself; and have
come to doubt sincerely. But of this I will not
be certain. I am not sure that I should not
partake
of the sensibilities of any timid urchin, at the
sudden appearance of any suspicious object in any
suspicious place.
Ha! ha! I see you are no sceptic. You are
for the ghosts  you certainly believe in them.
Not so! I replied, somewhat hastily; I
cannot be said to believe or disbelieve. I have
no facts  no opinions  on the subject, and
therefore
cannot be supposed to have arrived at any
conviction respecting it. I have scarcely given
it a thought, and my impressions are rather those
of the temperament and memory than the mind.
Warm blood makes me jump frequently to
conclusions
upon which I never think; and the stories
of boyhood, in this respect, will, long after the boy
has become a man, stagger his strength with the
images produced on his imagination by a
grand-dame's
narratives at that susceptible period. My
notions of the marvellous arise almost entirely
from my feelings  feelings kindled by such
stories
,
and, it may be, rendered vivid by a natural
tinct of superstition, which few of us seem to be
free from, and which may, perhaps, be considered
the best of arguments in defence of such a faith.
My friend made no immediate answer  a pause
ensued in our speech, but not in our movement.
We walked on, and the shadows became more thick
around us. The scattered lights of evening grew
fainter and fewer, and I perceived that the mood
of my companion, like my own, had undergone a
corresponding change. Sad thoughts mingled
with strange thoughts in our minds, and when he
again spoke, it was evident that he felt the night.
He resumed the subject.
I have not been willing to believe, but I feel,
and feeling brings the faith. I have reason to
suspect myself of a leaning to these superstitions,
and discover myself inclining to conviction the
more I indulge in solitude. Solitude is one of the
parents of superstition. The constant
wakefulness
and warring strifes of selfish interests,
which prevail in the city and among the crowd,
drive away such thoughts, and, indeed, all
thoughts which incline to reverence; and it is
only when I get into the country  among these
solemn shades and deep recesses  that I find my
superstitions coming back to me with a thousand
other sensibilities. It is then that my memory
1*
goes over the old grounds of my childhood; and
that the fancies of an early romance become
invigorated
within me:it is then that I give credence
to the unaccountable story that we sometimes hear
from the lips of more credulous or more
experienced
companions. Their earnestness and faith
strengthen and awaken ours  the fancy grows
into form, and the form, at length, from frequent
contemplation, becomes almost sensible to the
touch. We continue to contemplate until we
believe
;
and there is not a faculty or sense that we
have, which does not at last become satisfied,
along with our fancies, of the rich reality which
the latter have but dreamed.
I am not so sure that they dream only, was
my serious reply. Why, if the doctrine of the
soul's immortality be true why should it not
return
to the spot which kindred affections have
made holy  why may it not do a service to the
living?  prevent a wrong?  reveal a secret, or
by some ministry, which could not have been
performed
so well by any but itself, do that which
may help the surviving to some withheld rights,
to some suppressed truth  or to some unlooked
for means of safety from tyranny and injustice?
True  that might have been an argument at
one period in the history of the world; but the
world has grown wiser, if not better, in later days!
a thousand modes are now in our possession for
discovering the truth, to one at that time when
spirits were allowed to return to earth. The days
of miracle are gone by. The `spirits from the
vasty deep' do not come to us, however loudly we
may call for them.
Who shall say that? was my reply. Who
shall answer for the necessity. It may occur now
as it has occurred before, nor is it an argument
against the belief, that man has grown wise enough
to find out the truth for himself, after judicial forms,
without the need of any such revisitings of the
moon. If wisdom has grown mighty to find out the
truth, crime has also grown proportionably cunning
to conceal it; and virtue suffers the injustice, and
vice escapes, even now, from a just punishment,
quite too frequently, when it were to be desired that
some honest ghost could be evoked from the
grave, to set the erring judgment of man aright.
Coleridge considers it a conclusive argument
against the notion, that the ghost of a man's
breeches should appear with him. This may be
a good joke, but it is a poor argument. If it be
once admitted, that for wise and beneficial
purposes
the just Providence shall permit the
departed
spirit to return to the earth, where it once abode,
it will be necessary that it should put on that garb
and appearance which shall make it more readily
known by those whom it seeks; since its purpose,
in its return to earth, might only be effected by its
appearance in proper person. I can conceive of
no difficulty in this; since it must be obvious that
as the appearance of the spectre is the work of
God, himself, with Him the toil is equally easy
of giving the spirit its guise of flesh and fashion,
and of preparing the mind of the spectator so that
his eye shall behold the object, whether it appear
in reality or not.
The subject is one, said my friend, which
invariably forces itself upon me when I am in
solitude
.
We are now in a place singularly
accommodated
to thoughts and things of this nature.
There is a venerable gloom and gravity about
these old trees. You see that none of them are
young, yet the grounds have neither been cleared
nor grubbed, to my recollection, for many years.
The aged branches have stretched out
innumerable
arms, and bend, with their accumulated weight
of years upon them, even to the ground. They
have the air of a group of sainted Druids, such as
the Romans annihilated. Black and frowning,
yonder mountain overhangs the wood, protecting,
yet threatening. It has the look of a blasted
thing, and it must be a haunted one. The ruins
which you behold at a little distance to the left,
admirably consort with the rest of the picture. A
gray mist seems to hang over and to hallow them,
until even the beautiful knoll of green which rises
in front of them seems offensively garish from the
exceeding depth of its contrast. Those are the
ruins of an ancient monastery, which the
superstitious
fancies of the neighborhood have long since
peopled with a fraternity of immaterials,
sufficiently
numerous and wild to consecrate to their
peculiar purposes a situation of the kind. They
are not often intruded upon, except by myself;
and as I have a story to tell which properly
belongs
to them, it will not be out of place if I tell it
to you there. Some of the old monuments will
give us a pleasant seat, and among the dead only,
as we then shall be, we shall be in no danger of
suffering interruption or disturbance from the idle
footstep of the obtrusive living.
II.
We are in Germany, continued my
companion
;of
course I do not tell you this with any
other object, than simply to remind you, that you
are in a land, of all others, one of the most
renowned
for its superstitions, its wild fancies, its
marvellous imaginations. The minds of its people
have become spiritualized by the popular faith; and
thought takes the shape of poetry at its birth, and
fancy is busy every where. Their rivers and their
rocks, their green knolls and sinking valleys, their
dense forests, wild wastes, and deserted ruins, like
these around us, are all haunted and venerable.
The dell and dingle have their different spirits, the
wood and rivulet theirs; and the gentle-hearted
peasants who inhabit them are, in some instances,
almost as rigldly tenacious of the privileges of the
genius loci
, as they are of their own rights and
religion
.
A tale of
diablerie
will not, therefore, seem
out of place, in a region so abundantly supplied
with this material; and the story which I am
about to relate to you, though differing materially
from those which we are accustomed to hear, is
yet as native to this neighborhood as any of the
rest. The parties who figure in it, were born in
the little hamlet of , not a mile distant, and
you will hear the story from any of the villagers
to whom you may refer for confirmation of it.
It is now about fifty years since the events
which I am about to relate to you are said to
have occurred. The village of  stood then
pretty much as it does now, except that there were
then two families in it, of which there are no
descendants
or surviving relics now. The family of
Herman Ottfried was one of the most respectable
in it; nor was that of Carl Werner less so. The
former consisted only of Herman, and the fair
Matilda, his sister; while that of Carl Werner
existed in himself alone. He was an only child,
whose mother had been long since dead, and whose
father had died just before the time when my
narrative
begins. Herman was about twenty-five
years of age, Carl Werner not more than
twenty-one
yet they were inseparable friends. Matilda,
the sister of Herman, was but seventeen; and it is
more than probable, that the great intimacy
between
Carl and Herman, and the strong regard
which the former professed for the latter, arose
from the yet stronger feeling which he entertained
for the sister. But of this anon. Herman was a
good natured, laughing, and mischievous creature,
ready always for fun and frolic, not easily
apprehensive
of danger, nor always scrupulous about
proprieties in his pranks. He had good sense
enough to keep him from any extravagant folly,
or extreme rashness; and good feeling enough to
restrain him from any excess which might inflict
pain upon the deserving and the good. He was
of graceful person, manly and strong, brave,
generous
,
and well-principled. The favorite of the
village, he was yet wanting in one of those traits of
character in which all beside him were abundantly
provided  he had no more faith in a ghost than
he had in a sermon; and though not deficient in
proper veneration, he had but slight regard for
either.
In this respect, as in several others, he differed
greatly from his more youthful friend and
companion
,
Carl Werner. Carl was superstitious to the
last degree; his memory was perfectly crowded
with legends the most extravagant, and he had a
feverish and perpetual desire, continually, to
increase
his collection. He was, in very truth, a
dreamer  one of those gifted men, who see strange
sights and hear uncommon sounds, which are
denied
to the vulgar faculty; and his senses were
accordingly employed always in scenting out and
searching after the supernatural. But let me not
be understood to say that Carl was a simpleton.
Far from it. He was, in reality, as I have phrased
it already, a highly gifted man. He was a poet
a man of quick and daring imagination  one
whose verses were full of fire, and acknowledged
to be of more than ordinary merit,  but he was
rather too much of a mystic. Deeply
impregnated
with the traditionary lore of `The Teuton,' and
irritably alive to all its exciting influences, the
fancy
which was in him, the active and subtle spirit
of his thoughts, gathered from all objects and
associations
food and stimulant for its own
continued
exercise. His very existence, so deeply had
he drank of the witch beverage and been led away
into the haunted forests of his fancy, had become
rather metaphysical than real. His life was
passed
in dreams; and even his love for Matilda, so
far from humanizing his mind and binding it to
earth, seemed to have the effect of elevating it the
more, and of making it hourly more and more
spiritual
;
until, at length, he appeared to regard the
maiden rather as a creation of his thought  a
dream of heaven  than an object for the
contemplation
and the enjoyment of his senses. His life
was thus diseased by his imagination, while yet in
the green, in the blossom, and the bud.
III.
Between Herman and his sister, the soul and
person of Carl Werner were pretty evenly
divided
.
When not with one, he was with the other;
and when not separately with either, he was sure
VOL. I. 2
to be with both. Though the tastes and tempers
of the two young men seemed greatly to differ to
the common eye, their sympathies ran strangely
together. Their sports and studies, though not
alike, seemed nevertheless to bring them together
always. Their habits were equally wandering,
and while the poetry of Carl made him musing,
meditative, and abstracted in his habits, it led him
the more to delight in those practical tendencies
in the mind of his companion, which suggested a
character directly the reverse. Herman, too, was
pleased with the fellowship of a thinking being,
and one who could furnish names and definitions
for all his own occasional and half-digested
imaginings
and thoughts. They had neither of them
much system in their pursuits, and far less in their
studies. Books they read, not by selection, but as
they happened to fall into their hands; or, rather,
Carl would read them, and describe their character
and unfold their contents to his companion, who,
in his own experience, could most generally
remember
adventures to correspond with and match
those which Carl related to him. In this manner
they became mutual dependants, and hence, some
of the secret of their intimacy. They would
follow
each  without much, or at best with a
momentary opposition  the moods and
promptings
of the other  the momentary impulse being
the sufficient governor,  and to that they most
generally left the direction of studies and
amusements
alike. The feeling which prompted the
one, if not exactly like that which filled the bosom
of the other, was seldom offensive to it: and we
need not wonder, thus situated and circumstanced,
if they grew together, to the almost complete
exclusion
of all the village beside  the fair and gentle
Matilda alone being excepted.
IV.
Let not my preliminaries fatigue you. I
cannot
get on so well without them. My narrative
has a comprehensive ground-work, and I must
bring the several more striking features of the
locality
,
in due order, and, not precipitately, before
your eye. Having prepared you, I will now
proceed
:
Living, as they did, in the neighboring village,
and possessed of tastes equally wandering, and, in
the case of Carl, so mingled with romance, it will
not be thought surprising if they spent a great
deal of their leisure time among these old ruins.
They were ruins then, and no obtrusive utilitarian
has presumed, as you may see, to take from their
gray loveliness by making them more useful. The
charm of the spot is the same now as then  if
possible, indeed, the beauty of the ruins is even
greater, for the walls have suffered from
subsequent
tempests, and desolation has made more
complete her broken temple. Time is the ally of
romance, and decay takes nothing from her
honors
!
The source and secret of their beauty have
been steadily increasing; and the domain, loved
by the German youth of whom we speak, is,
perhaps
,
scarcely less attractive now to us.
Touched
,
as these dismembered and massive fragments
at this moment are, by the mellow hues of the
fleeting and flickering sunlight, they are, in my
eyes, immeasurably beautiful; and seem to me
as they did to Carl Werner, a fitting abode for
the sleepless and sad spirit  doomed to its
midnight
vigil of a thousand years.
The imagination of Carl Werner had peopled
these ruins with a countless host of inmates, with
wild traditions, with the most pitiable and strange
narratives. It was the theatre where his invention
became most active, and where he continually
exercised
it, as much for his own, as for the pleasure
which it gave to Matilda and Herman. He had
explored the many cells which abound among the
ruins  he had groped through the ancient
chambers
,
until he had, from conjectures frequently
exercised
,
come to the belief that he could actually
assign the various uses to which they were put:
and, in some cases, through the aid of local
tradition and domestic history, he even ventured
so far as to say who were their occupants. Though
superstitious to the last degree, and most wilfully
credulous, Carl Werner had no idle fears. The
abbey was his favorite resort even at midnight,
and with Herman, who was something of a
daredevil
,
along with him, a ramble through the old
chambers at night, when the rising moon began to
peep through the cracks and fissures, was a
favorite
mode with Carl Werner of passing those
pleasant
hours. It is true, that, at such times, Matilda
never ventured along with the two; but the warm
and spirited fancy of Carl enabled him to embody
for her ears, when they met, the sweet, strange
thoughts of his mind, which, at such periods,
formed the topic of conversation between him and
his companion. These were themes upon which
Carl never failed to be eloquent, and Matilda
always
loved to hear. At other times, the three
would wander while the day lasted, in a sort of
mental and dreamy unconsciousness, among the
broken walls, turning thoughtlessly over the
marble
2*
stones, laboring now and then to decipher the
inscriptions, and toiling through the ancient
grounds and over the green grave knolls about
the edifice; until, as the sun began to wane,
Matilda
,
with a growing and beautiful timidity
always
becoming in a young and lovely woman
would hurry them homeward, leaving the
unfinished
story of Carl to find its conclusion at the
evening fireside, which generally brought them
all together like one family. They were soon to
become one, it may as well be said, for, seizing a
favorable moment, the gentle and fond Carl had
whispered to the maiden that he loved her, and she
did not hesitate long to promise that she would be
his. The time was designated for the nuptials, and
the two were quite as happy as mutual love, and
so pleasant a hope, could possibly make them.
V.
One afternoon, a few weeks prior to the time
appointed for the marriage, Carl and Matilda went
forth upon their usual rambles. Herman went not
with them. He had gone away from the village
on some alleged business, though, it is more than
probable, that he had simply excused himself, with
a delicate sense of propriety, from adding to a
party which under existing circumstances could do
very well without him. The fond Carl had more
than once been indebted in this manner to the kind
consideration of his friend. Thus, left to
themselves
,
the lovers wandered off in the usual
direction
,
and were soon embosomed in the haunted
shades of the ancient abbey. They seated
themselves
among the monuments, and discoursed of
the old time stories; and, with each remembered
legend, the timid Matilda, with a most natural
fear, would creep closer to her lover, and the fond
Carl, with a most natural protection, at length
encircled
her waist with his arms; and the ghosts of
ancient years were forgotten by the happy pair, in
the delicious realities of their present situation.
But a sudden step, as of one approaching,
disturbed
their dream of felicity. It was Herman.
He came, with an air of impatient pleasure and
slow regret, mingled up in his manner. As he
drew nigh, he handed a letter to Carl, and bade
him read it.
It is from my uncle, old Ulrich Ottfried of
Amsterdam, and he writes for me to come to him
immediately. The place he promised me is at
length vacant, and I must lose no time to secure
itI must leave you.'
`Leave us, dear brother!' exclaimed Matilda.
`Leave us, Herman!' said Carl.
`Ay, leave you!' replied the brother, `leave
you, to be sure. Would you have me sit here,
purring like a tame cat all my life, when there I
have a chance to be somebody, and see the great
city.'
`And will you leave us, Herman?' said the
girl reproachfully, and the tears stood in her eyes.
`Pshaw, 'Tilda! no tears now, I beg you.
They're not truethey're not natural. You
know you won't miss me, and there's no reason
why you should. You have Carl there, and he'll
be more to you than ever I can be. He suits you
better; and I know him too well to be afraid to
leave you to his hands.'
`Dear Herman!' said Carl, but you will not
go soonyou will stay to the wedding.'
`I can'tthe letter, you see, urges my
instant
departure; and I'm too anxious to get the
place to risk the loss of it by any idle delay. It's
true, I'm sorry to part with you; but, as I said, I
leave you both in good hands. You love 'Tilda,
and she loves you, and I believe you will be quite
as happy with each other, as if I looked on myself,
and saw all your happiness.'
The hand of Carl pressed that of Matilda, and
her's returned the pressure, at these words. Carl
then demanded of Herman when he proposed to
set forth. His prompt answer surprised and
pained
his hearers.
`To-morrow!' said he, `at early dawn, I
travel.'
`To-morrow!' exclaimed Matilda, `dear
brother
,
you cannot mean it!'
`So soon, Herman!' said Carl.
`Ay, to-morrowso soon!' was the reply.
`It's hard. I find it harder than I thought, to
leave youyou, dear 'Tildafor you have been
a dear, sweet sister to me always; and you Carl,
who have been a brother after my heart's wish: I
find it very hard to leave you, but I can't help
it; nor, indeed, if I could, would I. The place
is every thing to me, and I can make my fortune
in it. My uncle, if I please him, promises to take
me with him into business. Read the letter, Carl
see how fairly the good old fellow speaks. He
is
a good old fellowhe always loved me. I was
his favorite, 'Tildahe never thought much of
you. But, never you mindthere's no good
fortune that comes to Herman that you shall not
shareboth of you. So, it matters not much
which of us the old man lovedit's the same
thing; but go I must, and, as I've told you already,
I go to-morrow.'
This seemed a settled matter in the mind of
Herman, and it produced a melancholy feeling in
that of Carl. It seemed to impress Matilda even
more gloomily, as well it might; for Herman was
an only brother, and having neither mother nor
father, the privation, she well knew, must be
severely
felt. She had no longer spirit to remain
abroad, and closely attended by the young men,
she returned, in sorrowful temper, to her cottage.
VI.
You may be sure that was a gloomy evening in
the house of Matilda; and not even the
well-satisfied
love of the betrothed, could make it otherwise
to either of them. Herman was quite too dear to
his sister and his friend, to suffer them, at such a
moment, to feel their own felicity as perfect, just
when they were about to be deprived of him,
perhaps
for ever. The maiden felt so unhappy, that
she retired at an early hour, and the two young
men wandered forth to talk over their several
projects
,
and the various, and we may add, the
sorrowful
thoughts, with which their approaching
separation had filled them both. They had been
so long as oneso perfectly inseparable, hitherto
that it is not to be wondered at, if they were
almost
unmanned by it. Carl, indeed, suffered far
more than Herman. The latter had the
excitements
of a new world in promise before himthe
prospects of bettering his fortunes, and, besides
this, he was of a more elastic and lively temper
than his friend. He could very well bestow
consolation
,
where other wanderers would have needed
it. Carl had been always a dependant upon
Herman
,
whose excellent spirits and generous mood
had frequently neutralized the excessive
morbidness
of his imagination; and when the former
thought of this, and of his weakness in many
respects, he exaggerated to his own mind the
greatness of the privation which he was about to
undergo. Herman tried his best to console him,
and in the earnestness of their mutual thoughts,
they gave no heed to their wanderings. In the
first moment of external consciousness, Carl looked
up, and the ruins of the ancient abbey were before
them. It was a fitting place for their last
interview
and private conference. The silence and the
gloom of the spot accorded meetly with the
sadness
in their bosoms, and they at once entered the
sanctuary. They seated themselves upon one of
the broken monuments, and sat for some moments
in a moody silence. At length, Carl spoke as
follows
:
`I feel cold all over, Herman, as if a breath
from that old vault had breathed upon me. Your
contemplated journey affects me strangely. I
know not how I shall bear it. I shall not often
ramble among these ruinsI may have the
disposition
to do soI know I willbut I shall not
have the courage.'
`Pshaw!' exclaimed the bolder Herman
`how you talk. I know you better than you do
yourself, and venture to predict that when I am
gone you will be here oftener than ever. You love
these ruins.'
`I doI confess it!they are to me sacred,
if only for their recollections,' said Carl.
`And ghosts!' continued Herman with a
gentle
laugh. `You love their ghosts, I think, even
more than their recollections.'
`Ay, could I see them,' said the other. `But
they are shy ghosts, anddid you not hear a
breathing?'
Carl turned and looked in the direction of the
old vault, as he spoke these words, but Herman
only laughed at him. Carl laughed too, a
moment
after, when he perceived that his weakness
had been observed by his friend.
`You have nearly roused them, Carl,' said
Herman, after his quiet chuckle had subsided.
`But for my laugh they would have been about
you. You would have conjured the reverend
abbot
from that shattered vault, and a pretty story
you would have of it.'
`Perhaps'said Carl; `and you would have
listened to the story, Herman, without a single
interruption. Why is that? Why is it that you
can enjoy a ghost story without believing in the
ghost?'
`Why do we enjoy a puzzle which we know
can be undone?a mysterywhen a moment's
reflection teaches us that it is no mystery? It
is because the human mind finds a pleasure in that
which is ingeniousin any thing which shows
intellectual power. A fairy tale has a spell for
all senses, not because we believe in its magic
in its subtletyin its strange devices and wild
conceits; but, that these subtleties, spells, and
devices
,
appeal to natural desires and attributes of
the mind of man. They are beautiful, and as the
appreciation of which is beautiful, forms the
legitimate
object in the exercise of taste, they
commend
themselves to every intellect or imagination
VOL. I. 3
that possesses even common activity. You,
perhaps
,
are less fortunate than myself, since you
believe
in the ghost; and a natural sense of
apprehension
,
which your faith necessarily excites in
your mind, while the story is telling, subtracts
from the perfect satisfaction with whichwere
you as incredulous as myselfyou would hear or
tell it. You tremble while you narrate, and your
eyes are forever looking round to see the object
which your fancy conjures up.'
`True, but I do not cease to tell the story. I go
onI would go on, though I beheld the ghost.'
`I doubt you!' boldly said the other. `I
believe
you might try to do so, for I know the
extent
of your moral courage; but your
imagination
is too powerful for your control; and this I
sometimes fear. I sometimes fear that you may
suffer greatly, when I am gone, in the conflict
between
your imaginative faculty, and your good
sense. While I was with you, I had no fear; for
when you looked round for the ghost, I laid it
with a laugh. It will rise and haunt you when I
am gone.'
`How can you speak thus, or fear this, when,
in the same breath, you deny its existence?'
demanded
Carl.
`Oh, I do not deny its existence
to you
,'
said Herman`we can always have the ghost
we call for, for imagination is a god. It is the
only creator under heaven. Yours is of this sort,
and the worlds you people are sometimes too
extensive
for your sway. They will rebel against
you.'
`I fear them not!' said Carl. `It is my joy
to create, and I sometimes pray that with my
bodily eyes I may behold the dim but glorious
visions of my mind. You old abbot, sleeping in
the dust and sanctity of a thousand years,could
he rise before me now and answer a few questions,
I should be most happy.'
`Do not trouble yourself to call upon him
he will not trouble himself to come.'
`Yet, I am sure,' responded the reverent Carl,
turning an anxious look upon the vault, as if
soliciting
the buried saint to give the lie to his
comrade
,
`yet, I am sure, that it is not because he
cannot.'
`What other reason!' said Herman. `He
cannot, my dear Carl, and if he could, he would
not. He seesif the dead may see aughtall
around him that he hath ever known or loved in
life; and for us, whom in life he never knew, he
hath too little sympathy, to come at our bidding.
There might be some motive for those lately dead
to reappear at the requisition of those who still have
human and earthly affections struggling with the
cares and woes of earth; and I would that it were
possible we could evoke them. I, too, should be
a summoner, CarlI, too, should pray that my
bodily eyes might beholdnot the objects of my
mind, but the creatures of my heart! I would
give worlds, if I had them, once more to behold
my dear mother.'
`Could she know your wish, Herman, would
she not appear, think you?' demanded Carl.
`The suggestion makes against your
argument
,
Carl,' replied the other`immortal as she
is, she must know, she must hear my wish; yet
she does not appear! wherefore does she not?
she cannotit is written  she cannot; and it is,
perhaps, wise and well that she cannot. It might
alter my plansit might affect my purposesit
might disturb the existing condition of things
without
making them better.'
`Herman,could I believe with you, I should
be unhappy; but I cannot. I feel assured that
the spirit may return, and make itself known. I
do not say visibly to the eye, but in some way or
other, to one or more of the senses. Do you
remember
the story of Dame Ulrica, and the silks
that rustled in the tiring chamber?'
`Ah, no more of that, Carl; and as you are
now getting fairly on the track of the hobgoblins,
we may as well stop our confabulation, else shall
we not go to bed to-night. Of one thing be sure,
if I can revisit you after death, I will '
`Will you promise me
that
, Herman?'
demanded
the other eagerly.
`Ay, that will I, though I shall try to do it in
such a manner as not to scare you. I shall sneak
in like a gentle ghost, and shall speak to you in
the softest language. Will you really be glad to
see me?'
`Glad!  you will make me happy. It will
be a prayer realized. Promise me, dear Herman!
we are about to separate, we know not with
what destiny before us. The means of
communication
are few between us, and our anxiety to know
of each other will sometimes shoot far ahead of
our capacity to receive or yield intelligence.
Promise me  though heaven grant that you may
live long years after me  that should any thing
befal you, and the power be with you, you will
come to me  you will tell me of your own
condition
,
and guide me aright in mine; for my sake,
and for the sake of your dear sister, who will so
3*
soon be a part of my life. Will you do this
will you promise this, dear Herman.'
`I will  to be sure, I will, Carl,' was the
reply
.
`Seriously  solemnly?' demanded Carl.
`Seriously  solemnly!' said the other; `but,'
he continued  `if I am to take all this trouble,
and expose myself to all risks of wind and weather
merely to oblige you, you must do me a similar
favor; for, though I do not believe in any such
power on the part of the spirit once gone from
earth, nor am I particularly curious on the subject;
yet, while agreeing to satisfy you, Carl, I may
just as well exact a similar promise from yourself.
Dead or alive, Carl, it will always give me
pleasure
to see you. I have loved you as a brother,
in life  I have no fear to behold you after death.'
`It is a pledge  a promise, Herman!' was
the ready answer; and with the utterance of the
pledge, a hollow laugh resounded from the
dismembered
vault of the aged abbot.
VII.
They sprang at once to their feet. Herman
laughed back in return, but he remained where he
was. Carl trembled like a leaf, but he leapt over
the stone on which he had been sitting, and made
his way fearlessly towards the vault. Herman
followed him. The marble of which the vault had
been built was fractured in several places, so that
the interior was clearly visible from without. Carl
would have entered it, but Herman opposed his
doing so.
`Why should you go in  we can see the
venerable
dust where we stand,' and the eyes of the
two peered into the now silent chamber with a
scruitinizing gaze that promised to suffer nothing
to escape them.
`Look!' said Carl; `look, Herman! dost
thou not see!' and he pointed to a corner of the
vault while speaking.
The eyes of Herman saw nothing, however, or
he was not willing to acknowledge that they did;
but Carl was more ready to believe, and
consequently
more able to see, for, even while he
pointed
out the object of his sight to Herman, he
watched
it as it glided away through an aperture of the
vault  a pale bluish flame  a fragment, as it
were, of light  that seemed first to crawl along
the walls of the chamber, and then suddenly to
disappear through one of its many fissures.
`What is it that you see? I see nothing,' said
Herman.
`A light like that of a taper  a small,
creeping
light, that passed out of the corner to the
east.'
`Some slimy worm,' said Herman, `though I
did not see it at all.'
`Strange!' exclaimed Carl; `but you heard
the laugh, Herman?'
`Yes,' said the other, `but whether it came
from the vault, or from the opposite wall, I will not
pretend to say. Some urchin may think to frighten
us from the other side. We will look in that
quarter
.'
Carl now followed his companion, but he
followed
him unwillingly. Like all true romancers, he
had got just enough of the mystery. He was
unwilling
to press the matter farther, lest he should
discover that which might jeopard his prize
which might enable him, indeed, to `point the
moral,' but which would spoil, rather than `adorn,
the tale.' This, however, was the desire of
Herman
.
He would have given as much to discover
that the source of the laugh was human, as Carl
would have bestowed to prevent such a discovery.
The hopes of the latter prevailed. They
searched
behind the suspected walls, but found nothing;
and the benefit of the laugh was clearly with the
superstitious Carl. After this they left the ruins.
The hour was getting late, and as they had still a
great deal to say of sublunary concerns, it did not
need that they should take the haunted abbey for
this purpose. The next morning Herman took
his departure. Carl saw him a little way upon
the road; and when they were about to separate, one
of the last words of Carl was to remind him about
his promise. Herman laughed, but freely renewed
it. Was it a fancy of Carl, or did he hear the
laugh faintly repeated among the rocks behind
them, several seconds after his companion had
disappeared
.
It might be an echo merely, but the
circumstance troubled the mind of Carl, who could
not avoid thinking of it for weeks after.
VIII.
At length the dreams of the dreamer gave way
to more urgent realities. He became a married
man; and his bosom was too much filled with the
thoughts of Matilda, and his eyes were too much
occupied with gazing upon her, to permit of the
intrusion of any busy ghost or wandering vision
upon either thought or sight. Marriage has a
wonderful tendency towards making men practical.
The tendency, indeed, is sometimes too direct and
rapid to be altogether pleasant. Not that this was
the case with Carl. Far from it. He was
improved
in more respects than one in the change of his
condition. His mind needed some qualifying and
subduing influence to change its direction  to turn
it from the too constant contemplation of those
baseless fabrics which had heretofore but too much
occupied its regards; and to bring it back to
human
necessities, and, through their medium, to the
just appreciation of merely human joys. It is no
less true than strange, that for the first three weeks
after marriage, Carl did not dream at all, as had
been, for as many years before, his nightly, and,
to speak truth, his daily custom. For three whole
weeks he lived a common man  had earthly
notions
of things  addressed himself to earthly
labors
and did not once, in all that time, pay a
single visit to the ancient abbey. But when the
three weeks were over, he began again to dream,
and to wander. The old abbey again received
him as a constant visitor, and the presence of
Matilda
with him did not greatly lessen his devotion
to the sanctity and superstitions of the spot.
Perhaps, indeed, it was Matilda that somewhat
contributed to the superstitions of her husband.
She was a religious being  deeply impressed with
the spirit of faith and worship, even if she lacked
the divine intelligence which might have enabled
her to discriminate between the holy things of the
sanctuary, and those meretricious symbols, and
mocking shadows, which the arts of one class, and
the fears of another, have decreed for worship, and
declared no less holy than the true. The
spirituelle
held a large place in her composition; and if
her imagination lacked the activity of Carl's, her
yielding weakness rendered her susceptible to the
full influence of his. This weakness increased the
activity of a faculty to which it was constantly
appealing
;
and though the terrible forms and fancies
to which the mind of Carl frequently gave birth
and performance, only drove the timorous wife
more earnestly to her prayerful devotions, she
did not seek to discourage him in a practice which
had so beneficial an effect. Unconsciously he
practised upon her fears, moving her to
devoutness
through an unseemly influence; and with
equal unconsciousness on her part, her fears
stimulated
his superstitious tendencies even to error, by
giving continual employment to an imagination
which daily became more and more morbidly
active
,
and consequently dangerous.
Herman had now been gone for some months.
At first he wrote to them freely and frequently,
but after a while his letters grew fewer and less
satisfactory
,
and at length months went by without
bringing them any intelligence of their neglectful
brother. Matilda sometimes complained of this,
and thought unkindly of Herman; but Carl, like
a true friend, always found some excuse for his
neglect
,
in the pressure of business, and the
accumulation
of other duties and friends.
`Besides, he need not write, Matilda, when he
has nothing particular to say. No news is good
news commonly; and when a letter comes,
Matilda
,
you know you always dread to open it, for
fear of hearing evil. Herman will not forget us,
be sure.'
`But he may be sick, Carl.'
That was always a suggestion which silenced
her husband, and he felt doubly unhappy on such
occasions, as, in addition to the fear with which
such a suggestion seemed to inspire Matilda, there
was an unpleasant consciousness in his own mind
which dreadfully troubled him. At such times,
strive as he might, he could not help thinking upon
the promise which Herman had given him, and he
felt that, however he might regret the death of
his brother-in-law, such an event would be lessened
of much of its evil, if that promise could be kept.
Such thoughts he felt were criminal, and to do
Carl all justice, we should add, that he strove
manfully
to resist them. But he could not resist them,
and they grew upon him. After a little while, he
thought of nothing else. He did not need the
gently-uttered fears of Matilda, who continually
spoke of her absent brother, to remind him of his
promise and of his mortality; and in his
dreams the image of that well known friend,
stretched out pale, and motionless, in the embrace
of death, came but too frequently to his mind, not
to lose, in time, many of its terrors.
IX.
One pleasant afternoon, the two, Carl and
Matilda
,
rambled forth, according to their usual
custom
,
towards the ancient abbey. The sun was
just about setting, and he made a glorious descent.
His rays streamed through the broken walls by
which they walked, and they paused to
contemplate
the picturesque effect of their scattered beams,
gliding among tombs, in which the dust that
once was life, and strength, and ambition, could
no longer feel their warmth. While they looked,
VOL. I. 4
a cloud suddenly arose in the heavens, obscuring
and shutting out the bright glories which had won
their gaze, from the shattered walls which they had
made golden but a moment before. The sudden
clouding of the sky brought an instinctive gloom
to their mutual minds, and without seeming to
notice the absence of any connexion between the
phenomenon upon which they looked, and the
object
in her thoughts, Matilda quickly remarked:
`I hope, Carl, that nothing is the matter with
Herman.'
Strange to say, the thought that something
was the matter with her brother, was even then
the busy thought in the mind of Carl. He replied
after a moment's pause
`Indeed, Matilda, I hope not.'
A slight laugh rose from the ruins, and the
conscious soul of Carl was smitten within him.
`Had he been sincere in the utterance of that
hope?' was the question which he asked himself
when he heard the laugh; but it was a question
which he dared not answer. Matilda did not seem
to have heard the sound which had touched him
so deeply; and he was sufficiently collected to
conceal his agitation from her. But while they
spoke together, though but a few moments had
elapsed, the cloud had veered round, and now
hung in the sky directly before them. Somehow,
this appearance affected Carl seriously. He
coupled the cloud with his own thoughts, and his
imagination grew busy in its contemplation. It
did not seem a common cloud to his eyes; and
its progress, from a speck in the pathway of the
sun, to a mantle, in whose pitchy bosom the dying
but glorious orb was to find his splendors utterly
subdued, was a marvel to a mind so subtle as his.
His fancies grew firm and strengthened when he
saw that Matilda observed the wonder also.
`That is a strange looking cloud, Carl!' she
exclaimed  `see how it rolls  over and over
onward and onward  and yet there is no wind.
It is coming towards us.'
The flight of the cloud seemed to have
increased
in velocity. It neared them rapidly, and
was evidently descending. When above them, it
seemed to open and to expand, and from its bosom
Carl felt the warm drops upon his face.
`It rains!' he said, `let us go into the abbey.'
`I feel none,' said Matilda.
`Indeed! it is full on my cheek!'
The eyes of Matilda turned from the floating
mass that had now passed over them, but when
her glance met the face of her husband, she
screamed in terror.
`Father of heaven!' she exclaimed, `be with
us! Carl, my husband, your face is covered with
blood!'
`Say not so!' he cried, `what can it mean?'
He wiped his face with his handkerchief, and the
stains were visible to his own eyes; and when he
looked down upon his garments, they, too,
were covered with the same sanguinary color.
The wonder was greater still, when they looked in
vain to find a drop upon the person of Matilda.
Yet her arm had been fast locked within his, and
the very hand which had sustained her's was
sprinkled
plentifully with the stains.
X.
They hurried home in consternation. The
thought of Matilda was upon her brother; and she
regarded the events of the evening as ominous
of his fate. But why did the blood stains fall only
upon her husband? Why were her garments
untouched
?
This was a mystery to her; but not to
Carl. He thought he could explain it, but he
forbore
to speak. He dared not. His thoughts
and feelings were not what they should have been.
He was guilty, in his secret soul, of improper
feelings
,
if not of improper wishes, and he knew it.
Supper was soon served, and, like a good wife,
regardful only of her husband, Matilda urged Carl
to eat, for she beheld his abstractedness. He ate
without knowing that he did so. She, however,
could eat nothing, and as soon as the repast was
over, she retired for the night. But Carl felt that
there was no sleep for him; and a feverish mood,
for which he could not account, prompted him to
sally forth. He would have gone to his wife's
chamber  he tried to do so  for he knew what
were her apprehensions, and he wished to soothe
them  but he could not. Something impelled
his footsteps abroad  a spirit beyond his own
drove him forward; and with a desperate mind
he rapidly hastened to the abbey, as if there, and
there only, he should find a solution of the
marvel
which had distressed him. His heart seemed
to grow strong in proportion as his thoughts grew
wilful; and without any of those tremors which
had ever before possessed him when he rambled,
with a purely mental and not a personal feeling,
among the ruins, he boldly plunged into their
recesses
.
The night was a clear, but not a bright one.
The stars were not numerous, but they were
unclouded
.
The air was still, and was only now
4*
and then apparent in a slight breathing, as it came
through some little crevices in the wall. The
silence
of the place was complete  was its solitude
complete also? Carl asked of himself the question,
as he walked beneath the massive archway of the
fabric  still solid and strong, though broken and
impending; for, the masons of old, wrought, not
less to make their works live than to live
themselves
.
They live, like all good workmen, in
their labors. The roof, broken in many places,
let in the scattered starlight, and sufficiently,
though imperfectly, revealed to him the place.
He went forward, full of sad and truant thoughts.
He took his seat upon one end of a dilapidated
stone which had often sustained him before. His
elbows rested upon his knees, and his hands
supported
his head. It was in this posture that he
mused with feelings which sometimes brought him
back to impulses and a course of reflection not
unworthy of his better nature. They reproached
him with the heartlessness of his curiosity, as if it
were not the tendency of mind always  great mind,
which overlooks the time, and lives for God, and
for the species  to disregard nice affections, and
the tender blossoms which decay.
`Herman, Herman!' he exclaimed, `I have
been unworthy of thee. Thou hast loved me
with the love of a brother, while I have thought
of thee even as the ancient augur of the victim,
which he slaughtered for unholy wisdom! I have
prayed in my secret soul  I have prayed for thy
death  that I might have improper knowledge.'
Again did a slight laugh come to his ears.
He looked up with a shudder. A small blue light
crawled along upon the opposite wall, like some
slimy reptile, and while Carl watched its
progress
with solemn interest, the laugh was repeated
almost beside him. He started, and almost at the
same moment he felt one side of him grow chill.
A breath of ice seemed to penetrate him from the
east. He turned his eyes in that quarter, and the
spectacle that then met his gaze paralyzed every
faculty of his body. The form of Herman
Ottfried
was there, sitting beside him on the other
end of the grave stone. He could not speak
he could not move. His eyes were riveted upon
the spectre, and the glare which was sent back
from those of the unearthly visitant, was that of
hell. A scornful leer was in it  a giggling hate
a venomous but laughing malice.
`Her  Her  Herman!' Carl tried to speak,
but a monosyllable was all that he could utter.
`Ha, ha, ha!' The vaulted abbey rang
with the echoes of that infernal laugh.
`Mercy! mercy!' screamed the unhappy
Carl, as he lifted his hands and strove to close his
eyes against the dreadful presence. But the
elbows refused to bend  he could not raise them.
His knees in the mean time gave way, and he
sank senselessly upon the damp ground of the
abbey.
XI.
When he unclosed his eyes, which he did
in the fullest consciousness of his situation, and
consequently in the extremest terror, he was
rejoiced
to find himself alone. The grave stone, at
the foot of which he lay, was untenanted. The
abbey was silent, and though he dreaded, at every
step which he took while making his way out, to
hear the dreadful laugh, and to behold the hellish
visage, he yet suffered no farther interruption
while in the abbey. When he had left it, however,
and was about to enter the main street of the
village
,
he was encountered by a drunken man.
`Hallo, friend!' exclaimed the bacchanal,
`whither so fast? Stop and hear a song  stop
and be merry.'
And, in the voice of one satisfied with
himself
and all the world, the drinker carolled with
tolerable skill, one of those famous dithyrambics
in which the German muse has frequently
excelled
.
The eye of the unhappy Carl was turned, half
in hope, and half in despair, upon the man. He
had heard of the soporific effects of wine  of its
ability to drown care, and produce a sweet
forgetfulness
of his sorrow, and he felt inclined to the
temptation; but a sudden thought of Matilda shot
through his brain, at that lucky instant, like an
arrow. He knew not the lateness of the hour, and
was ignorant how long he had been from her.
He knew that he had swooned away, and knew
not how long he had remained in his stupor. It
might be near daylight, and what,  if such were
the case,  what must be her fears? Domestic
love came to his succor, and he rejected the
overtures
of the bacchanalian, who nevertheless
continued
to pursue him. He followed the unhappy
Carl to his very door, now persuading, and now
striving to provoke him by every manner of taunt
and sarcasm, to partake of the intoxicating cup
which he proffered. But the sufferer was firm,
though more than once it came to his thought that
wine was good against sorrow. He was not yet
so deficient, however, in other resources, as to fly
to this doubtful succedaneum.
XII.
It was not so late as Carl had fancied it, and
his wife was still awake. He had not been away
much longer than was his wont, when he went
forth on his usual evening rambles; and though
she had suffered from his absence, yet it was not
through any apprehensions for his safety. Still
she had no complaints, and the pleasure in her
eyes when he did return, was, probably, one of the
best arguments against his wandering forth again.
She was still melancholy and apprehensive, and
when she observed the anguish, not to say the
agony, which was apparent in every feature of his
face, her apprehensions underwent a
corresponding
increase.
`What is the matter, Carl? What was
troubled
you?' she demanded of him in agitated
accents
.
`Nothing, nothing!' with an effort, he made
out to reply.
`It is something  something terrible,
dearest
husband  your cheeks are haggard, your
eyes are wild  you tremble all over. Tell me,
tell me, my husband, what is it that troubles you.'
`Nothing,' he again replied  `return to your
bed,' (she had risen when she beheld his face,)
`return to your bed and heed me not. I will be
better soon.'
He quieted, if he did not satisfy her. She
returned to the couch as he bade her; and he
prepared to follow her. But there was one duty
which he omitted that night, which, from his
childhood
,
he had never neglected to perform before.
He did not pray. He strove to do so, but his
mind could not be brought to address itself in
supplication
.
He forgot the words; and others,
foreign
to his object, took their places. He gave up
the effort in despair. He could think of nothing
but the terrible laugh, and the demoniac visage
which had met him in the abbey. All the next
day he was like one whose senses wandered. His
wife strove to soothe his mood, which was fitful
and to attract his attention, which strayed
continually
;
but he smiled upon her kindly, with a sickly
smile, and gave no farther acknowledgment. As
night approached he grew visibly agitated, and as
he became conscious that his efforts at
concealment
were unavailing, he sought his chamber, to
hide in its dimness what he might not otherwise
conceal. But his agony seemed to increase with his
solitude. Dreadful images were about him in his
chamber, and a chuckle, like that he had heard in
the abbey, was uttered, at intervals, even over his
shoulder. He descended to the apartment in
which he had left Matilda, preferring that she
should see the agony that he could not endure
alone. But her presence gave him no
consolation
,
and her solicitude became an annoyance.
`Trouble me no more!' he exclaimed, in tones
which she had never heard from his lips before,
replying to one of her fond appeals to know the
cause of his sufferings. `Trouble me no more
it is nothing  nothing which I may tell you.'
She turned from him in sorrow not less deep,
though less acute than his, and the tears filled
her eyes. His heart reproached him as he beheld
her action, and readily conceived her pain; but
there was a wilful impulse in his bosom, which
refused
to permit of his making the usual
atonement
.
Sullen and sad, he glowered about the
apartment 'till night came on, and supper was
announced
,
when Matilda saw that his agitation was
visibly increasing. With the meek and blessing
spirit of an angel, forgetting the harsh rebuff
which he had given her, she approached him
threw her fond arms about his neck, and implored
him to smile again upon her. He tried to do so
but the effort produced only a ghastly grin, no
less shocking to her eyes than the effort had been
irksome to his mind. He went to the supper
table
,
and, unobserved by him, her glance watched
him while he strove to eat. He left the table in
horror, for the face of Herman stared at him from
the plate. There was no hope of escape from the
pursuing fiend, and the unhappy Carl rushed out
of the house. Where should he go?
`To the abbey! to the abbey! I will speak
I will demand its meaning. I will know and
hear all. If it be Herman, in truth  my brother
and my friend '
`Ha! ha! ha!'
The infernal laugh was at his elbow. He
turned in desperation to behold  not the
gorgon
stare which had so terrified him in the abbey,
but a face rather good natured than otherwise
the face of the bacchanalian who had encountered
him on the preceding night. A mischievous grin
was upon the features of the stranger, whose broad
mouth and little twinkling eyes, with the fat,
hanging
cheek, and the red and pimpled nose, seemed
the very personification of fun and frolic. Not a
feature
in his face appeared of demoniac origin. The
subtle malignity of the satanic attributes were
entirely
wanting, and in place of them, reckless mirth,
indifferent to all matters but good cheer, was the
VOL. I. 5
prevailing expression. But the laugh! That,
certainly, had been very like the laugh he had
heard in the abbey. No two sounds could have
seemed more alike to the ears of Carl. A new
thought entered his mind with this conviction.
This drunken fellow might have been the
proprietor
of the former laugh, as he certainly was of
that which he had just heard. To him might be
ascribed the design to frighten himself and
Herman
.
When he looked into the cunning, merry,
blubber-face of the reveller, conjecture became
conviction. `It must be so!' said Carl, half aloud.
`To be sure it must,' exclaimed the other.
`We will have a glass together now, though you
did refuse to be a good fellow last night. Come.
Here's old Dietrich hard by. I can answer for
his liquors, though I cannot for his conscience. I
believe in the one, and  damn the other. Come,
my friend, let's try him.'
Carl was half disposed to be civil with the
stranger. The notion which had suddenly
possessed
him that he and the ghost of the abbey were
one and the same person, brought a singular relief
to his mind; and he was half persuaded to forgive
him the impertinence of the fright which he had
received, in consideration of the solution of the
mystery which the conjecture brought. The
stranger pressed him, expatiating upon the sweets
of wine, and the luxury of good company.
`Wine,' says he  `wine, Carl '
`How the devil does he know my name!'
thought Carl to himself, but he did not say it.
`Damn my instinct,' said the other  `I find
it the hardest thing in the world not to know,
what, indeed, it is not necessary that I should
know.'
`What do you mean?' said Carl.
`Oh, nothing  I was only regretting that
my passion for wine  I had almost thought it an
instinct  should sometimes make me indifferent
to the sort of company I fall in with. Here, I've
been on the eve of eulogizing the rich
Hochheimer
to you, who are a judge, doubtless, of the
noble beverage, simply because, in my intercourse
with mankind, I meet hourly with so many to
whom the eulogy is a sort of key to their tastes,
that it is now almost habitual with me to dwell
upon it. To you, however, any idle talk upon
the merits and effects of good wine would be only
an impertinence.'
`I am no judge  I drink little,' said Carl,
to whom the seduction of appearing more than he
was, or of knowing more than he did, had always
been a very small one.
`You belie yourself,' said the stranger  `I
know that you are a judge  I see it in your face.
Come with me  you shall give me your opinion
of the wine of Dietrich.'
`Nay, you must excuse me,' said Carl.
`Can't  never excuse a man from his wine,'
said the other, bluntly. `Excuse a milk-sop, of
course  but never a man.' And as he finished
a sarcasm which has led thousands of goodly young
men to their ruin, he familiarly took the arm of
Carl to lead him forward to the tavern. But Carl
was not vain of being esteemed manly in this
respect
.
His philosophy was that of an English
poet, whom he never read:
`Who drinks more wine than others can,
I count a hogshead, not a man '
and he gently, but firmly refused.
`Why, man,' said the other, `Am I then
mistaken in you. I thought you a good fellow,
who loved good company, good wine, and a good
story '
`Good story!' exclaimed Carl, touched in
the right place.
`Ay, a good story  a tale of the mountains
of the miners, and the red demons of the mines
the gnomes and the salamanders.'
`Have you, indeed, such stories?' inquired
Carl, now rather curious.
`Ay, that have I, and, nearer home, of the
old abbey here. I can tell you a ghost story of
those ruins, that 'll make every hair of your head
stand on end.'
Carl hesitated and lingered, and his
companion
laughed at his hesitation. That laugh chilled
him  it reminded him of what he had been willing
to forget. It reminded him of the face of
Herman
the ghastly grin upon his lips, and the
dreadful laugh  so like to that of the stranger,
which he had then heard. He broke away from
the arm which held him.
`Not now,' said he, `you must excuse me.
I have business to attend to.' And with these
words, amid the curses and the derision of his
companion
,
he hurried forward to the abbey.
XIII.
A spell, whose power seemed to be irresistible,
prompted him in the direction which he took. A
will, superior to his own, yet compassing and
controlling
it entirely, drove him onward to the
abbey
.
What proper motive had he there? None.
5*
His duties were all elsewhere  with his wife
in his own home. What could he gain to see
once more the dreadful spectre which had
affrighted
him? An unholy curiosity stimulated the
answer
to this question. Knowledge  Knowledge.
To know that which is forbidden  to win the
secrets
of two worlds  was the hope of Carl, as it
has been the unwise hope of thousands. He did
not remember, while he indulged this vain desire,
that the `tree of knowledge, is not that of life;'
still less can it be said to be that of happiness.
Thought is not often happiness; and where thought
takes the wings of the imagination, and strives
ever after the ideal, it is too apt to be torture and
strife, as it must finally be death. Death, indeed
death and time are the grand illuminators. To
wait is to be wise. Alas! for Carl  he had not
only to wait but to endure.
`I must pluck up courage!' he mentally
exclaimed
.
`I demanded to see him; I must not
shrink from the encounter. Let him speak to me
let him say he is happy  and I will ask no more.'
What right had he to ask so much? Were
it his right, would it not be revealed? Would the
just God withhold from him a right? He did not
ask himself these questions, for Carl, like all of
his species, was but too apt to contemplate, through
the medium of a shallow vanity, the deity in his
own heart, as if the dwelling-place of fears and
feebleness, of vain caprices and false-founded
passions
,
could ever be the home of divinity.
He entered the abbey walls  he trod among
the crumbling ruins, but his heart shook within
him. Again he sat upon the tomb-stone  again
did the sudden and sinuous light crawl before him
upon the walls. He felt the chill enter and curdle
the blood within his bosom, and he knew that the
spectre was sitting at his side. He dared not look
round upon him. He almost sank upon the
ground; but the resolve of his mind sustained him,
and he tried to compose himself.
`Why should I fear?' he said in his thoughts.
`If it be Herman, he will not harm me  if it be
not Herman, what other has claim upon me!'
As if the spectre had seen his heart, and in
this manner commented upon its fears and
weakness
,
the dreadful laugh which had so shocked him
before, was again repeated. The blood ran cold
in the bosom of the mortal, but his firmness had
not departed. The resolve was still in his mind,
and after a brief pause, in which he struggled
successfully
with his terrors, he turned his eye boldly
to behold the spectre. The same dreadful presence
met his glance as on the preceding night. But the
novelty had passed away, and with it some of the
terrors. He felt that he could now survey it,
distinctly
,
resolutely, if not calmly. He did survey
it  and what a spectacle! The face was that of
his friend, that of Herman Ottfried, indeed; but,
oh! how different. It was the face of his brother
and his friend, but in place of the gentleness and
good nature that made its prevailing expression
heretofore, the features were all hell-stamped  the
skin was all hell-dyed and darkened. Carl nearly
fainted  his heart seemed to wither within him as
he gazed. But he continued to gaze. His resolve,
built upon high, but erring, moral purpose  was
not now to be shaken. Nor, indeed, could he do
otherwise than gaze. The eyes of the spectre,
like those of the fabled basilisk, rivetted his own.
The glare which shot from them, like a yellow
vapor
,
seemed to exercise upon him the power of a
spell. He gazed till he was infatuated; yet he
writhed all the while beneath the scornful
malignity
of the spectre's glance.
`What would you with me?' he screamed,
rather than spoke. He could easier scream than
speak; and the words were scarcely intelligible to
his own ears. He was once more answered by
that infernal laugh. He shivered as he heard it,
but it did not increase his terrors. It rather made
him indignant.
`Who are you?' he cried, in tones more
temperate
,
and with a spirit even more resolved than
before. `Who are you?  what are you? I
know you not.'
`Herman  thy friend  he for whose death
thou pray 'dst, that thou might 'st possess his
secret. Would'st thou not hear it?'
Such was the terrifying response of the
spectre
whom he had summoned.
`Thou liest!' cried Carl, boldly. `I uttered
no such prayer.'
`Thou did'st,' was the prompt reply, `in thy
heart thou did'st, and thy prayer is granted.
Herman Ottfried is no more  he is beside thee.'
`I believe thee not!' was the courageous
reply
.
`My friend still lives; and if he did not, I
would not believe that such as thou seemest, and
art, should be his representative. He is good, and
thou '
`Art damned!  thou would'st say!' and the
spectre concluded his sentence  `And thou say'st
truly, Carl Werner. I am as thou say'st. Yet,
look once more upon these features, and, blasted
and blackened as they appear to thee, say if they
are not those of him who was thy friend  of him
who was Herman Ottfried.'
`I believe thee not!' cried Carl, trembling
all over.
`Thou shalt  thou dost believe me, Carl
Werner,' replied the spectre. `Thou know'st
that I am he. Did I not pledge myself to meet
thee  to tell thee all  to give thee intelligence
to ease thy curiosity? I am come. I am ready.
Art thou willing  art thou prepared to hear?'
`Not from thee  not from thee!' cried Carl,
in agony. `Away! leave me  trouble me not
with thy falsehoods. My friend is living
Herman
Ottfried, I know, still lives; and if he did not,
thou never couldst have been the spirit which filled
his frame, and gave impulse to his actions. He
had no malice such as glares from thine eyes  he
had no foul passions such as hang about thy lips.'
`Thou reasonest like a child, Carl Werner.
Hear me and believe. The first truth is death
the second judgment. Mortality is a state of
dreams and shows  presentments which impose
only on mortal senses. We throw off all disguises
for the first time, when we arrive at the first truth,
which we never know until death. We acquire
all truth when we reach the higher form of
judgment
.
In death, we know for the first time what
we are and have been  in judgment, we know
what we shall be.'
`Then thou canst tell me nothing,' said Carl,
fearlessly  yet trembling all the while.
`Yes  I can tell thee what I am!' exclaimed
the spectre in reply; but it needed no words to
unfold that which was but too clearly discernible in
the blasted and blasting expression of his
countenance
as he thus replied. Carl saw this
expression
,
and the shudder that shook his frame
sufficiently apprized the spectre that it was
unnecessary
for him to relate that which the quick
imagination
of Carl so readily conceived. He
grinned
fearfully as he witnessed the tremblings of his
mortal companion, and the malicious and hateful
expression re-aroused the courage of the youth.
`Yet, though I cannot but see that thou art
one of the damned and blasted of heaven  one of
the thrice blasted perchance .'
`Thou art right!' exclaimed the spectre, while
lurid fires of a hellish agony seemed to kindle in,
and to dart forth from his eye  `thou art right; I
am indeed, one of the thrice  ay, one of the
seventy
times seventy times damned of the Eternal;
and I defy him amid all his fires.'
He paused as he spoke these words, and his
clenched hands were lifted in air, and thrust
upwards
,
as if he would do battle even at that
moment
with the deity. Carl shuddered and shrunk
from the fearful presence; but his soul grew
strengthened within him in due proportion to the
revoltings which he felt at such foul blasphemy.
I believe thee!' he exclaimed, and his own
clasped hands were raised in prayer while he
continued
`I believe thee; but I believe not that
thou art Herman Ottfried  it is impossible  I
believe not that he is dead.'
`Thou shalt have confirmation to-morrow.
His blood was upon thee yesterday  his shadow
is before thee now. Dost thou not believe me
wilt not thou hear some of the secrets which thou
didst once so desire to know. Where is thy
curiosity
where is thy thirst, Carl, after knowledge?
Has thy marriage changed thy nature, and art
thou willing to be the mere cur of the household,
and forego that noble ambition which made thee
seek after wisdom, as if it were life  as if it
were more than life to thee  as if it were
happiness
?
Is it happiness to thee no longer? Is thy
sense dulled for its enjoyment? Go to, Carl, I
had not thought this of thee. Go to thy wife
get from her the needle and the net-work, and find
in her example thy fitting employment. Thou
hast not the soul for my secret  thou wouldst fear
to hear it.'
`Fiend  foul fiend, and bitter devil!' cried
the fierce Carl, provoked by the taunting of the
spectre beside him  `I fear thee not, though I
would not have thy secret. I hold thee to be a
cheat, and thou but slanderest the noble spirit of
my friend. Have at thy throat, monster, in the
name of heaven and its blessed ministers. Have
at thy throat! and let the great God of the
heavens
and the earth determine between us.'
`Ha, ha, ha!' was the only response of the
spectre as Carl uttered these words. The
replication
of the crumbling walls to the infernal laugh
was tremendous; but it did not shake the
desperate
courage of Carl Werner. He sprang upon
his glowering and grinning enemy, with
outstretched
arms and fingers, and he aimed to clutch
the fearful image  not a whit alarmed at the
increasing
fiendishness of its aspect  by the throat;
but the object melted in his embrace, at the
moment
when it seemed most secure. His arms
grasped his own body; and, stunned with
confused
thoughts and defeated passion, the unhappy
Carl gazed around him in a stupor, which was
not at all diminished as he found himself alone.
XIV.
To a certain extent, this stupor brought with it
a desirable insensibility. He trembled no longer.
VOL. I. 6
He was almost reckless. A reaction in his mind
had taken place, and from having been one whom
every thing before, however slight, could startle,
he was now one whom nothing could affect or
move. He rushed through the abbey. He thrust
his fearless head into all its recesses  into tombs
and niches, cells, and ruinous and long untrodden
apartments, with most admirable indiscretion. He
summoned his tormentor from the places in which
he had hidden himself, and defied the presence
which he invoked. But all was silent; and,
exhausted
with fatigue, and chafed with his
disappointment
,
Carl at length departed from the abbey
in hopeless despondency. The next day, even as
the spectre had predicted, he received the fatal
intelligence
of the death of Herman. This news
was but too confirmatory of what he had seen and
felt. It gave life and body to his fears. The
grief of Matilda was great, but it would be vain
to undertake to describe that of her husband. To
her, his agony  dearly, as she well knew, he loved
her brother  seemed strange and unaccountable.
She little dreamed of the nightly revelations which
were made to his senses. With a praiseworthy
sense of propriety and a manly tenderness, he had
carefully withheld from her, though still longing
to reveal, the fearful secret which he possessed.
But how could he say to her that he had seen her
brother, or seen him as he was  a thing upon
whom the curse of God had fallen, and who had
been delivered over by his judgment to the awful
ministers of eternal wrath. He felt that he must
keep his secret, and bear with its horrible burden
as best he might. But, as evening drew nigh, the
horrors of his heart grew less and less
supportable
.
He felt that he must again perform his vigil.
He must again repair to the place of his trial and
his torture; and this, by a secret conviction of his
mind, he felt must be done, until he had courage
to hear, and was willing to believe, all the horrible
intelligence which the spectre might think proper
to convey. He had bound himself solemnly to
the meeting, and he could not shrink from the
terms of his pledge. Yet, where and when was it
to end? This was the dreadful question which his
soul answered in utter hopeless ness.
`In my death. Yet it will end soon, for I
cannot stand this strife much longer.'
Such were his thoughts and words; and their
truth would readily be believed by those who were
conscious of the sudden and singular change which
had taken place in his person. All the villagers
remarked it. He was haggard and listless  he
saw and heeded nobody  he moved through the
streets like a ghost, and Matilda  the beloved
wife of his affections  no longer filled his heart,
and commanded the devotion of his eye. She
strove to find out the secret of his sorrows, and to
soothe them. But vainly would the physician seek
to heal, while he remains ignorant of the cause of
the distemper. We must lay bare the wound to
extract the poison; and in the purity of her soul
she did not even imagine the horrible nature of
that secret which was preying upon his. Her
efforts
were in vain. Night came on, and though
she strove to keep him at home, the spell was too
powerful to permit her to succeed.
`Where is it you go, dearest Carl? Why,
night after night, will you go forth in so much
sorrow
,
and with features so wild, so full of
apprehension
;
and when you return  so full of horror
so haggard  so dreadful? Tell me, dear
husband
,
whither it is you go, and why it is you
suffer
in this manner.'
`Nay, do not heed me, dearest,' said the
unhappy
man, with a gentleness of manner which
made his sorrows only the more touching  `do not
trouble yourself about me. I have busy and
vexing
thoughts, and shall not look well until they are
digested into form. When I resolve them, then
will I remain with you, and be at peace.'
`What thoughts are they?' she demanded;
but he smiled, and answered her evasively.
`Ask me not  not now,' he replied, and
resisting
her solicitations to be allowed to go forth
with him, he rushed out of the house. She
followed
him to the door, and looked after him in the
street; and her own apprehensions were greatly
increased as she beheld the erratic impulse of his
movement, and the feebleness of his step  the one
betokening the disorder of his mind, the other the
debility of his body. While she looked and
trembled
,
with the big tear gathering slowly in her eye
and stealing silently to her cheek, the accents of a
mild but strange voice met her ears at a small
distance
,
and, turning, she beheld an old man
standing
before her. He was a stranger to her, and
evidently a stranger in the place, since his air and
costume were very different from any that she had
ever before seen. His beard was long and white
like silver, and hung down neatly smooth and
clean upon his bosom; his hair, equally long, and
not less white, streamed with similar smoothness
down his back and shoulders. It was evident that
he was a person of very great age, yet his skin
was clear, of a pure white and red, and unmarked
6*
by a single wrinkle. His mouth was small, and
wore a sweet expression, and his eyes were full of
benevolence. He carried a little staff, and a bundle
which probably contained a single change of
raiment
it certainly could not have held more; and
he seemed like some venerable traveller, who had
an unconquerable desire for travel, and had learned
to narrow his wants to the smallest possible limits,
consistent with the superior claims of an
intellectual
nature.
`Daughter,' he said, `Peace be with you.
Can you give me shelter and food for the night?
I am a stranger, and would abide with you.'
The heart of Matilda, like that of Carl, was
open as day, and the stranger most probably had
seen in her countenance that he would not be
refused
;
for, even as he spoke, he prepared to enter.
He was not deceived in the person he addressed.
With a sweet voice, full of respect  for his
venerable
white hairs had impressed Matilda with a
proper and gentle awe  she bade him welcome,
and having closed the door  after giving a long
lingering look to the form of her husband, who
was rapidly passing from her sight  she led the
way for her aged guest, into an inner apartment.
There she spread before him the simple repast
from which the unhappy Carl had fled. The old
man blessed the bread ere he broke it, and blessed
the giver. He then ate heartily, and at intervals
conversed with Matilda, who sat with him at the
table, though she ate nothing. Her heart was too
full of doubt and sorrow to suffer her to eat, and
while her guest spoke, the tears gathered
unbidden
,
and without her consciousness, to her eyes. He
saw them.
`Daughter, you weep  you are unhappy.
Why is it  what is your sorrow.'
`Alas! father, are we not born to sorrows.
Is there one who escapes?'
`True, my child  sorrow is human, and to
grieve is the attribute of man, and perhaps his
blessing. They are blest who can weep. God
loveth those whom he chasteneth; for it is through
trial only that we gain virtue, and through virtue
only that we gain heaven. The untried are the
unblessed, for then is the work harder for them,
and the prospect of virtue more remote. Such,
my daughter, is not your case. The fire even
now is purifying you, and if you grieve, you do not
murmur. Sorrow, like a goodly medicine that is
to work for our healing, must be submitted to
without murmuring. Whence come your sorrows,
my daughter  let me know them. I have
travelled
much among men, and I know many of the
arts of healing. I have some skill which I may
boast, in curing those hurts of the mind which
come from our indiscretions, and are to be healed
by our humility. Let me know what grieves you,
and hear to my counsel.
`I grieve not for myself, my father, so much
as for one that I love  my husband.'
`You are married then?'
`I am, and to one of the best of men; but he
is thoughtful even to sadness, and I fear that his
thoughts are sometimes too vexing for his mind,
which they very much disorder. Something
troubles him very greatly even now, and before
you came he went forth in deep anxiety, which it
was painful to me to behold. He will be away
until near midnight, or even after; and when he
returns, it will seem that some dreadful strife hath
shaken him  his face will be pale as if with
sudden
fright  his eyes wild, staring, almost starting
from their sockets, and his whole appearance that
of a man almost distraught.'
`And how long hath he been troubled in this
wise, my daughter?' demanded the aged stranger.
`But a few days,' Matilda readily replied; for
there was something so encouraging in the
appearance
of the old man, that, although a woman
rather disposed to reserve in her manners, she felt
that she could have freely told him every secret
of her bosom.
`But a few days  and before this time, he
hath shown none of these habits?'
`None, father  none of this wildness and
affliction
.
He hath been thoughtful ever, and fond
of sad thoughts,  but he hath never been wild
and stern as he is now, and never did he go abroad
in this fashion after the night.'
`You tell me of one,' said the stranger, after a
brief pause given to thought  `You tell me of
one who hath done a sudden wrong, and whom a
just conscience is smiting sorely; or, one,
perchance
,
who is fond of his error, or, from a false
and unseemly pride, who persisteth in it.'
`Oh, no, father  I cannot think it. Carl
would never wrong human being. He is the most
just and honorable of our village  that
everybody
says of him.'
`That may be, my daughter, but is there no
wronging of God and of one's self  which is also
a wronging of God, as it perverts the service of the
creature from the place and power to which it is
due. Can you tell me that Carl Werner has not
done this.'
Matilda tried to think, before she answered,
whether she had mentioned her husband's name.
She did not recollect having done so, and yet the
old man had pronounced it. Before she could
resolve
this thought or reply, the stranger continued:
`It is always a bad sign to see one, on a
sudden
,
depart from a good habit, my daughter. You
say that your husband seldom or never went forth
at night, but always preferred to remain at home,
until now.'
`Yes, father,  but it is with evident
reluctance
that he now leaves me. It is like tearing
himself away that he rushes out of the house, soon
after nightfall, and goes off I know not where.'
`To return miserable,' said the old man. `To
bring him back to an old habit, my daughter, is
probably to give him the peace of mind which you
say he seems to lack. Have you striven to keep
him at home, my daughter, since you have seen
the evil of this habit?'
`I have, my father, but without success,' was
the reply.
`You must do it,' said the old man with
vehemence
`you must do it. A good wife, who
loves her husband, and is beloved by him, has a
thousand sweet arts of persuasion which will not
fail to procure from him her wishes. Your
husband
loves you.'
`Of a truth, I think it.'
`Then, my daughter, if you love him, you
shall not fail to persuade him, if you seek to do it.
You must keep him at home. He must not go
abroad. These nightly wanderings make his
infirmity
.
They prove that he is subject to some
evil influence, which thus exacts his obedience,
and imposes upon him this form of service. You,
and you alone, can save him; for, as the evil
influence
strives through the powers of hate, it can
only be safely contended with by the powers of
love. This is the war which is ever going on
between
the two great principles by which the world
is divided. You must prove that the principle of
love in your bosom is stronger than that of hate in
the enemy of your husband. Can you prove this,
my daughter; for, unless you can, Carl Werner is
lost to you forever, as he certainly will soon be lost
to himself.'
`I can  I will!' cried the devoted wife, with
terror and love both equally mingled in her
countenance
;
for the words of the venerable old man
had deeply impressed her, and a something in his
air and manner assured her that he was worthy of
all confidence.
`I can  I will, my father  only tell me
what I shall do  how work  what say.'
`Love needs no counsellor, my daughter, for
it is God's nature, and is by instinct wise. True
love, I speak of; and not the idle fancies which
the profligate and vain have misnamed love. If
you love Carl Werner with a true wife's love, you
will seek that he should be always with you  you
will seek to make him happy. These are your
present tasks. You must begin by keeping him
from this wandering habit. He must not go forth
again at night  for he flies from the principle of
love, to pay homage to the principle of hate.
Withdraw him from that foul worship, and he is
safe, and you are both happy.'
It would be needless to dwell upon, or to
detail
,
the farther dialogue which then took place
between the young wife and her venerable guest.
It is sufficient to say that the longer she listened to
to his counsel, the more she became impressed with
its force, and with the necessity for its adoption.
While she heard him she had no wish for sleep,
and hours seemed to pass away like minutes until
the clock struck the midnight hour, and she then
grew more than ever alarmed at the absence of
her husband. She was desirous of putting into
use and exercise the advice which the old man
had given her, and would have sallied forth, even
then, to look after him, when the stranger
dissuaded
her from it
`Do you remain,' he said, `while I go forth
and seek him.'
`You!'  she said  `no, father, you are too
old and feeble, and your limbs are weary with the
long day's travel.'
He rose, as she spoke these words, and as he
moved over the floor, she was answered. Where
had those aged limbs acquired that strength and
elasticity which they now exhibited?
`But you know not where to seek him, my
father.'
He smiled; and she did not doubt, when she
beheld that smile, that the aged man knew better
where to find her husband than she did herself.
He paused as he crossed the threshold, and
bidding
her be of good cheer, he blessed the house
and departed.
XV.
Meanwhile, what of Carl Werner? With a
fearful instinct he proceeded, upon leaving his
dwelling, to the place of meeting with the spectre.
Vainly did he strive against the fascination which
impelled him to seek the abbey. Why should he
so wilfully seek that which was so full of torture?
VOL. I. 7
He had now no wish to hear the revelations of the
dead  he had no thought, certainly, to profit by
them, when brought by one whose very presence
was so terrific; still less did he desire to owe his
knowledge to a source so foul and fearful. These
were his thoughts, nor his thoughts merely.
These were his frequent resolves throughout the
day. `I will not go to-night,' his lips muttered
at all hours; yet, with the coming of evening, his
good resolutions failed him. A power which he
strove vainly to resist, drove him onward; and like
the criminal, reluctant yet compelled, he appeared
regularly at the appointed hour at the summons of
his tyrant. Carl felt that there was a judgment in
all this. He felt that it was a decree of heaven
against him for the unholy feelings and desires of
his heart. Yet, where, and when, and how, was
this to end? He dared not think! His knees
trembled beneath him as he put this question to
himself, and felt, with the increasing weakness
and misery of every moment, that it could end
only in his death.
This conviction was despair. Despair has its
strength, but it is the strength accorded by a
demon
at a fearful price. The price was hope and
peace  the penalty was the loss of two lives
the life of the present, and the life to come. Carl
felt that they were already gone, and all his
thoughts were now given to the demon. The
principle of hate grew active in his fears, and the
principle of love grew feebler and feebler, in the
continual decay of his hopes. The strife was not
only against Carl Warner, but it was against the
sweet young wife of his bosom. He felt it to be
so, himself, as he found himself continually
laboring
not to think of her.
We need not say, that in the abbey that night,
the same hour of torture was passed by Carl, in
company with the demon, as before. The belief
that his friend was the victim and the slave of hell,
sent forth by the infernal monarch to perform a
duty which he dared not disobey, was the racking
conviction to Carl. Vainly he demanded of the
spectre to disavow the features he had assumed.
His prayer was idle. Would the principle of
hate yield up his chief vantage ground? As well
might he implore indulgence from that power,
whose only office is punishment. He raved to the
demon  defied his malice, and vainly flattered
himself that the passion which he showed to his
tormentor, was, in reality, a re-assertion of his
virtue
.
Thus do men hourly chain themselves with
their own sophisms. The very tumult in his soul,
and the violence of his lips, as they sprang from a
feeling of hostility, were, in truth, only so many
tributes to the principle of hate. The fearless
calm, the gentle earnestness of love, were not in
his heart. It was rather a place of fears and strife;
and every moment of his paroxysm, increased the
number of avenues through which sin might enter
and perpetuate its sway. The conflict nearly
destroyed
the mortal. Almost exhausted, Carl
rushed from the ruins; and, this time, he left the
demon squat upon the tomb-stone, where he had
sat all the time of their conference, glowing and
grinning at the agony, and yelling forth his
dreadful
laughter, as he beheld the flight of the victim.
XVI.
Carl was not permitted to reach his home in
peace. A group of revellers stood in his path
as he was about to enter the village. They
danced and sang at his approach, and soon
gathered
around him with tumultuous cries. They
sang in his ears the praises of revelry, and invited
him to join them.
`Be not churlish, brother,' was the cry
`why cherish care? why mate with sorrow? why
deny thyself to live? The wine, the wine, boys,
and here's health and a fresh heart to our new
companion.'
Carl envied them their felicity; and their
language, for the first time in his life, seemed
sweet in his ears. Hitherto, he had led the life of
an abstemious and wholly studious youth,
rejecting
utterly those noisy and spendthrift pleasures
which are so apt to lead astray the young. He
began to think that he had erred in his practice,
and had been guilty of injustice to a class of
persons
who were a great deal wiser than himself.
The torments which he had just undergone,
prepared
him for this way of thinking. He
hesitated
,
murmured, looked vacantly around him, and
they took him gently by the arm, and renewed
their solicitations. Among the foremost of these,
he now recognized the bacchanalian who had
before
assailed him. But he was not intoxicated on
this occasion; and while he spoke with the words
and warmth of a boon companion, his language
was carefully chosen and gently insinuating. Carl
began to yield; his eyes were already turned in
longing upon the tavern  his feet were at the
guidance of the individual we have just spoken
of  in his thought, the indulgence of wine began
to assume the appearance of a leading and
necessary
object: and in another moment the powers of
7*
evil would have made large strides towards the
possession of their victim, when another hand
pressed the arm of Carl Werner, and a gentle,
but strange voice, in his ears pronounced the
name of his wife.
`Matilda  she waits you, Carl  she suffers
at your long absence. Will you not go to her?'
The old man whom we have seen setting forth
from the house of the wife in search of the husband,
stood at his elbow. He had come in time. His
words operated like magic, and Carl broke away
from his conductors.
`Matilda  my wife  my poor wife!' he
exclaimed
`Yes  let me go to her.'
If the words of the aged man were so quick and
powerful to move Carl Werner, his presence
seemed
to have no less an effect upon those who sought
to lead the youth astray. They shrank away
from the stranger with hisses, and though reviling
him, they still fled. Carl was surprised at this,
and the more surprised and horror stricken
when he distinguished among the howls and hisses
of the flying crew, the horrible laugh which
had so much haunted him before. The old man
took no heed of their clamor, but composedly
conversed with Carl while they proceeded to the
lodgings of the latter, with all the calmness and
ease of one whom a confidence of superiority keeps
from anger towards an inferior, as certainly as it
protects from harm.
XVII.
Carl felt better and happier in the embraces of
his wife when he reached home, than he had felt
for some days before. The principle of love was
reviving within him. The conversation of their
aged guest contributed largely to this
improvement
.
They could not but acknowledge the
influence
which they could not but feel. Yet he
could scarcely be said to converse. His words
seemed so many laws settling doubts and
silencing
controversy. He spoke from authorityfrom
an authority, seemingly, even beyond that of strong
common sense and great experience. Carl was
surprised and pleased to find himself able to listen
to his words; and though the terrible strifes which
he had recently undergone were still busy in his
mind, he yet found pleasure in his new
companion
.
Much of the old man's conversation seemed,
indeed, to be intended for his particular case. He
spoke of the `various encounters to which
mortals
were subject. The necessity of confidence in
heaven's justicethe willingness to waitthe
readiness to endure. He then spoke of the
principle
of love as he had spoken to Matilda. He
insisted upon it as sufficiently strong to withstand
the opposite principle of hate, and to trample over
it in the end. The conflict, he said, would be
long and perilous, and it would be continued
through nations and individuals to the end of
time;  patience, he said, and perseverance,
prompted by the spirit of love, which is eternal,
would be certain to achieve the victory. In the
meantime, it would be necessary that the labors of
love should be increased and strengthened. We
should strive to love one another, as the best policy,
and the noblest moral economy. Every falling off
in our affections from each other, was a gain to
the rebelling principle of hate, and kept back
humanity
from its hope of heaven. Every increase in
the amount of human love, was a succor to the
sovereign principle; as much so, as, in the warfare
among men, would be the accession of new
numbers
.
To love one another is to conquer evil, for
as evil toils through the principle of hate, it can
only be successful over us, by engendering in our
bosoms hostility to our fellows, and a general
faithlessness of each other, which must produce
hostility. To confide, should be the first lesson,
as it is always the first and noblest proof of
love!'
This counsel strengthened Carl Werner and
his wife, and made them both think. Carl felt
calmer as he thought, and retired to his chamber
with new and better resolutions. The old man
prayed with the two before they retired; but though
Carl knelt with the rest, he yet found it
impossible
to pray. He could only think, and his
thoughts were confused, apprehensive, and not
given, as he felt himself, to the sovereign principle
of love. When he retired to his chamber, he
resolved
to pray alone; but he could not. He
knelt by the bedside in vain. His tongue seemed
to cleave to the roof of his mouth. His brain
seemed to glow like fire, and he longed once more
for the presence and the conversation of the aged
man. He slept but little during the night, and
when Matilda awakened at intervals, she heard
nothing but his groans.
The next day the old man sought an
opportunity
of conversation with Matilda in secret.
`My daughter,' he said, `your husband
must not go forth to-night. You must exert all
your strengthall the strength of your love;
spare no prayers, no solicitations, but you must
keep him at home. He goes to pay homage to
the principle of hate. He must break his bondage.
He must withhold his homage; and he must prove
that he renounces the hateful worship, ere the
principle
of love will come certainly to his aid. He will
not find relief  he cannot be happy  till then;
and he must do this himself. We can do nothing
towards it, save by our prayers, and these will be
of little avail, until, of his own resolve, he breaks
to you the secret of his sorrow. When he freely
and voluntarily declares to you the trouble of his
mind, he will find relief. To confide our wo to a
beloved one, is to find healing. He must
acknowledge
this truth, ere he can hope for healing; and
it is a truth that he must teach himself. I warn
you, therefore, unfold nothing that I have said to
you, which shall move him to this determination,
else it will be of no avail. We may tremble, but
we must be silent; and if our fears become
stronger than our hopes, we must then only resort
to our prayers.'
That day the old man gave Carl himself a
lesson which had its effect in promoting the wishes
of all, though, to the passing thought, it would
seem to have no necessary connexion with the
misfortunes
of the latter. He saw him in a condition
of stupor, sitting upon the threshold, and
evidently
unconscious of all things around him.
`My son,' he said, `we do not all our duties
when we have said our prayers. Indeed, we may
be said to do none of them, if we do but this. Our
prayers are offered that we may have strength and
judgment to perform our duties rightly and
thoroughly
.
The first of these is industry. The
decree
of God  one of the first  is one of the
elements
of religion. Thou shalt earn thy bread
in the sweat of thy face. He who prays merely,
and toils none, is a hypocrite, and though he may
deceive himself and his fellow men, he cannot
deceive
God by his professions.'
`Alas! my father  I would work,' said the
unhappy Carl, `but I cannot  I am sick  I am
sad  too sad  too sick to work.'
`Hast thou tried, my son.'
`Of what use to try, my father. I feel that I
should do nothing.'
`The will is the service, my son. God tasks
not your service, but he receives the free tribute
of your heart, and if the will is free to serve him,
the amount of your body's service is of little
regard
.
Try  let the will govern the limbs, and
they will do much. Certainly, thy labor will
lessen
the troubles of thy mind, which, in most cases,
spring from the tyrannous imbecility of the frame.
Try, my son  thy labors will avail thee much
more in thy sadness than all thy prayers.'
Carl obeyed, and strove diligently to labor,
and though he did but little, yet he felt better from
what he did. The old man conversed with him
while he toiled, and he gathered goodly counsel,
and pleasant consolation, from his words. But as
the day waned, the agonizing apprehensions of
Carl were renewed. The fascinating spells of the
demon began to work upon his mind, and his
increasing
disquiet became visible to his household.
At supper he was unconscious of the meats before
him, until the words of the aged guest aroused his
consideration, while he prayed for a blessing upon
the repast. Carl gradually grew fixed in mute
attention as he listened to the terms of this prayer,
which was, in some respects, peculiar. The old
man prayed that `the fond husband might ever be
heedful of the affections with which he had been
endowed by the confiding wife  that he might
heed the meaning of her pale cheek, her tearful
eye, and laboring bosom  that he might never
estrange himself from one who looked so much, so
entirely to him, for countenance and comfort  and
that the ways of error into which frail mortality
was ever but too prone to fall, might never seduce
the regards of the comforter, from the weak but
confiding heart to which they were entirely due.'
Much more after this fashion was said by the
old man, but these words had their effect. Carl
looked upon his wife with eyes of closer inquiry
than he had fixed upon her for many days. He
saw, for the first time, that her cheek was pale
as if death had set his hand upon it  that her eye
was full of tears  and that her bosom heaved
with an anguish which her lips had never spoken.
Her eye caught the glance of his own while he
gazed, and she burst into a flood of tears  rose
from the table  rushed to the spot where her
husband sat, and threw herself at his feet. How
dreadfully was he shocked by this movement!
How bitterly did he reproach himself! He felt
that he had been selfish  that, heedful of his own
sufferings only, he had given neither eye nor
thought to hers. He sank down upon the floor
beside her; and he muttered broken words,
imploring
forgiveness. The venerable guest saw that
the moment was come, when love was to obtain
the mastery or forever fail; and without being
seen by the two, he left the apartment. But his
words had been deeply impressed upon the mind
of Matilda, and she needed not his presence to
prompt her in the performance of her task. She
VOL I. 8
poured out her full heart to her husband, told him
of her fears during his absence, of her sufferings
as she beheld the sapping and overcoming
character
of his, and implored him, for the love which he
had once vowed her, as earnestly as if she had
lost it. Long and trying was their conference,
and more than once the wife despaired of her
object
.
But though she trembled, she yet implored,
and the principle of love prevailed. The heart of
Carl was touched  the seal removed from the
fountain  and he poured forth, in her astounded
but unshrinking senses, the whole strange and
dreadful secret.
XVIII.
He had scarcely done so, when he heard a tap
on the window, as of one claiming admission. He
started, he trembled  a guilty fear rose in his
throat and choked him.
`It is he  the demon  the spectre!' he
exclaimed
,
gaspingly.
`Bid him enter,' cried the old man, who had
returned to the apartment without their perceiving
either his departure or his entrance, and who
seemed perfectly conversant with the whole
narrative
`Bid him enter, Carl.'
But Carl hesitated and trembled. He moved
not; and Matilda rose to her feet.
`I fear nothing!' she exclaimed  `I will
throw open the window. If it be the spirit of
Herman Ottfried, he will not harm me. If it be
other than his, it cannot. God be with me  for
I will do it!'
The voice of the old man arrested her, as she
was about to do what she had said.
`Daughter!'
She turned, and saw that his eye rested
anxiously
upon Carl, and she then understood that
the office belonged to her husband. She did not
need to look upon him twice. He had been
praying
while she spoke, and he now rose.
`No, Matilda  the task should be mine. I
have looked upon the fiend before  I do not fear
to look upon him again. Still less do I fear
having your eyes upon, and your prayers for, me.'
A horrible yell of laughter reached his ears from
the outside, and half unmanned him. He shivered
all over; but just then the aged guest repeated
these words, as if for himself.
`The Lord is my strength, and my redeemer.
He is with me, and I fear not the evil one. Be of
good cheer, oh, my soul, for in this is thy strength.
Thou shalt prevail in the strife with thy enemy,
even as love prevaileth over hate, and the spirit of
God over the spirit of the devil.'
With a single blow of his fist, Carl threw
wide the shutter, and though his voice trembled
while he spoke, yet the words which he uttered
were distinct
`Enter  if it be God's will  enter!'
XIX.
The mocking spectre was once more before
him  and the grin of malice and imagined victory
was again visible upon his countenance, until he
beheld the form of the venerable guest, still
kneeling
upon the floor, with eyes and hands uplifted to
heaven, and seeming as if he beheld him not.
Then his whole aspect was altered. His grin
became
a bitter scorn, and, though he still wore the
exact features of Herman Ottfried, yet the whole
expression was so changed to that of a hellish hate,
that, even to the eyes of Carl, the likeness seemed
almost gone.
`Thou here!' exclaimed the spectre,
addressing
the aged man.
`Thou seest!' was the reply.
`I see  but thou art here in vain  thy
prayers will avail him nothing  he hath bound
himself to me. My power is upon his pledge.
He cannot escape  he must meet me where I
will; and when he forbears to come  when,
urged by such as thee, he presumes to disobey, I
will seek him with redoubled tortures, where he
hides, and tear him from thy very altars. Carl
Werner  I command thee. Come!'
Carl trembled all over, and he felt an
irresistible
power dragging him forward. At this
moment
the old man spoke
`His pledge shall be fulfilled  but not to
thee. Look, Satan!  God hath heard the
prayers
of love  and his messenger comes to release
the thrall of hate. Look!  the pledge is
redeemed
?'
As he spoke, he pointed to the opposite corner
of the apartment, upon which his eyes had been
earnestly fixed, even while the demon was
addressing
him. There, visible to all, stood another
spectre, having the precise features of Herman
Ottfried, and the very expression which he was
wont to wear in life. The contrast between the
8*
one and the other spectre, both having the same
features, was prodigious! They represented
different
principles. The one had borne the
features
of punishment  the other came with the
mild attributes of mercy. Alike in every feature,
they were yet as utterly unlike as night and day.
The demon put on a look of agony, mingled
with hate and disappointment, as, with a howl and
hiss, he fled from the presence of the spectre whose
features he had worn for the purposes of hate, but
whose glance of benignity and love he could not
withstand. Howling with hate, he fled; while the
gentle spirit advanced into the apartment.
`Oh, brother, dearest Herman!' cried the
sister, with a joyful accent, as she rushed towards
him. She sunk down upon the spot where she
would have embraced him, and her eyes beheld
his shadowy form melting away, even like the last
gleam of a lovely sunset into the distant shadows.
`Look to your wife, my son,' said the aged
man  `she swoons  give her help.'
Carl raised his wife, and in a little while she
recovered  but the aged man had disappeared.
They never saw him again.
`IPSISTOS.'
With this
I mix more lowly matter; with the thing
Contemplated, describe the mind of man,
Contemplating; and who, and what he was,
The transitory being that beheld
This vision,  when, and where, and how he lived.
Wordsworth
.
I.
With
the first tokens of the gray dawning, and
while yet the thin gray mists lay like a gauzy veil
above the half-canopied mountains, the gates of
the great city were thrown open, and the people
thereof began to pour forth in mighty crowds.
Like a swollen torrent, that forces its way over
the barrier and broken rocks, they came roaring
and rushing, less with the innate feeling of power
than of enjoyment. A universal spirit of
intoxication
seemed to possess the multitude, and by
tens, by twenties, and by hundreds, with wild and
dissonant cries of mingling yet discordant voices,
they pressed their way through the narrow
gateway
,
and came forth clamoring upon the plain.
The aged and the yet green in youthwise,
venerable
men  devout matrons,  trembling and
hopeful maidens,  and sportive childhood, that
laughs and leaps, were mingling together, until,
even ere the sun had yet risen, the vast esplanade
in front of the city was covered with their forms.
One mighty will seemed to move in every heart,
and to unite all voices in a universal song, as if
for some great deliverance. An hundred
thousand
tongues mingled in the strain, and the hills
that surrounded them gave back the melody with a
seven-fold echo.
Lofty and beautiful is the temple that stands
above the hill! Such was the song of the
multitude
.
Lofty is the temple on the high hill, and
lovely is the goddess who sits in power therein.
Let us to the temple, oh! ye people. Let us bow
down before the goddess thereof, and bury our
faces in the sacred dust that lies at her footstool.
Let us put her feet upon our necks, and grow
great by reason of our abasement. Let us carry
the fatted lamb and the bleating kid, for sweet is
the savor of the burnt offering in her nostrils, and
she smiles when the flamen smites the heavy ox
in the forehead, and his dying blood besprinkles
her garments. To the temple on the hill, oh! ye
people,  to the lovely goddess who dwells
therein
.
Let us fly to her worship,  let us bring our
offerings,  the fatted lamb and the calf, and the
bleating kid,  let us twine about their necks the
flowers that are in season, and hang their brows
with clusters of the bleeding grape, that so we
may show our love for the goddess and the
priests, and our reverence for the white temple
that stands lofty upon the hill.
And when these words were ended, the
shouting
of the far-stretching multitude grew great
again, like the clamor of meeting winds and waters;
and they ran towards the white temple that rose
proudly on the high hill in the rosy light of the
morning  the swift leading the way, and the
strong rushing after, giving no heed to the cries
and the groans of the feeble and the young, whom
they overthrew and trampled in the fury of their
flight. Well did they know that the goddess
whom they sought would freely forgive the evil
which happened only from the overflowing of their
zeal in her worship. And many were the priests
that did homage for that people around the altars
of the goddess. And they prayed before her
presence, that she would come forth and lend grace
to her worshippers by the smile of her benignant
countenance. And the multitude brought great
store of gold and jewels, and with gifts of value
rewarded those who served them in this wise.
They brought bracelets for the arms of solid
gold, and bright drops of amber and of pearl
of jewels from the mine, and pale blue water-gems
from the deep  to hang around the necks, and
fasten in the ears, of that sacred priesthood. And
the holy men prayed steadfastly before the
goddess
for the multitude, and the goddess vouchsafed
to hear and to smile upon their prayers. And the
golden gates of the temple were thrown wide, and
the multitude shouted anew by reason of their
exceeding
joy; and, in the madness of their
devotion
,
many of them rushed towards the golden
entrance
,
ere the priest had yet veiled the glory
shining from within; but were driven back and
blinded by the streams of excessive light which
encountered them as they came. But soon the
gong sounded, which was the signal for the
goddess
to appear  and the guards that waited upon
the priests, with their golden lances, drove back
the impatient multitude from the path of the
procession
,
which was to move towards the great city,
that it might be blessed with the presence of the
goddess. Then, as the crowd gave way, came
forth the car of the sun, borne by the sacred ox,
whose horns, covered with gold, had each a
glorious
emerald shining thereon. And the rays of
that golden orb dazzled the eyes of those who too
confidently beheld it, and they threw themselves
upon the sands as it came, and the sacred ox
VOL. I. 9
pressed with heavy feet upon their necks. Then,
perched upon a crystal bough, and borne by a
lovely boy, whose long yellow hair floated in
trained luxuriance down his back, came forth the
milk-white pigeon, which bore the words of the
goddess to her distant worshippers; and the boy
that carried the pigeon was blind from his birth,
and it was the eyes of the sacred bird that guided
him in his progress; and sometimes, as he went,
the pigeon would fly off from the bough to bear
the words of the goddess to the priesthood, and
at such moments the boy stood still. Next came
one whose arms were bound to his side, and he was
clothed in yellow garments, and he bore upon his
head a crystal globe, which was the sign of
eternity
,
and within might be seen a butterfly with
folded wing, and this was the sign of immortality.
He was followed by an hundred others, bound and
attired like himself, and their bonds were a token
that they opposed not the will of the goddess;
and they bore the globe and butterfly by turns.
As they advanced from the temple, the mighty and
mixed multitude, which had fallen into sudden
silence when the golden sun came forth, now, as
suddenly, rose into clamorous rejoicing  the hills
shook in their shouting; and, from the vast circle
of the plain, the continued voices bore to the city
the glad tidings of the coming of the goddess.
Next came the slaves  an hundred ebon-dyed
slaves from Ethiopia  and they bore heavy
censers
of crystal; and ever and anon they scattered
sweet incense among the people. A girdle of
silver
cloth was wrapped about their loins, and they
wore a collar of silver, and a chain about the neck,
of silver also. A chosen band followed these, of
the youth dedicated to the priesthood; and they
wore no badges, and their garments were of the
coarsest woollen. After these came the sages, the
wisest and the most venerable among those who
had given themselves to the service of the
goddess
from their childhood. They wore long white
beards, and they were greatly reverenced among
the people by reason of their close neighborhood
to the goddess, and as they were the first to know
and to declare her irrevocable decrees. In their
secret abodes they had traced the history and
duties
of the heavenly bodies  had locked up the
niggard sciences in narrow cells, making them
servants, and denying them to that world which
they were intended to inform; but which, in its
inferior ignorance, might only have abused their
offices. To these succeeded the artificers, the
painters, the builders, the workers in fire, and the
secret properties of subtle minerals. Then came
the high priest, an experienced magician, than
whom the great city knew none more wise and
more in favor with the goddess. He stood upon
the platform, which was of solid brass, upon which
the throne of the goddess was raised. His robes
were of sable, but under them might be seen a
belt of purple and living fire. A serpent twined
itself about his arm, and sometimes lifted its green
head above the shoulder of the priest, whose hand
grasped it by the middle. As he advanced, his
presence announced that of the Deity, and was
acknowledged by an astounding shout from the
anxious multitude. The car of the goddess,
itself
a temple, now rolled heavily through the
brazen
entrance. It was drawn by the ponderous
behemoth
,
whose hoofs were coated with silver, and
whose forward step shook the solid earth over
which he came. Around the car, a troop of
lovely
priestesses danced on feet that spurned the air,
and their forms, flexible as light, melted and sank
away into continual and changing shapes of grace
and luxuriance; and tears of light gathered in the
eyes of the young men of the multitude, as they
looked upon their voluptuous involutions. These
closed the procession, and as they passed from the
brazen door of the temple, it shut, of itself, with a
startling and tremendous sound.
II.
But there was one of all that mighty and mixed
multitude, that felt not with the rest  that saw not
with their eyes, nor measured the things he saw
by their understandings. He came with them
from the city, for he dared not remain behind, in
that time of general jubilee; but his voice joined
not with the rest in swelling the clamor of
rejoicing
.
With slow steps and a sick spirit, he
followed
far behind, and his heart grew cold in his
bosom, as he beheld their wild impatience, and
witnessed
the headlong fury of their devotion. Their
cries stunned and troubled him, and the big tears
gathered upon his eye-lashes.
Beautiful, indeed, murmured Ipsistos to his
own heart,  beautiful, indeed, is the goddess,
lovely beyond the loveliness of woman, whom
the keen eye of the builder beheld, where she lay
buried in the bosom of the solid rock, whence his
nice hand and searching instrument of steel, gave
her release. With the fine touch of endowing art
he removed the rude dints of the heavy masses
which had lain so long upon her visage, and
brought back the light into her features, and the
9*
life which belongs only to expression, which had
been banished from them so long. In her temple
have the people raised her, and they behold in her
countenance nothing but perfection. In her they
see the embodied form of the universal and
diffusive
truth, and they claim for her the possession of
a perfect beauty. But to me all the sweet
conviction
,
which makes the heart confident in its hope,
and brings it peace, seems utterly denied. To
me she does not seem the true; neither, though she
is beautiful, can I esteem her the perfect beauty
which so immutable a goddess should be. She
wins not my heart when I behold her,  her charms
gather only upon mine eyes. With reluctant
hand I lay the first fruits upon her altars even as
I am bidden, but she knows that it is only as I am
bidden that I bring them, and though she smiles
upon others, she, methinks, hath a frown only and
ever for me. I pray to her for the blessing, and
she withholds it; yet wherefore should she
withhold
it when I pray only to be wise. Alas! I
inquire of these things in vain. The mists gather
more thickly around me, and when my brethren
cry loudest in rejoicing for the light which
ascendeth
,
then, upon my sight, the darkness falls
more heavily than ever. My soul is sorrowful
within me. The prayer that I make returns upon
me with the bitterness of rejection. Wherefore
should this be so? Wherefore, of all this
multitude
,
should I, alone, be joyless and voiceless?
My brothersthey come back from the temple,
having the song still upon their lips, and the smile
still in their hearts. My sisters enter with
laughter
the dwelling of my father, though poverty sits
upon the hearth, and weeps because of the cold.
The smile of the goddess hath blessed them, until
they forget the withered and wrinkled grandsire
whom they leave famishing at home. Alas! for
me, when I see the burnt offerings and the fruits
upon the altars of the goddess, I think not upon
her worship, but upon his want. Wherefore
should the goddess need as a testimony of our
homage the waste of her own fruits, which had
else cheered the heart and strengthened the limbs
of age and poverty. Wherefore  ah!
A terrible voice sounded in the ears of the
youth:
Ipsistos!
He shivered with terror as he looked up. The
car of the goddess was rolling onwards, and her
eye was fixed upon him with a glance that seemed
to search and freeze his soul. The voice of the
chief priest, a second time, reached his ears in low
accents, unheard by any but the youth.
Ipsistos! The eye of the goddess is upon
thee. She looks into thy heart. She beholds thy
discontent. Beware!
The youth sank upon his knees, and clasping
his hands above his head, he bowed his face to the
dust while the car passed onwards.
Alas! moaned the stricken youth as the
crowd rolled between him and the priest, I am
doomed!
And there he lay prostrate and desponding,
while the elated crowd, forgetting all
wretchedness
of their brother, felt only the triumph of that
power which permitted them to kneel!
III.
Ipsistos! said the sacred messenger of the
temple, touching the melancholy youth with the
spiral rod of his office,  thou art called.
Whither? demanded the youth.
To the temple! was the answer of authority.
I obey!  I follow thee! said the youth, with
fear and trembling.
It is well. Bermahdi awaits thee.
And Ipsistos prepared to follow as he was
commanded
,
and his heart was full of fears; for had he
not heard from Bermahdi that the goddess was a
jealous goddess  quick to see the falling off of
the worshipper at her altars, and terrible in her
punishments for every departure from the law as
it is written.
Fare thee well, my father, cried the youth,
I am commanded to leave thee for a while.
Who commands thee, my son? said the
venerable
man.
Bermahdi.
Ha!  Thou hast sinned, my son. Thou
hast sinned against the goddess.
I fear me.
And the old man trembled, and fell upon his
face, as the favorite of his eyes departed.
IV.
Ipsistos stood in the presence of Bermahdi, the
white-bearded, and his heart sank within him.
Wondrous was the chamber in which he stood,
strange were all the objects and aspects around
him. The roof of that chamber was vaulted like
the sky, and studded with a thousand stars. Clouds
hung aloft, now rising and now receding, and
from them, at moments, Ipsistos could see the keen
and cold eye of the goddess looking down upon
him. The vault was upborne by gigantic figures
of black marble, that moved around him in a
constant
circle; and, ever and anon, a heavy
instrument
of sounding metal told the progress of the
never stopping hours. A burning mirror stood
upright against the wall, and Ipsistos beheld
within
it the constant progress of things as they
concerned
the people of the goddess. And he saw
himself within it, even he, Ipsistos, but the figure
paused not, but disappeared at the waving of the
hand of Bermahdi. The chief priest sat before a
table of red porphyry, on which the characters and
signs of the seasons were inscribed. Instruments
of strange form, and to him, unknown uses, lay
upon the table. Bermahdi was a magician of
unbounded wisdom, and his studies were as
various
as the faces of the stars of heaven. He seemed,
even then, to be toiling in the divine arts of
astrology
;
and when Ipsistos regarded his stern but
venerable aspect, and saw the strange instruments
around him, and beheld the books in languages
unknown, gathered with great pains and at
wondrous
cost from the remotest nations,  his awe,
mingling with the apprehensions which his soul
felt at the summons of the sacred messenger,
became
a sort of terror, and he trembled in the
presence
of the holy man.
Ipsistos! said Bermahdi, approach!
And as the youth drew nigh to the table an
hundred serpents sprang forward, with hissing fury
and open jaws, ready to devour the intruder; but,
at the word of Bermahdi, they crawled back to
the slimy baskets where they had lain coiled in
sleep, and offered no farther interruption to his
approach
.
Ipsistos! thou had'st been doomed but for
thy youth. Thou art poor and feeble, else thou
had'st perished. Had'st thou been high among
the people,  high of birth and fortune,  this
night thou had'st fed the sacred serpents of the
goddess, whom, in thy secret thoughts, thou hast
contemned. Wherefore is this madness, Ipsistos?
Thy brothers are devout worshippers,  they come
with glad hearts and full hands to the temple,
they bend with reverence before the altar,  they
heed the words of the goddess, and question not
her laws. But thou dost not, Ipsistos. In thy vain
sould thou hast asked  `why is this?' With thy
shallow understanding, thou wouldst judge the
decrees which are written for the world. Why
dost thou not believe, and trust, and do homage
like thy brothers?
Alas! father! wherefore? It is from thee
that I would have the answer. Thou art the
favored of the goddess,  I pray thee implore
her that she tell me, why I am other in spirit than
my brothers?
The holy man frowned gloomily as he listened
to these words of the unhappy youth.
What, boy!  wouldst thou demand of the
goddess, why is this, and wherefore is that. I tell
thee that thy presumption prays a sudden
judgment
upon thee. Thy vain thoughts are working
out thy doom.
Be merciful, father. I would not offend with
my presumption. I would school my heart unto
humility. It is to know the right only that I ask
to know at all. My prayer is for wisdom only.
Thy prayer is insolent, boy. What! shall
we be all Magi. Shall wisdom be a thing to cast
in equal lots,  shall we demand of the goddess
to be other than we are. Foolish and audacious
boy. Thou must learn to obey, ere thou art wise
to trust those who are the born counsellors of the
land,  who have authority for judgment from the
goddess. Hast thou lived so long, and art thou
still ignorant of her power? Hast thou seen
nothing
to shew to thee the might which she has,
beyond
that of thee and all thy people, and which
she puts forth daily through the hands of those
who tend upon her altars? Hast thou not listened
to her oracles? Does she not foretell the plague
which kills, the tempest which desolates, the ruler
of the city who shall best serve its interests, the
coming of the enemy whom ye fear? Does not
her power dissipate the enemy, stay the plague,
repair the city, provide the ruler? Is thy people
prosperous or not?
Alas! father, poverty sits upon the hearth of
my sire, and the flesh is shrivelled upon his aged
limbs. The city is prosperous, but my father
lacks bread for his hunger, and he hath no raiment
against the cold.
And what of this, idle boy. What is the
pleasure or the life of one, or even of a thousand,
in consideration of this great argument. Thy life
is but a span at best, and something must end it.
The goddess that gives thee life, hath surely a
right to prescribe its laws, its limits, and its
vicissitudes
.
Believe this, and thy father suffers little;
but even this pretence shall be denied thee for
complaint. Thou shalt carry from the temple this
night the food which shall make him strong, and
the garments which shall bring the blood back
into his aged limbs. Will that content thee?
I will bless thee for it, father.
And be true and joyful in thy worship of the
goddess?
VOL. I. 10
I will strive  with all my soul and with all my
strength, I will strive, replied Ipsistos.
Thou shalt, or it shall be worse for thee. Lo!
Here shalt thou see the power of the goddess.
Thou shalt behold sights never yet vouchsafed to
thy people. Look! What seest thou?
And, as he spake, the magician uttered a word
of power, and the brooding cloud rolled away
from overhead, and the sun hung his broad and
burning shield above the eyes of Ipsistos, though,
it was then the mid hour of the night, so that they
were confounded and darkened by the blaze. And
when he looked again, the cold pale moon was
shining in its place.
Thou hast seen the mansions of the sun and
moon,  they are ever present to the goddess, and
visible at her command. Some of her power she
will now confer, even upon thee, that thou may'st
no longer doubt of her worship. Grasp me that
wand of ebony which thou seest upon the edge of
yon fountain.
The youth did so, and of a sudden it became a
serpent in his grasp. He flung it to the ground,
and it once more became a wand of ebony.
Thou seest; but that is not all. Thou shalt
cross unharmed upon those fiery bars over which
it is written that every devotee should go. But
first put off thy sandals, and put on these sacred
shoes which have been hallowed upon the altar of
the goddess.
The youth put on the shoes as he was directed,
and at the same instant a part of the wall opened
before him, and he beheld a bridge of fire-bars
which spanned a cavernous hollow of vast extent,
in which he could see nothing, but from which
there came a continual roaring like the evening
anthem of the sea. The youth shrank back from
the trial, but Bermahdi encouraged him.
Fear nothing! he said,  For thou wearest
sandals which have been hallowed by the
goddess
.
A voice, soft but clear, and but melodious,
reached his ears an instant after, which repeated
the words of encouragement.
Fear nothing, Ipsistos. There is nought to
harm thee!
What voice is that! cried Bermahdi, with
looks of unfeigned astonishment.
Was it not the voice of the goddess? said
Ipsistos,  methought it was she who spoke.
Ay, it was,  it must have been! cried
Bermahdi,  it must have been the goddess.
Thou seest, my son, that she loves thee. Fear
nothing.
Fear nothing, Ipsistos, said the gentle voice
once more.
And the heart of Ipsistos was full of joy as he
heard it, but the countenance of Bermahdi was
troubled. The youth felt tears of pleasure steal
out upon his cheek, for the tones of that sweet
speaker sunk like music and peace into his heart.
He feared no longer, Boldly he advanced upon
the blazing bars, which, to his great wonder, gave
out no heat. And when he had passed over the
bridge to the opposite side of the cavern, he stood
in the presence of the goddess. But her looks
were lovely no longer. Anger blazed in her eyes,
and her lips were distorted by reason of the
passion
within her breast.
This is strange, said Bermahdi,  strange
that she should frown upon thee, Ipsistos, when
thou hast passed through the first trial of the
noviciate
.
Thou wilt become a noviciate, my son.
Wherefore, father?
See'st thou not that she frowns upon thee?
The youth was silent.
Ha! dost thou refuse? cried Bermahdi.
No, no  I refuse not  but suffer me to think
upon it, my father. I am not yet worthy  I
would meditate upon the wonders I have seen.
Thou shalt! Go now in safety. The path
is clear. Nothing shall harm thee on thy way.
But see that thou hast early thought upon this, my
son. Thou hast thought, already, too much or too
little, and thy error must be amended.
Remember
!
the eyes of the goddess are upon thee.
Again the gentle voice whispered in his ears.
Fear nothing, Ipsistos; and when he looked
upon the statue of the goddess, her features were
convulsed with anger. A stream of fire seemed
to issue from her eyes, and with a shivering fear
that ran through all his veins like a sudden ague,
the youth fled from her terrific presence.
V.
He fled, but the gentle voice still lingered in his
ears, and as he left the portals of the temple, its
tones of encouragement were repeated.
Fear nothing, Ipsistos. I am she whom in thy
secret soul thou lovest; and I am powerful to
protect
thee. Let the tyrant rage; he shall not
prevail
against thy thought, nor against the true
worship
which is already living in thy spirit. He may
cast thee into a dungeon  he may load thee with
chains  in his brute anger he may buffet thee,
and with his keen thong he may cover thee with
10*
stripes; but of a surety shalt thou live through
all, and glorious shall be thy triumph in the end.
Fear nothing, Ipsistos  for, so long as thou
keepest
my voice in thy ears, so long shalt thou live,
and so sure shall be thy great victory over thy
enemy. Thou shalt tread upon his neck,
Ipsistos
.
And the youth grew bold to speak to the voice
as he hearkened to these grateful words, and he
said
And how, oh, sweetest whisper of the night
thou that stealest upon mine ear like a music from
heaven, and sinkest, blessing, into my heart like a
balmy food thereof;  how am I to keep thee
forever
nigh to me? Tell me, that I may not lose
thee.
By keeping me ever in thy heart, as thou dost
now. By seeking me as thou hast ever done!
How! blessed voice  have I ever sought
thee before, when, until this hour, mine ears
remember
not to have heard thee.
Thine ear hath not heard me, Ipsistos, but day
and night, even from the hour of thy birth, have I
spoken to thy heart. Thou hast truly called me a
music from heaven, and a balmy food thereof. I
am both  for I am that principle without which
no music could be such in the ears of the good,
and no food could give nourishment.
What art thou! demanded the trembling
youth.
Truth! Doth not thy own heart teach
thee? was the answer.
Alas  but it did not! replied Ipsistos.
Of a surety it did, Ipsistos, from the first
moment
when thou felt'st that thou could'st not love
the creature which thy people worship with a wild
and headlong idolatry. Thou could'st not think
her beautiful, because, in thy own heart, thou
beheld'st a yet lovelier image.
And shall I see thee with mine eyes, oh, thou,
whom my soul worships, cried the youth,
sinking
on his knees, and lifting his hands together, as
if the object of his adoration stood even then
unveiled
before him.
Yea, thou mayst if thou so wishest it; but I
warn thee, Ipsistos, in the hour that thou
regardest
me with thy human eyes  in that hour shalt
thou surely die. Art thou ready?
Prostrate in the dim night, the youth sunk down
in silence. But in silence he remained not long.
Give me to behold thee, he cried aloud to
the voice  Give me to look upon the blessed
and beautiful features of that divine being who is
in my lifted heart, and death shall be welcome.
Gladly will I embrace it, for thy sake, sweetest and
loveliest of the dreams that have won me from
sleep, and made life, itself, a dream.
Thou art bold, now, Ipsistos; but when death
looks upon thee with his grim aspect, and claims
thee for his own
Even then will I be bold! cried the
undaunted
youth.
When thou feel'st his steely grasp upon thy
shoulder!
I will laugh upon him  I will defy him with
a song in thy praise.
When he drags thee to the roaring blaze, and
the burning fagots crackle and hiss around
thee!
Ha!  must it, then, be so! cried the youth,
shuddering, and covering his face with his hands.
Perhaps! said the voice. Wilt thou not
then shrink from thy faith? Wilt thou not then
forswear me? Wilt thou not deny that thou
hast seen my face, and hearkened to my counsel,
as thou dost now? Death is terrible, Ipsistos!
I will not! Though death be terrible, I will
not shrink from the danger  I will not deny thee,
nor forget the faith which I have pledged thee, and
which I pledge thee here.
And yet 'twere pity, Ipsistos, that thy youth
should perish thus. Think of thy old grandsire.
Ah!
Thy brothers and thy sisters.
Alas! they need me not. Did they love me,
and need me more, I were less bold, perchance, in
this encounter. My grandsire hath not many days
of life, and even were I gone from him, but little
were his loss therein. The promise which thou
makest me, moves me more than these fears and
losses which thou describest unto me. Give me to
look upon thy divine presence, and see the
beauties
which are there, and I am ready for the stake,
and for the cruel executioner. Tell me, shall I
not behold thee now?
Not yet! cried the voice. Thou could'st
not see me now, even if thou would'st, and I were
willing to suffer thee. There are scales upon thine
eyes, which must first fall off. There is yet a
fetter
upon thy thought which must be broken; and
thou hast learned lessons in thy mind, which must
be unlearned, ere thou can'st behold me. Yet
shall I not be utterly unseen of thee. Even now,
if thou lookest keenly, thou may'st behold a faint
shadow of my person beside thee, and, as thou
strivest to behold me and hearkenest to my voice,
my features shall grow clear unto thine eyes,  thy
flesh to my touch,  thy soul shall be filled with
my spirit. But I warn thee, in that time thou
diest. Thy danger begins with thy knowledge,
and in the moment of thy greatest victory, shalt
thou perish.
And the youth gazed as he was bidden, and a
shadowy form passed beside him, and the stars
yielded in their places, and all things swam
before
his sense. When he looked again, the shadow
and the voice were gone.
VI.
I bring thee food, my father, said Ipsistos;
and he placed before the aged man the viands
which had been given him by the high priest of
the temple.
Ha! my son,  be thou blessed among the
sons of men, as thou art blest and beloved by thy
sire. Whence got'st thou these meats  this
bread, and the luscious grapes which thou puttest
before me.
From Bermahdi.
From Bermahdi!  Blessed be Bermahdi
blessed be the holy temple  forever honored
the goddess therein.
And the aged man kneeled as he said these
words, and the young women and the sons kneeled
also, all but Ipsistos.
How, my son,  wherefore kneelest thou not
with us?  would'st thou withhold thy blessings
and thy thanks?
My thanks have been already given, my
father
.
I have spoken with Bermahdi in the
temple
.
In the temple!  Ha! have I been so
blessed
in my old age as to behold a son of mine who
hath had admittance to the temple of the goddess.
Let me look upon thee,  let me kneel to thee, my
son, for of a truth the goddess hath greatly
favored
thee.
Kneel not to me,  look not upon me, father,
but eat of the meats sent thee by Bermahdi. I
am blind, and weak, and not worthy of thy regard.
But thou saw'st the wondrous things of the
temple, my son,  the giants which are there
fettered
beneath the feet of the goddess,  the
sacred
serpent that speaks at her bidding,  the holy
owl of counsel, and the ape, the ox, the
emeralds
I saw many things, my father, of which I
took little heed.
Little heed, my son,  little heed! What
meanest thou? Thou took'st little heed of what
thou saw'st in the temple! What! thou wast
frightened; the wonders overcame thee? Thou
wert blinded and astonished by the blaze. It was
enough, my son, to confound thee. It is my
wonder how thou saw'st any thing,  how thou
cam'st alive from that glorious presence. But the
goddess strengthens whom she loves, and by these
tokens, Ipsistos, thou art beloved of the goddess.
Grant it be so,  grant it be,  then would my
gray hairs go down to the grave in peace.
But far other was the prayer in the heart of
Ipsistos
,
and he turned away in silence from the
admiring
gaze which the doting old man fixed upon
him. And the brothers and sisters murmured
among themselves, and marvelled much at the
favor of the goddess towards Ipsistos. And they
said, Wherefore is this favor of Bermahdi?
Have we not been the first ever to bring our
offerings
to the temple? Though they were mean, yet
we brought of the best in our store; and our
prayers
and songs were the loudest in the presence of
the goddess. And was not Ipsistos a loiterer by
the way-side, and when did he raise voice or song
in honor of the temple? The goddess hath surely
meant, for one of us, the favor which Bermahdi
hath so blindly bestowed on him.
And what said Bermahdi to thee, my son?
demanded the grandsire.
He would have me in the service of the
goddess
,
replied Ipsistos.
Ha! thou dost not say it! cried the
rejoicing
father.
He! a servant in the temple! cried the
eldest
of the brothers.  Ha! ha! ha! This is
a folly, if not worse. Thou speak'st idly,
Ipsistos
,
I trust thou dost not wilfully declare thy
falsehood.
I speak the truth only, my brother, meekly
replied Ipsistos.
I will not believe it, cried the rest.
Wherefore should they make thee a servant in
the temple. What hast thou,  what art thou?
Thou art mad, Ipsistos. Thou art poor, and what
is thy father? Made he not bricks for the city,
even for those who are now living and can declare
his craft; and what is thy craft, but the same,
Ipsistos
,
which thou art only too idle to follow.
True, true, Ipsistos,  thou must surely err in
this, cried the old man, sorrowfully.
Wherefore
should Bermahdi choose thee to serve in the
temple. Thy brothers speak but reason;  and
yet, my children, Ipsistos hath never yet told me
other than the truth.
VOL. I. 11
And it is the truth only which I tell thee now,
my father. Bermahdi hath commanded me to
serve in the temple, in season to become a priest.
A priest! cried the elder brother in
amazement
.
A priest! cried they all, in wonder at the
apparent madness or gross presumption of the
youth.
Thou a priest! said the elder brother.
What should make thee a priest, when thy
awkward hands let fall the garlands ere they reach
the altar.
Thou a priest! exclaimed the eldest sister.
How would thy long arms look in the holy
garments?  they would drag about thy heels like
a great mill-sack.
Only to think, said the younger sister, the
favorite of Ipsistos, only to think of making
thee a priest, Ipsistos, when I have ridden upon
thy shoulders a thousand times.
Nay, flout not thy brother, my children  ye
make me sad as I behold his sorrows. Flout him
not, though, in truth, my son, thy story is most
strange.
Yet true, my father. Do not these fruits speak
for me? They are from the altar of the temple.
This could not be denied. The brothers and
sisters of the youth had seen them carried to the
temple. And the old man marvelled much upon
the mystery; he could not yet be satisfied of his
son's truth, for when had the son of a maker of
brick, been called to such sacred office.
Meanwhile
,
a grievous suspicion of Ipsistos grew in
the hearts of his brethren. And they whispered
among themselves, and their evil thought came to
the ears of the father.
He hath stolen these things from the altar of
the goddess. Of a truth he hath committed
sacrilege
.
And with these words the aged man dashed
from his lips the untasted viands, and his jaws
were distended with the horror of the thought.
What hast thou done, Ipsistos? My son, my
best beloved, wherefore hast thou done this
thing?
They wrong me, my father, for, of a truth, I
am not guilty of this base crime. The fruits
were given to me, for thee, by the hands of
Bermahdi
.
Swear it, by the temple and the goddess!
and I will believe thee, said the father.
It will not then be a greater truth than it is
now, my father. Believe me, as I tell thee, but I
will not swear; and he rushed from the
dwelling
as he spoke these words.
He is guilty! cried the brothers with joy,
but the old man hung his head in shame.
Alas! he cried, wherefore was I born to
this dishonor.
And the sons hurried away to the chief priest,
to declare the theft and to restore the consecrated
fruits; but the old man lay upon his face at the
door of his habitation, and would not be
comforted
.
VII.
And ye say, said Bermahdi, to the brethren
of Ipsistos, ye say that your brother is no true
servant of the goddess  that he bows not in
reverence
at her altars  that he gives not his soul
with the fruits which he offers  that he loves not
her high places, nor the holy priesthood that
minister
before her?
Of a truth, we say it, replied the envious
brethren.
Ye are wrong, answered to them the high
priest, ye know not the heart of your brother.
What though he worship in another fashion from
ye, still is he a devout worshipper. I have seen
into his soul, my children; it is no less pure than
yours. The goddess hath chosen him for her
altars
,
and ye are no less honored in her choice than
is he. Hence was her gift to him, for thy
grand-sire
,
of the fruits and meats which he carried home
to your habitation. Do him no injustice,
therefore
,
by your ungentle thoughts, for truly do I
believe
him honest. Yet, I would not, that ye should
hold me unnoteful of your zeal. Ye shall give it
employment. See that Ipsistos lacks not, nor falls
short, in his flow of service. If ye deem him
laggard
if ye notice any falling off in his outward
devotions, though it may import no loss of love
within  yet bring me true report of his
backslidings
,
that I may counsel him providently, and
tutor
him unto the good work which is ready for his
hands. And, as ye have so fully shown your zeal
for the altars of the goddess, ye shall have like
share with your brother of the fruits therefrom.
Take ye, and eat, and bear ye home to your
grandsire, of the fruits which remain unconsumed.
And let this be a sign unto ye, that ye are all the
care of the goddess, and your house henceforward
shall be the abiding place of blessing and
abundance
.
Go ye now  remember well what I have
11*
spoken in your ears touching the devotion of
Ipsistos
,
and come to me and reveal in secret what
ye may misdeem of his thoughts and misdoing;
for though I believe not that your brother is
erring
,
yet the best of us falter in our walks of duty,
and the strongest sink at times under a weakness
of sinew which should make them sorrowful and
ashamed. Go now, and the blessing of the
goddess
be upon ye.
And the brethren of Ipsistos went away, with
hearts of rejoicing and with hands of plenty; and
they rejoiced not more because of the favor of the
goddess than of the charge which had been given
them to be watchful of the doings of their brother.
And in their hearts they abused the counsels of
the holy Bermahdi, for, whereas, he had given it
in charge to them to report on the backslidings of
Ipsistos that he might be providently led back into
the fold of the temple, and they took his words as
a direction to find evil in his wanderings, and to
prove the flaws in all his performances. And
those that Bermahdi had named as zealous for the
goddess, grew to be zealous spies upon the failings
of their brother; and in their hearts they said
Bermahdi will punish Ipsistos if he goes aside
from the path leading to the temple. He means
not to counsel but to condemn, for is not the
goddess
a jealous goddess, and does not her breath
destroy the offender, though it be a sin of his
ignorance
only, and his first sin. Of a surety will
she destroy this brother, whose pride of heart lifts
him above us, and who, in a vain conceit of soul,
thinks to be wiser than his father. Well  he
shall not be missed when Bermahdi calls for the
victim.
Thus communing, they returned to the dwelling
of their father, and their hearts were filled with
wrath when they found that their grandsire now
loved Ipsistos more than before, and took but
little
heed of the abundance of fruits which they had
brought with them from the temple. And he called
upon them to rejoice with him, and to implore
blessings
upon their brother, saying
Verily, Ipsistos, my son, thou art my best
beloved
,
and the favorite of the goddess. Join with
me, my children, and give praise to your brother;
for he hath cheered our hearth with the blessings
of heaven, and hath smoothed my passage to the
tomb. Blessed of the goddess, Ipsistos, be thou
also the blessed of thy father and thy brethren.
And the brothers murmured among themselves,
and, more than ever, they hated him by reason of
the exceeding love of their father. All hated him
but the young maiden, his sister, the youngest of
all, whose name was Damaina; and she flung
herself
upon the neck of Ipsistos, and called him her
dear brother, and shed tears of joy and reverence
upon his neck. And the brothers turned from
beholding
her, and they spake together apart, and
they asked of each other how best they should obey
the commands of Bermahdi, and seek out the
backslidings
of Ipsistos.
VIII.
But the youth heeded not their doings, nor
imagined
the feelings in their hearts. In his own a
sweet sadness prevailed, a shadow from his
searching
thought, that moved over strangest places,
and wandered into worlds far beyond his arm.
His life strayed afar from the accustomed paths of
his boyhood; for the voice was ever in his ears,
the voice whose tones were a perfect melody
which he might not resist,  and they led him
away from the crowded places, and they tempted
him to fields which had ever been forbid. In the
presence of his brethren he had little comfort, and
his mood found no fellowship among those who
had once given him most sweet society. With
sad eyes, but without complaint, did his grandsire
behold the shadow that was upon the youth, and
the friends of his boyhood, and his young sister
Damaina, the best beloved of all, reproached him
loudly for his desertion. But Ipsistos only sighed
to them in return; and he walked apart to hide
the tears which were in his eyes, though his heart
was softened only with a becoming joy.
They chafe with me now, he said to himself
in musing, but will they chafe with me when I
bring them to a sight of her whom my soul loveth;
when they look upon the divine light of her eyes,
and feel the blessed tones of her voice sink like a
balm from heaven into their hearts.
And a holy pride filled his bosom as he thought
that he should bring those who loved him to such
superior enjoyment. And he followed the voice;
and came to a mighty wood which was dusky with
gigantic forms, each having a double shadow.
And he wandered away among the shadows 'till
they grew like a bannered army around him, and
he laid himself down at their feet, and they hung
above him, and he thought unutterable things.
But the thoughts gave him pain at length, for they
came like pictures that pass rapidly in the
uncertain
light before the eye. And he failed to know
them or perceive their offices. Vainly did he
strive to fix them with his revolving mind; but
they fled from him, looking behind them as they
fled, and showing him glimpses of their beguiling
features. Through the dim mazes of his mind
he struggled to trace their flight, but others came
between, and so he was confounded; and he
prayed
for counsel and help from the voice, and even
as he prayed he slept.
IX.
And the sleep of the youth was troubled, and
strange visions prevailed in his slumbers. A
thousand
streaming lights, that seemed half girt with a
drapery of cloud, danced around him in the
closing
void. Then, as they departed, mighty
shadows
rose even from the earth at his feet, and they
floated away from before his sight, only to give
place to other and mightier shadows yet. These
came in sable and timed array,  a gorgeous
company
of trooping forms, having strange shapes
that yielded to the light; and they bore solemn
banners that went trailing through the sky. Then,
a mightier form than all the rest,  a shadowless
form, full of light that yet gave none forth,
came following after, and Ipsistos saw that it wore
a crown upon its head, and yet the face beneath
it was hidden from his straining gaze. From the
midst of the crown rose a broad tongue of flame,
that waved to and fro among the clouds by reason
of the rapid motion of the shadow. And the
shadow stood still when it hung above the spot
where the youth was sleeping, and the tongue of
fire which was upon the crown ceased to move in
the wind. And, even as he looked, Ipsistos
beheld
a sheet of flame pass out from the tongue,
and it fell from cloud to cloud, and it parted them
all, and it rested upon his own forehead. And at
the same moment the mighty shadows which had
hung around him, with brows of dusk and
threatening
,
took to flight with a rushing noise, and the
youth could hear them scream while they flew, as
if pursued by a mighty terror. And a bright
light, like the bursting of a meteor, fell around
him, and he heard a voice like that which had
counselled him before, louder and more piercing
but not less musical, that stopt his ascending
spirit
,
and riveted his wandering thought.
Arise, Ipsistos, thou art called unto thy office.
Thy sleep is over. The light is around thee,
the promise of the day. Tarry not, but come.
And a shivering fell upon the sleeper as he
heard these warning accents, and marvelled at the
increased power of the voice: and his heart sunk
within him, not as he felt unwillingness to serve as
he was bidden, but because he despaired of doing
his service fitly, by reason of his inability. And
he said to himself as he awakened,
Now, wherefore should I be chosen for this
mighty work? Am I not the son of the
brick-maker
,
is not my extraction mean, and, of a
certainty, I have not been taught in the mysteries
of the college, nor in the divine languages of past
ages? I am but mocked with this sweet delusion,
I do but cheat myself with the vanities of mine
own heart.
And the voice came to his ears again from
among the pale groves, that lay behind him in the
silence of their birth-hour. And the voice was
sweeter in his ears than ever, and it was strong
also. And it cheered him with words of
encouragement
.
Wherefore should'st thou doubt of thy own
fitness for the work of her whom thou lovest? I
tell thee, Ipsistos, that the servant is honored by
the service, and the work of truth takes no honor
from the proudest and the wealthiest,  nay, not
even from the wisest in the land. Thy humility
is becoming in thee, and is the best wisdom thou
canst bring to my service. But thou must be bold
too, and confident,  humble, because thou well
knowest how little is thy knowledge in respect to
truth,  bold, as it is thy purpose to have
knowledge
of the truth only. Come to me in this
valley
of shadow,  build here thy altars; and
hither
bring the constant offering of thy heart, not of
thy hands. Come.
And the voice melted away in his ears, and the
youth heard nothing but the murmuring of the
wind as it streamed upon its way among the
branches of the bending lindens. But he rose as
he was bidden, and went forward to the silent
dwelling of the shade from whence the sounds had
arisen. And, as his feet faltered, by reason of his
uncertainty, the voice whispered him on his true
path, and strengthened him to come.
X.
And Ipsistos sought the pale groves where the
voice dwelt, and he entered them with fear and
trembling. A mystery hung over them like that
which hangs above the mansion in the dreams
and darkness of the night. And a sound, like
VOL. I. 12
that of a complaining water, that keeps a
ceaseless
travel through all hours, and murmurs as it
has no rest, filled the groves; and he heard no
other sound. And he prayed that he might
hearken
to the voice again; and it fell upon his ears
like a string smitten by the winds at a far distance;
and the youth lay upon his face and trembled, for
the words of the voice had no meaning to his ears.
But while he lay upon the earth, and moaned in
his grief, he felt the breathing of a warm air
around him; and when he looked up, lo! a bright
eye was gazing down upon him from the leaves of
the tree above his head. And he saw nothing but
the eye; but he straightway knew it for the eye of
the voice whose blessed sounds had sunk so deeply
into his heart; and he murmured a fond prayer of
thanksgiving for the blessing which had been
vouchsafed him, even according to the promise of
the voice in his behalf. Thou shalt not see me,
thou canst not see me, even if thou wouldst and
I were willing,  until the scales have fallen from
thine eyes, and until thou hast unlearned much
which stands in the way of thy knowledge now;
but  and with glad heart, did he remember the
promise of the voice  when thou givest up thy
whole soul in my service, then shall my features
come out before thee. And the youth prayed
fervently for the consummation of the blessed
promise
,
for his heart was full of the beauty of the
eye which looked down upon him from the cloud,
and with the sweetness of that melodious voice
which had cheered him and led him on his
rightful
path. And, even where he stood, did he build
an altar to the voice and the eye, and morning and
evening did he steal away from the press of the
city to offer up his homage to the divine spirit
which he so much loved. And the more bright
did the eye appear unto his eyes, and the more
musical the voice to his heart, so, in the like
degree
,
did the countenance of the goddess
worshipped
by his people, put on frowns. And he now
saw what he had not seen before, that in her face
were the shadows of many passions of evil which
belonged to men. Was not her eye fixed upon
him with hate, and did she not smile upon those
whom he well knew to be base and unworthy, as
they brought her rich offerings which the hand of
violence had despoiled from the weak, and the arts
of the cunning had inveigled and taken from the
confiding. And can the goddess be true?
asked
Ipsistos of himself, whose judgments tally not
with justice. Shall she smile upon the wrong doer,
and share of the spoil which comes of the wrong.
Is mere power, which the wild colt hath in his
madness,  a power to destroy,  the sign of the
perfect goddess? Shall my heart receive her
laws for truth, and grow fond of her smile, when
it approves of violence, and the sin that spoils and
strikes? And the voice in his heart answered
No; and with free footsteps he hurried away
at evening to his lonely worship in the forest; and
while he prayed, a halo of light gathered about
his brow, and, looking upward, he beheld the
perfect
face of the benign and blessing spirit which
he sought.
XI.
He saw the pefect face, and never did the
vision
of his dreams, or the imaginings of his hopes,
seem half so divine or beautiful. The face looked
forth from a cloud, the edges of which were
transparent
with a golden light; and as the lips opened
to speak, the words came forth in visible rays,
and the sounds fell upon his heart in melody, and
the air blossomed with odor. And the light from
her lips fell upon his own, and his soul was lifted
into the highest hope, when he heard the tones of
his own voice, and felt that they were like hers.
And he gave praises aloud to the divine spirit that
looked down upon him, and he spake in song,
even in the holy song of the prophets who had
perished for the truth. And the voice told him
that his song was sweet in her ears, and worthy of
her altars. Till the night cloud settled down upon
the pale groves where he worshipped, did Ipsistos
linger in the place which became so holy to his
heart; and wings lifted his feet that night when
he returned to the humble dwelling of his father.
Wings lifted his feet, for he had a divine
purpose
in his heart.
XII.
What! he exclaimed, shall my eyes only
look upon this gracious presence? Shall this
blessing come to me only? Is there none worthy
to share with me this joy,  to partake with me
of this glorious truth,  to live with me in the
triumph
which is promised me, and which must be
mine!
And he mused thus by the hearth of his aged
grandsire, and he saw not that the old man slept
in his seat. Then came to him Damaina, the best
beloved of all his sisters, and she threw herself
around his neck, and she said to him,
12*
See, our grandsire sleepeth, Ipsistos,  he will
fall from his chair,  help me to bear him to his
couch.
And in his heart an instant voice cried,
Thou art she who shall share with me this
blessing,  even thou, my gentlest Damaina; for
thy heart is pure, and thy soul loveth the truth,
and thou hast reverence for the aged, and
clamorest
not in the high places with the presumption of
ignorance. Thou art worthy of this joy,
Damaina
.
It shall be thine.
And he lifted his sleeping grandsire to his couch
of straw, and that night he said nothing to the
young maiden. But when the gray dawn had
risen to his summits in the east, then did Ipsistos
come to the chamber of the maiden, and he cried
to her with a persuasive voice, and these were his
words,
Come forth, Damaina, my beloved. I would
have thee go with me. Now, while the day is
young, and the hours are blessed with the vigor
of a night's repose, go forth with me into the forest.
I will show thee some precious flowers, and thine
eyes shall behold a loveliness which thou hast never
seen before!
And the maiden came forth with the step that
dances to the music of a gentle heart, and a
youthful
but pure fancy.
Whither dost thou lead me, my brother? But
I care not whither. I know thy walks must be the
loveliest, for well I know how much thou seekest
the things which are so. Lead me, then, my
brother
,
I will joy in the flowers which give thee
joy; and my heart shall drink of the same sweets
with thine.
And Ipsistos rejoiced greatly because of the
fondness of the maiden.
If she will love the things which I love, he
mused to his own soul, she will soon see the
glories which delight mine eye.
And he led her to the pale groves where he
worshipped
;
and he shewed her the simple temple
which his hands had built. And he bowed
himself
before the temple, and he called upon the
maiden to do likewise.
Wherefore, my brother? asked Damaina.
It is the temple of the true goddess, my sister.
I have beheld her divine presence even among
these trees. She will be with me anon.
But the maiden trembled, and forebore to kneel
with her brother, by whose words her soul was
confounded.
What altar is this for the goddess,  what
true goddess is this of whom thou speakest,
Ipsistos
?
She who is truth,  whom the truth alone
makes beautiful,  makes strong,  makes
immortal
.
Ha! my brother,  but these words of thine
are strange to mine ears. Have we not long
worshipped
this goddess? Stands not her white
temple
upon the high hill that looks down upon the
city of our fathers.
No! her temple is in the white heart! It is
with you and with me, my sister, if we blind not
ourselves wilfully, and refuse not to yield our
hearts to the truth. Stay,  hear you not her
voice?
I hear nothing, my brother, but a faint
murmur
as of a wind that sighs among the decaying
trees.
It is her voice! Kneel with me, dearest sister,
and the melody shall sink into your heart.
But Damaina did not then kneel by reason of
her great surprise. But Ipsistos knelt, and he
prayed with a passionate plea that the sweet voice
should fill the ears of the sister whom he loved.
And when the maiden heard his prayer, her heart
strove within her; and she mused to herself, and
said,
Surely this brother loves me,  surely he is
wise and good;  and even while he prayed she
sank down on the turf beside him, and her prayers
were joined with his. And the sound, which was
but a murmur in her ears before, now took a shape
of music,  faint at first as the first plainings of
the harp troubled by the rising wind, but
gathering
into fulness at last, and swelling into
expression
that will not be restrained. The heart of the
maiden trembled within her, but it was with a
new-born
joy, and not with any fear, that it trembled;
and she began to love the voice with a love like
that of Ipsistos, though, to this time, she had no
knowledge of the blessed spirit which he had seen,
save by the gentle tones with which she had
spoken
to her ears. Yet, all the while that she
prayed
beside her brother, the face was looking down
upon them both, though the maiden beheld it not.
And the eyes of Ipsistos were opened, and he
beheld
the form of the true goddess, even as she had
promised that he should behold her. And she
smiled upon him, so that he felt the wings
growing
upon his shoulders, but her words were grave
in his ears.
Thy prayer is granted thee, Ipsistos,  thou
hast seen me according to the desire of thy heart.
But thy hour is at hand, my son,  thou hast but
little time to live.
And the youth bowed his face to the earth, and
his heart spoke in prayer.
Art thou ready, Ipsistos? The death-angel
will demand thee soon.
And the youth replied sadly, but without
faltering
,
Joy of divine love, I am ready.
And the lovely image faded away in a sweet
smile from his sight, and the music died away
among the pale groves; and the two, Ipsistos and
Damaina, rose from the place where they had
worshipped; and their souls were lifted into thought,
so that neither spoke as they took their way, with
slow feet, back to the habitation of their father.
Yet the words of the voice to Ipsistos came not
to the ears of Damaina, neither did his lips reveal
to her the doom which awaited him.
XIII.
And towards evening the two went again to the
place of their secret worship. But this time they
went not in secret. Eyes were upon them that
regarded
not the object of their devotion, and hearts
were busy to find evil in the things which their
hearts desired. The brethren to whom Bermahdi
had given it in charge to heed the backslidings of
Ipsistos, followed with cautious footsteps upon his
path, and beheld the place where he worshipped.
And they took heed that he bent himself down
before
the altar which his own hands had raised, and
that he prayed to other than the goddess of the
temple. And they hurried to the chief priest with
the tidings, and he gave them a rich bounty and
much praise for their zeal in his behalf. And he
bade them keep secret what they had seen, and
seek out more knowledge yet of the doings of
Ipsistos
.
And they were spies set upon their brother,
who told the chief priest of his outgoings, and
followed
him from place to place. But nothing did
they say of Damaina, the sweet maiden, who
bowed with her brother before the strange altar
of his worship. And nothing did Ipsistos know
of the doings of his brothers; and he gave little
heed to his fears, that counselled him to be cautious
in what he did. For the spirit of truth which he
worshipped, worked within him, and a fire lighted
up his tongue. So that when the elders, and the
chiefs, and the rulers of the people, were gathered
together in the high places, he could not be kept
from speech, and he came to where they were
assembled
;
and he penetrated into the high places,
even among the mighty men of the city, the
famous
in arts and arms, the sages and the
lawgivers
.
And he cried to them with a loud voice,
and all fear had utterly gone out of his heart. And
he told them of the wonders which his eyes had
seen, and his ears had heard, even of the wonders
of that new goddess which had vouchsafed to smile
upon one so lowly. And he prayed that they
might give heed to his counsels, that they might
be blessed also by her countenance. And he would
have led them to his place of worship, even to the
pale groves where he had raised his altar; but
they mocked at his madness, and marvelled at the
fondness of the youth.
And they were astounded, and said, one to
another
Who is he that speaks to us with so bold a
voice  is he not one of the dust-carriers?
wears he not of the blue which is the cloth of the
laborer?  is he not of the suburbs  the son of
the brick-maker?
And they drave him out from among them, and
they shut the door against his face.
XIV.
Then, Ipsistos, with a heart sore for his people,
went into the market-place, where were gathered
together many of his own condition, and to these
he cried aloud, and he prayed that they might give
ear to his tidings, and he promised to show them
strange things. And they were angered when
they beheld him on the eminence, and hearkened
to the words of his exhortations. And one said
Is not this Ipsistos, the son of the brick-maker
and shall one of our own sort claim to be wiser
than we?
And another cried
The mortar is even now upon his jacket, yet
would he talk for the magi.
Where should he get this impudence, cried
a third, to speak to us in words of counsel?
Were we not boys together  have we not often
played together on the same hill-side?
I know him well; he liveth in our street  he
is a fool that dreams  let us stop his mouth.
Then came one from Bermahdi, the high priest,
who whispered in the ear of a huge man whose
VOL. I. 13
anger was greater than the rest, and these were the
words of his speech
Thrust him down, brother, he is insolent;
doth he pretend to be wiser than us?  thrust him
down, I tell you;  it shall be good if we do so.
Then said another who came from Bermahdi
He hath reviled the goddess, whose white
temple
is upon the hill  thrust him down  let the
grass grow in his mouth!
Stone him! cried a third.
And the huge man, whose name was Brassid,
lifted a rock and flung it at Ipsistos, and the rock
smote the youth upon the ear and sorely wounded
him. And Ipsistos fled from the wrath of the
multitude
;
and he fled, not from fear but from sorrow,
as he beheld many among the multitude with whom
he had played even when a boy. And he had a
purpose in his flight, and he fled towards the pale
groves where he had raised the altar. And the
multitude pursued him, and they reviled him and
stoned him as he fled. But when the youth
reached the groves he paused in his flight, and he
turned full upon the multitude  and his eye was
lifted, and he beheld the goddess whom he
worshipped
,
looking down upon him from the cloud.
And the sweet voice spoke in his ears
Ipsistos  thy hour is come!
Let the hour be blessed by thee, oh! image
of divinest joy, and thy servant hath no fears. He
is ready.
And he laid his hands upon the horns of the
altar
,
and he looked out upon the multitude. And
he began a song of thanksgiving and of praise,
though their voices were bitter with revilings. And
they rushed upon him where he stood, and they
tore him from the horns of the altar. With a
blind fury they set upon him, and the strong men
seized each of them a limb. And Brassid was the
man who bade them do violence upon him. And
they dragged the youth to and fro, and they rent
his limbs apart, and scattered them asunder even
while the life struggled in his bosom. And when
they had done the deed, they were confounded,
and knew not what they had done. But Brassid,
the strong, who was of a mean craft, he laughed
to scorn the confusion of the multitude. And
with loud cries he rushed upon the altar which
Ipsistos
had raised with his own hands, and he would
have torn the altar from its place, but a sudden fear
seized upon him. For a bright eye looked out
upon him from the cloud, with a look of
exceeding
sorrow; and the sounds of a sad voice came
upon his ears like a passing wind; and these were
the words of the voice
What! ye have slain your master  he who
hath wrought for you; and now would you destroy
his work? Go!  but come to me at evening.
And none saw the eye, or heard the voice, but
Brassid, and, for a brief time, he was too greatly
astonished to speak. And the people would have
rushed upon the altar even as he had done, but he
stayed their fury:
Enough! Wherefore should we pull down
this pile which is but of wood, and the work of him
whom we have destroyed. Let it stand, in token
of his folly.
And he led the multitude back to the city, but
the voice went with him.
XV.
And the aged man, the grandsire of Ipsistos,
died that night by reason of his exceeding grief;
and the house of the brethren was the house of
mourning. But Damaina, the young sister of
Ipsistos
,
she stayed not to join with them in the song
of lamentation. Her heart was with Ipsistos, by
the lonely altar, among the pale groves of the
forest. And though it was a fear of the wrath of
the multitude that kept the brethren away from
seeking his mangled remains to give them burial,
yet no such fear stayed the footsteps of Damaina.
And she went forth from the dwelling when no
one beheld her, and with a sorrow that was beyond
any dread of what the vengeance of man could do,
and she sought out the place of worship in the
forest, even among the dusky shadows of the night.
And lo! when she came to the spot, a bright halo
was shining above the altar. And wherever a
limb of Ipsistos had fallen, there also hung a silver
light; and by this token the maiden well knew that
the lovely goddess smiled upon the purpose which
was in her heart. And the maiden gathered up
the scattered remains, and she looked about for a
place to lay them; and even while she looked, the
earth opened before her at the foot of the altar,
and a flame, like a flame from heaven, came down
and hung above the place. Then did Damaina
see the meaning of the goddess whom her brother
had loved, and she laid his bleeding limbs therein.
And the earth closed over them when she had
done, and she prayed with a fond heart above the
grave. And her prayer was accepted, and she
saw the bright face looking down upon her, even
as it had looked down upon Ipsistos; and by this
sign did the maiden know that the blessing of truth
was growing perfected in her heart. And while
13*
she kneeled before the altar she heard the footsteps
of one approaching, and she would have risen in
fear, and fled from the place, because of the night.
But the voice of the goddess commanded her to
stay and fear nothing.
He who cometh, said the voice, is a
worshipper
like thyself. He will do thee no manner
of harm.
And it was Brassid that came; he who led the
multitude against Ipsistos; and the maiden
trembled
when she beheld him in spite of the promise
of the goddess. But Brassid approached the
altar
with a trembling greater than her own. And
the strong man humbled himself with his face in
the dust ere he drew nigh unto the altar. He
had no strength in his limbs because of the guilt
in his heart, and he prayed like one who repenteth
and is full of sorrow for his misdeeds. Then
Damaina
,
the maiden, had pity of his sufferings, even
though he smote her brother, and she prayed to
the goddess in his behalf. And he cried,
Who art thou that pleadest for a wretch like
me. Know'st thou not that blood is on my hands,
even the blood of the good and the innocent?
Then the maiden answered him, saying,
I am the maiden Damaina, even she, the best
beloved sister of Ipsistos, whom thy hand hath
slain; but if thou weepest for that deed, shall I
not forgive thee, with a heart as tender of mercy
as thine own? Bear witness, oh, beautiful goddess
whom my brother loved, bear witness that I
forgive
this unhappy man,  even from my inmost
heart do I forgive him.
While thus she prayed before the altar, the pale
groves were lighted up with a sudden glory; and
the two beheld the bright face, and the lovely
features
of the goddess, and her words came to them
in authority. And she bade the man, even Brassid
who slew Ipsistos, draw nigh to the altar, and
when he came as he was commanded, and bowed
by the side of Damaina, lo! it was the form of
Ipsistos that stood between them,  and the image
of the youth smiled sweetly upon him, even upon
Brassid his murderer, and his words were these in
his ears:
Thou hast driven me from the work which
was assigned me,  it is commanded that thou
labor to the fulfilment thereof. Go, therefore, and
the smile of the goddess be with thee;  in my
blood shalt thou find a cement which shall build a
stronger and a higher temple than the white
temple
upon the hill.
And Ipsistos spake nothing to Damaina, but
he looked upon her with a smile of blessing and
love, and so passed from her sight.
XVI.
And from that hour a power seemed given unto
Brassid to work great things. And he went
among the people of his craft in the market place,
and he taught them, so that they hearkened with
reverence to his voice. And the people came to
hear him from all quarters of the city, and after
hearing him they went away sad and thoughtful.
Day by day, and night by night, without
weariness
and without fear, did Brassid teach along the
highways, of the wonders which he had seen, and
the greater wonders which he had heard, and a
power was given to him of the goddess, so that
whoso came to hear, though it were in scorn only,
remained to do homage to the wondrous truths
which he brought, and followed him, by reason of
this homage, whithersoever he went. And the
numbers increased daily of those who followed him.
Then did the chief men of the city hold counsel
with the priests of the temple upon the hill, how
best to overcome this preacher of strange
doctrines
.
And they sent persons against them with
authority to seize and punish. But the multitude
rose up in defence of Brassid, even as they had
risen against Ipsistos at his summons, and they
pelted the servants of the temple with stones, and
they ran furiously upon the temple. And they
dragged the goddess from her throne, and they
drove forth the priests from within it. And
Brassid
bade them smite the head from the false
goddess
,
and drag her carcass in the dust. And they
tore the white temple asunder, so that one stone
stood not up against another. And when this had
been done, then did Brassid bid them bring the
white marble of the temple to the pale groves
where Ipsistos had built his altar, and they raised
a temple loftier than that upon the hill, and they
raised it even over the grave of Ipsistos whom they
had slain. And in the temple over against the
altar
there descended a divine form from heaven,
but over the face thereof hung a bright and
shining
veil; and on the veil was written these
words:
To those, only, who, like Ipsistos, love me ere
yet they have known me, my veil shall be uplifted.
And the people built a high monument to the
memory of Ipsistos with the huge stones with
which they had slain him; and Brassid wrote the
inscription upon the monument, which was as
follows
:
Ipsistos
!
we, who hated the truth, slew him
because he loved it:
May the truth teach us better knowledge
of our friends, so that we cut not off our own
heads!
But Damaina, the sister of Ipsistos, beheld
nothing
of these things. They saw her not after
that hour when the goddess had given it in charge
to Brassid to complete the labor of Ipsistos. And
they raised for her a tomb beside that of her
brother
,
but left open the door thereof, as thinking
she might yet come. But to this day she came
not.
THE STAR BRETHREN.
VOL. I. 14
I.
I will
come to thee, at midnight, dear
Anastasia
with life only will I fail thee.
These were the parting words of the enamored
boy; and the tones of his voice, not less than the
language which he used, spoke for his deep
devotion
.
At midnight, dear Albert, was the reply.
I live not till then! said the youth,
passionately
;
and, if thou meet me not, Anastasia  if
thou fail me
Fear me not! was the low but emphatic
interruption
of the maiden. In life or death, dear
Albert, I am only thine. I will not fail thee.
The leaves of the grove parted, and by the pale
glimmer of evening the two might be seen taking
their farewell and fond embrace. She, a tall and
slender maiden, lovely as the light, and softer than
the new born zephyr; and he, manly and strong,
yet young  having a frame of the most perfect
symmetry, and a face full of beauty and
expression
.
A fond, sweet kiss, a parting word and
sigh, an earnest and longing glance of rapture
and the lovers separated.
They had not, however, been unseen. The
eyes of jealousy were upon them, and the gloomy
and fierce Wallenberg  a suitor for the hand of
the damsel  had watched them throughout the
interview.
At midnight! he muttered, as he saw the
youth depart. It is well  I will be there also.
And he shook his hand after the departing form of
Albert, and his brow was covered with a cloudy
anger, which sufficiently denoted the terrible
thoughts of his mind, and the malignant feelings
which were working in his heart. Yet
Wallenberg
was a nobleman of high birth, and renowned
for deed of valor and great achievement. He
was not less so, for his great family estate and wide
possessions. These had commended him to the
family of Anastasia D'Arlemont, with which he
was connected. They all knew him for a coarse,
rude, rough-handed nobleman; yet, as the terrors
of his claws were calmed in gold, he was thought
no unfitting match for the gentle and shrinking
Anastasia. But she trembled at his approach, and
it was with a pang like death that she learned how
far his suit had met with the approbation of her
parents. Her attachment to Albert was unknown
to them, and to have made it known, would, she
well knew, avail her nothing. The passionate
persuasions of her sanguine lover relieved her
from the difficulty before her. He had persuaded
her that her only hope was in flight  in flight
with him. There was nothing so terrible in that.
Would she not have died for him? Could she live
without him; and what was life, with such a bear
as Count Wallenberg. Albert found but little
difficulty in convincing her reason, through the
medium of her heart  the medium through which
young damsels are most usually convinced. At
midnight, then, she was to fly with him. Such
were the resolves of the lovers; but Wallenberg
resolved otherwise.
Albert of Holstein was even then a student in
one of the German universities of the time, the
name of which is unnecessary to this narrative.
He was, at the period of which we write, just
entering
his eighteenth year. Until his sixteenth, he
had been under the guardianship of a good, but
weak and misjudging mother. While yet an in
fant, he had lost his father, who had fallen in a
domestic
feud with some rival baron, occasioned by
a difference of opinion on some matter of great
importance or of no importance at all, which had
suggested itself to them for discussion, while over
their cups. The son  Albert  but for a mind
and temper naturally excellent, would have been
utterly ruined by the various and misconceived
indulgences
of his surviving parent. Nature,
however
,
who is not often strong enough for so trying
a toil, resisted the mother long enough to save the
son from utter ruination; and, when sixteen years
of age, he was ready to go to college. After the
usual preparation, he was admitted into one of the
leading universities, where he soon had occasion to
test for himself the propriety of that course to
which he had so imprudently been subjected. It
is not our object, however, to analyze or dwell
upon the impressions of his mind under the new
changes of his condition  affecting, as they must
have done, the whole structure of his early habits,
and pruning and converting, as it were, the dead
branches of excess into a new and fresh capacity
of life. It is enough to say that he rapidly threw
aside the follies of habit and of thought which the
error of his mother had engendered. The
resources
of his own mind  a case not very common
14*
enabled him to contend with, successfully, and
finally to counteract, the thousand mistakes of a
foolishly fond parent, and a cringing crowd of
domestic
parasites.
II.
The night came  a sweet night of many and
bright stars  a night for secret, and sacred, and
stolen love. But it was not a night for love only.
It was a night for hate, also,  for jealousy and
murder. There was one who watched for the
coming of Albert as anxiously as did the gentle
Anastasia; but it was with not such sweet and fond
regard as that which filled her devoted bosom.
With the darkness he stole into the silent groves
which had been assigned for the meeting, and
there waited for the hour and the victim. He had
no scruples at any crime  his hand had been often
imbrued in blood, which was not always shed in
battle  and he was resolved, at every hazard, to
remove his rival. He had seen enough in the
brief interview which he had witnessed, to feel that,
however secure he might be of the preference of
the family, he was very far from the hope of a like
preference in the estimation of the maiden, while
Albert lived. It was the natural error of a wretch
so coarse as Wallenberg, to imagine that he would
be more successful when he should have slain the
youth. The poor maiden despised him; though, as
he was favored by her parents, she dared not give
open expression to her disapprobation and scorn.
She was compelled to submit in silence which
seemed satisfied. Perhaps, she would not have
so readily consented to fly with Albert, but for the
tyranny of the union they were about to force
upon her. The necessity of the case would seem
to justify her fatal resolution. The suit of Albert
had been denied, and the language of denial by
her parents had been also that of contumely and
reproach. There was no hope for her but in flight;
and the preparations of the lovers were secret to
all but Wallenberg. As we have seen, his jealous
eyes had watched them  his keen ears noted their
arrangements, and now, his keener knife was ready
to prevent them. This sort of remedy was
characteristic
of the time. The strong arm carried out
the strong word, and justice, which is now a
matter
of calculation and cunning, was then a thing of
muscle and brutality. The murderer lurked in
the shadow of the groves, and the lover, impatient
for his prize, stole hurriedly through their
recesses
.
His heart was elate with its hope, and his
footstep was that of joy. He had almost reached
the place assigned for the meeting  a close bower
of sweet shrubs in the centre of the garden. But
the foe and fate lay in his path, and he was not
permitted to reach it. He heard the rustling of
the bushes.
Dearest,  I am here, he murmured at the
sound.
And I am here! was the fierce word of
Wallenberg, as he plunged the cruel weapon into
the bosom of the youth;  this, boy, for thy
presumption
.
The only word uttered by the unhappy lover,
was the name of his mistress; and he lay in the
sleep of death at the feet of his murderer.
Wallenberg
stole away in silence when his felon deed
was done; satisfied that his own hope grew strong
in the annihilation of that of his rival. He knew
not the heart of Anastasia.
III.
How slowly passed the hours to the maiden,
while she waited for the coming of the youth.
From the lattice, long and anxiously had she
looked forth, listening for the dear accents of his
whispering voice; and when the clock tolled forth
the full hour of midnight, impatient to behold him,
she stole hurriedly down into the garden, treading
its flowery mazes, but seeking him every where in
vain. Her heart already began to fill with those
thousand mysterious fears, and apprehensive
forebodings
,
which are natural enough to a German
maiden, when she fancied she heard a sigh. She
followed the sound, and something seemed to float
in the air before her. A gentle breath moved the
leaves overhead, though elsewhere a universal
stillness prevailed. The sigh was repeated  the
breathing zephyr still guided her from above, and
when it ceased to move, the lifeless body of her
lover lay at her feet. With a single shriek,
scarcely less lifeless than himself, she sank down
beside him, and was only aroused to the
consciousness
of a greater misery by a terrible voice which
sounded in her ears.
Away with her! cried the furious father,
take her home  remove her from my sight.
She clung to the inanimate form, which could
no longer return her fond caresses.
You shall not  no! no! I will not leave him.
I will cling to him to the last.
But what could her strength avail against that
of the brutal retainers, assisted by the bloody
Wallenberg
.
They tore her from the corpse with
unmeasured violence.
He is yet warm! shrieked the maiden  he
is not dead  I may yet save him  he will hear
my voice. Oh! leave me  leave me with him, I
implore you.
Home with her, I say, were the words of the
implacable father, which silenced her entreaties.
She shuddered to behold the malignant and savage
exultation which were impressed upon his features
as he spoke. With the sight, a fearful fancy
gathered in her brain. She suspected him  her
own father  of the cruel crime, and this
suspicion
increased her misery. The true assassin,
looking on the while, remained unknown.
Inquiry
in a little time, having labored without
success
to find the criminal, forbore its task; and if,
at any moment, public suspicion rested any where
in particular, the object was one quite too high
for the arm of public justice.
IV.
Meanwhile, the corpse of Albert was removed
to his former lodgings, and from thence to the
family vault in the country. But a strange report
none knew whence  came to the ears of
Anastasia
.
It was whispered that Albert of Holstein
was still alive. The story went that a skilful
physician
and careful hands had kept the spark of
life in his bosom, and that hopes were entertained
of his final recovery. But these hopes, though
they inspired new ones in the heart of Anastasia,
were for a long time illusive, and, perhaps,
injurious
.
They kept her mind in a state of feverish
inquietude, and prolonged, if they did not increase,
the sickness at her heart.
But little time was allowed her, however, for
idle meditation upon fancies such as these. Count
Wallenberg pressed his suit, and would not be
denied
.
In vain did the maiden plead for time
for a brief indulgence to her sorrows. At that
early period in the history of civilization, parents
did not often trouble themselves to give ear to the
tastes and desires of their daughters. They did
not, in the present instance; but with the most cruel
disregard to her complaints and prayers, they
decreed
her to the great bear, her wealthy lover.
They doomed her to the sacrifice, and the day was
appointed for placing the victim before the altar.
We may not speak of the anguish of Anastasia on
being instructed to prepare for the nuptials with
Wallenberg. She felt that it would be far easier
to die. But, hopeless of any aid from without,
and having no succor or show of mercy from
within, she prepared to resign herself without
struggling to the fate which now seemed
inevitable
.
It was only a few weeks after the death of her
lover, when this scarcely less cruel doom was
uttered
in her hearing. She fled to her chamber,
desperate and desolate. She knew not where to
turn for consolation or counsel. It was midnight.
She threw herself down before her window, and
wished and prayed for death. The very
associations
of memory, so full of pleasure and joy as the
reality had been, now brought her infinite pain.
They told her what she had enjoyed, but they also
told her what she had lost, and lost for ever. She
felt that it would be sweet then to lapse away into
forgetfulness, and, fleeing from the pressure and
the care of life, rejoin her departed lover in the
dwellings of the blessed.
Musing thus, and hopeless of all things and
thoughts, she starts and trembles. A sudden
terror
is upon her. Her blood freezes in her veins
her very heart grows cold. What is it that
she hears  what is it that rises up before her
sight?
Well may she start and tremble. The faint and
exquisite tones of music which now seek her ears
are such as she had long been accustomed to hear
from the lips of Albert. The words are those of
a familiar song, and the tones cannot be mistaken.
They breathe of the same sweet passion  they
speak the same blessed language. It is Albert's
voice and music, and Albert must be at hand.
Breathlessly, and half fainting, she lingered and
listened to the strains. She did not dare to move
indeed she could not  while she heard them.
But soon they melted away in distance, and the
winds only remained sighing mournfully through
the lattice. Her frame seemed fastened  frozen
to the ground; and her terror, becoming
insupportable
at length, with a shriek she rushed to the
innermost recesses of her chamber, and burying
her head in the thick drapery of the couch, strove,
in this way, to fly and hide from those strange and
terrible surmises which were fast gathering in her
soul.
But the strange and starling minstrelsy
pursued
her even there, and its fascinations proved
too powerful for her mind to resist. She braved
all the terrors of her imagination, in the hope
again to hear it. With the approach of the next
midnight she again sought the lattice, and listened
VOL. I. 15
impatiently for the returning strains. They came
at last, obedient to her senses. The same sweet,
mysterious air, rose swelling upon the night wind,
and was borne, as it were, directly to the window
where she sat. The tones were full of the
warmest
melancholy  faint, but full  strange, but
sweet  mysterious and vague, but as familiar as
if they had all been learned in childhood. She
was no longer terrified; and, obeying an impulse
which she now found irresistible, and having no
fears, she gently undid the lattice, and looked out
with far-searching eyes among the trees of the
garden
.
Nor did she look in vain. She beheld a
form retreating away among the thick crowding
trees, so nearly resembling that of her departed
lover, that she involuntarily uttered his name.
She was answered by a sigh  so mournful, so
deep, that it seemed to reproach her for the
indifference
of her grief  for her consenting to the
bridal sacrifice which had been decreed by her
father. Her sorrows burst forth afresh with this
thought, and she was convulsed by her emotions.
She lost all guidance of her reason at that
moment
,
and called upon Albert deliriously.
Had her voice indeed so much power? Had
the deity spoken from her lips, and was it in truth
her lover who now stood before her? Fair and
manly as when at first she had beheld him, she
beheld him now. He looked even lovelier and
nobler than ever. No trace of his hurts was
perceptible
.
He was alive, and utterly uninjured.
She grew faint as she surveyed him. She
trembled
with a feeling of awe, lest, at that moment, she
should be standing in the presence of a spectre.
His eyes, though clear and intelligent as ever,
were sad, and full of a solemn expression. They
looked the divinity of wo  such an expression as
might well belong to a fallen and defeated deity. A
mingled feeling of love and adoration, which she
stove vainly to restrain, filled and inflamed her
heart. How gentle were all his tones  how
soothing
his words  how tender their utterance. How
sweetly did he assure her of his existence  of his
continued love for her, even while that existence
was doubtful. He had been in deep extremity
from his wounds  on the verge of dissolution,
from which he had been saved only by the
marvellous
skill of his physician. The moment of his
recovery brought him once more to the feet of her
without whom the skill which had saved him would
have been rejected. He had risked all danger
once more to see her  to hear from her lips that
she was not lost to him yet  that she would be
none other than his. How easy to give that
assurance
,
how sweet to receive it. Long did they
linger in the sacred and silent garden, in fond
communion
,
with no watcher but the stars, and no
thought but of that true and blessing love which
they seemed to smile upon and sanction.
But the difficulty of escape from the
approaching
bridal with Wallenberg distracted the maiden,
in the midst of all her new-born hopes and
pleasures
.
She had poured into her lover's bosom all
the sorrows which had troubled hers. His
composure
satisfied and reassured her.
Fear nothing, he said, I shall not lose you.
I will save you from this hated bridal. You shall
be mine, Anastasia  mine only, believe me.
I do  I do, she repeated, fervently.
Be ready, then, as I shall counsel you, and
fear nothing.
He gave her directions for meeting him, made
his own preparations for flight, and with mutual
impatience they waited the approaching and
appointed
evening.
It came  the hour which had been designated
for the marriage of Wallenberg. The chapel of
D'Arlemont Castle was pompously illuminated
the company were already assembling in crowds,
and every thing was gay comparison, amusing
scandal, and good-humored clamor. There
were aunts and uncles, cousins and friends  the
whole world of various and motley elements which
such an occasion so commonly brings together.
At the head of a long train of connexions and
dependants
came the bridegroom, as full of his own
consequence as of impatience for the ceremony.
The hour was dawing nigh for the sacrifice  but
a voice, under the lattice of Anastasia, said to her
in a whisper, which, though soft, yet reached her
ears
Come  come to me, beloved  I await thee,
Anastasia!
A mournful but a sweet voice was his  a voice
of melody and love,  and she answered it in
like language  I come.
She stole away by a private passage into the
garden. She joined her lover, and they fled from
the boundaries of her father's domain, long before
the assembled company had dreamed of her
absence
.
V.
Where
is she?  where is Anastasia, my
bride?  why comes she not? was the demand
of Wallenberg.
15*
Where was she, indeed? The hour had elapsed
the moment was past  why came she not, in
glittering robes, heading, in kindred gladness, the
garlanded group of damsels that had gathered to
wait upon her? The castle was soon in
commotion
,
and a strange anxiety filled every
countenance
.
The bridal chamber was empty  the
maiden was not to be found. The castle was
searched from turret-top to donjon, but in vain.
They were compelled to seek her elsewhere. They
hunted through grounds and gardens, dispersing
every-where, but without success. They next
sought the forests. As they penetrated the thick
woods, the sky suddenly became dark and
over-cast
vivid flashes of lightning added to, while
illuminating and making perceptible, the gloom.
A storm of frightful energy passed over the wood,
prostrating every thing before it, and subsiding
with equal suddenness. The sky became
instantly
clear, and the moon shone forth in purity,
unconscious
of a cloud. The firmament had not a
speck. The bewildered groups proceeded in their
search. A soft and gentle strain of melody
seemed
to imbody itself with the winds. They
followed
the sounds into a dark and gloomy enclosure
of high overarching trees, thickly fenced in with
knotted vines and brushwood. The thunderbolt
had been there, and it was scorched and blackened.
They advanced  the music still leading them
onward  until, in a small recess, they found
indubitable
tokens of the maiden, in the
half-consumed
remnants of her hat and shawl. They now
beheld her destiny. They saw that she had been
spirited away by the fiend. She had become the
victim of the demon. He had triumphed in the
garb of the early and lost lover  and she had
fallen a victim, in a moment of sad credulity, to
the arts of a designing and an evil angel. They
continued the pursuit no longer. She was lost to
them for ever  but still not lost. Amid the horrors
of the tempest she pursued her way with her lover.
Oh, save me, Albert what a dreadful storm!
was her pleading and terrified address, as they
hurried
on through the devious paths of the forest.
The violence of the storm filled her heart with
apprehensions
.
She knew not the fearful extent of
her security.
I will  fear not, dearest  there, is no
danger
.
It pursues us, she cried, with increasing
terror
.
It will not harm us  it will soon be over,
was his assurance.
A stream of ground lightning, like a wave of
the sea, rushed up the hill at that moment, and
followed
close upon their footsteps. The maiden
darted forward in desperation  Albert seized her
in his arms, and throwing aside her hat and shawl,
which encumbered him, he bore her away like an
infant. He bore her to the edge of the forest,
and laid her down upon the greensward in safety.
VI.
When
she recovered from the faintness which
had overcome her, the storm had passed away
the night was beautifully clear. The moon had
risen, and the gray forests looked sweet and
hallowed
in her light. A gentle strain of music rose
upon the distant breeze, and still more contributed
to the soft loveliness and languor of the scene.
The bright eyes of Albert looked down into the
dewy orbs of Anastasia, and she thought she
never before had seen them look so beautiful. His
arm supported her, and she fancied its pressure had
never been so fond before. She was blest in that
embrace  and fear, and sorrow, and fatigue,
departed
in the consciousness that she then felt of
having all that she lived for, and all that before
had been denied her love.
We must proceed, my Anastasia  our
dwelling
is not far  we can reach it by the dawn.
Our steeds are now in waiting.
While the moon was yet shining, they stood
upon the rocky cliffs which overhung a beautiful
river. A proud and lonely castle stood in sight
upon the highest crag. The stream glided below
it with a pleasant freshness, and rippling away
among the shelving rocks, in the placid moonlight,
it seemed to the eyes of the happy Anastasia a
home of fary  a very heaven for the heart of
truest love.
VII.
The
bird sings falsely who sings only of
sunshine
.
The song must sometimes speak of clouds.
Happy were the two  happy in the last degree
in their mutual loves and constant intercourse.
Albert was all that Anastasia could desire in a
lover  he was fond  he was gentle. His
language
was kind, always  and his very whispers
were musical. But he was melancholy  he was
always sad  even when he was most happy. He
seemed never to forget the mutability of
happiness
.
Yet his sadness was never gloom, nor did
he at any time complain. Still, the very fact that
he asked for no sympathy, and that she knew
nothow
to address herself for his relief  these still
made her unhappy. There was yet another cause
of disquiet to the fond Anastasia. Their
dwelling
was so lonesome. True, Albert seldom left
her, and there were a thousand pleasant
amusements
which he had provided; but her heart was
too human for such a solitude; and the very winds
that mourned in music through the rocky crevices,
and the gentle river that rippled sweetly at the
castle's base, and the sweet birds that carolled in
the groves, and the stars that sang together
harmoniously
in their courses, all seemed to tell her
of the many bright eyes, and cheerful hearts and
voices, with which she had been accustomed to
mingle. These thoughts gave her some
occasional
annoyances, but a sweet word from Albert
consoled her.
For a time, dearest, we must keep in solitude,
to avoid the search which your father will
doubtlessly
institute after you. We must keep in secret
we must avoid all exposure  and here they
will not be very apt to seek us.
She was satisfied  she seemed to be satisfied,
at least  and that was something.
VIII.
One night they walked along the edge of the
precipice, and looked abroad upon the night and
river. The stars were shining in profusion, and
not a breath murmured but harmoniously.
Tell me, he said to her, in a sad but gentle
tone, tell me, Anastasia  do you not tire of
our love, and the solitude to which it dooms you?
Not of our love, oh, no! dearest Albert, but
sometimes I feel so lonesome.
Yet are you not alone  am I not with you
always? With you, dearest, I have no such
feeling
.
You are all to me, Anastasia, and I feel no
want when you are absent. Ah! feel like me, I
implore you, my beloved. When you repine
about your solitude, I mourn  I am unhappy.
Be not unhappy, Albert  I will repine no
longer. I feel that you are all to me, and
wherefore
should I repine for any change that may lose
me all?
Wherefore! he replied  seizing her wrist
with a strong gripe as he pronounced the word
after her, with a singular energy. Wherefore!
indeed? Repine not, dearest, or you may indeed
lose all!
What mean you, Albert? she demanded,
with some apprehension.
Look! he exclaimed; and she beheld, even
as he pointed, where a bright star shot away from
its sphere in erratic flight, bearing along with it a
momentary train of glory, which, as it belonged
to, and came from, the sphere alone, was soon
extinguished
upon leaving it.
Look, he cried, look at that star! Be
not weary of thy place of watch and quiet, lest
thou become extinguished also. Thy sphere and
temple are in one heart  thou canst not inhabit
many.
He paused, and his eye seemed to trace afar
upon its flight the pathway of the vanished star.
She looked at him with anxious apprehension.
His eye seemed rapt in sorrowful contemplation,
and though he shed no tear, the expression was
that of a sublime and subdued sadness. She
threw her arm tenderly around his neck, and she
felt that a thrilling shudder went all through his
frame.
It grows cold  let us return, my beloved,
she said to him, fondly.
Leave me for a while, Anastasia  I will come
to thee soon. Leave me now.
His words were gently spoken, but she felt that
they were rather a command than a solicitation.
She left him at his bidding; but ere she went, she
threw her arms again about his neck, and sweet
and pure was the kiss given by their mingling lips.
She went towards the castle; but, looking
backward
as she went, it seemed to her that she saw a
bright and beautiful star moving across the river
to the crag whereon he stood. At length she
beheld
it remain stationary beside him, and the
distinct
outline of his person was developed by its
rays. She turned away with a strange terror
she dared not look again; but hurried onward
with trembling steps to her chamber in the castle.
IX.
It was late that night before Albert came to the
chamber, and yet she had not slept. A strange,
sweet strain of music, wild, yet fine, came to her
ears at midnight, and soon after she heard it, he
appeared.
His looks were sad as when she left him  and
he did not seem pleased to find her watchful.
VOL. I. 16
Thou hast not slept, Anastasia?
No  I waited for thee, Albert. I can hope
for no sleep when thou art absent.
But sometimes I would have thee sleep, simply
because I am absent. Ah, my beloved, would that
I might sleep, and sleep for ever, when I can no
longer be with thee.
That music  that sweet music, Albert
whence did it come?
Wilt thou not sleep now, my beloved?  I
am with thee, was the evasive reply; and
Anastasia
understood the gentle form of chiding which
he had adopted. She obeyed the suggestion
she tried to sleep, and did sleep, but her slumbers
were greatly broken  she knew not why; and
whenever she awakened it was to hear whispering
voices and sudden gusts of music, that seemed to
be passing around the apartment with a rush of
wings.
X.
It
was yet early morning when Anastasia
awakened
and beheld Albert just about to leave the
chamber. She called to him, but he only smiled,
shook his head, waved his hand gently, and
hurried
from her sight. She rose quickly from the
couch, and moved to the window, from which she
beheld him hastening down the rocks. He looked
back and caught her eye, and his finger was raised
as if in warning. The thought of the shooting
star came that moment to her mind, and she
hurried
back to her couch.
He returned about mid-day, and seemed
unhappy
.
He started frequently, and looked around
him, as if in anxious expectation of the approach
of some desired person.
You are troubled, Albert, said Anastasia.
Can I do any thing for you?
Yes! was the sudden and almost stern reply.
See not that I am troubled. When thou canst
not serve or sooth me, I will seek thee;  when I do
not seek thee, Anastasia, believe me, thou canst
not serve me. Seem then not to see that I suffer.
And thou dost suffer, Albert?
I live! was the terrible response; and oh!
the immortal grief that looked forth in that
moment
from his eyes.
Would that I could die for thee, Albert! was
her exclamation, as she flung herself upon his
bosom. He folded her fondly in his embrace,
while he replied to her as follows:
Thou canst better serve me than by dying for
me, Anastasia  and far better serve thyself. Live
for me.
Do I not, dear Albert?
No  not yet  thou dost not live for thyself.
She looked up wonderingly at the speaker
he proceeded, and his voice was full of solemnity,
and there was an intense earnestness in his face
which she did not dare a second time to look
upon.
Love thy condition for itself. Seek not to
see, and ask not to partake of, mine. Is there
any thing unknown to thee?  it is better for thee
that thou shouldst not know it. Has it come to
thee in a dream that a joy was in the valley
awaiting
thee, beyond any ever known to thee before?
Turn thy footsteps with a fond solicitude from the
path which leads to the valley. The dream was a
lying one, sent for thy ensnaring. Thou wilt lose
what thou hast, in grasping at what thou hast not;
and the very hope which tells thee of a blessing to
come, steals a blessing from thee while it does so.
Beware, Anastasia, that thy head misleads not thy
heart, and thy fancy consumes not thy feelings.
Do we not love each other, Anastasia? Couldst
thou have a fonder or a truer love than mine?
Let it suffice thee  joy in what thou hast;  pray
to thy God, Anastasia; pray that, if thou dost not
yet, thou mayest soon learn to love thy condition
as thyself  it is more than thyself to thee.
He kissed her, and left her with these
mysterious
lessons, over which she pondered in doubt and
sadness.
XI.
The advice of Albert was good, but how
unreasonable
.
How is it possible for man, unless
denied
to hope, to be content with his condition?
How much less possible for woman! To be
content
with existing things is to desire no change
to hope for nothing better  to live without a
thought of heaven. The requisition of Albert
sank deep into the mind of Anastasia, but not to
produce the effect which he desired. It came to
her as a restraint, and not a direction  as a
controller
,
and not a guide. Was he to suffer, and
was she to be denied to share with him in his
griefs, to console him under his torments? Love
itself rose in rebellion against such a requisition.
And when she beheld his sadness visibly increase
with each successive hour, her fond heart  her
sleepless affections  could no longer remain
pacified
and silent.
16*
Albert, dear Albert, you do me injustice. I
am strong to share with you  ay, to endure all
your afflictions. I feel that I love you too well
not to rejoice in pain when I know that every
added sting to my heart takes from that which is
preying upon yours. Unfold to me your griefs
say what afflicts you. Let me hear the worst,
and you will see how I can smile to place my hand
with yours in the flame, and, looking into your
eyes of love the while, feel and fear none of its
searching fires.
It was thus she implored him for his secret
her arms twining about his neck in the fondest
embrace  her dark, sweet eyes, looking with the
warmest devotion at the same instant into his
own.
You know not what you ask, was his reply.
You ask for wo  for eternal wo  for a doom
for which you were never destined. Why, oh!
why will you be dissatisfied? Have you not my
love  all my love  my heart, truly and entirely
yours? The love of the unselfish and unexacting
man  of one who is above meanness or its
reproach
is the richest possession ever yet given
to the woman heart. Wherefore would you seek
for more?
You do not give me your heart  you will
not give me its sorrows. It is for these I ask.
You have them, Anastasia  it is only the
name you desire to know. You have them
already
.
How?
Your present care  your anxiety to know
them  is your sorrow now. You see that I am
grieved  and you grieve to see it. That is
enough for me, and should be enough for you.
You give me your sympathy when you grieve at
my suffering. You prove to me your love for me
when you wish to see me glad. I am satisfied
with thus much in the way of proof  be you
satisfied
,
dearest Anastasia, with the degree of
confidence
I have already shown you. Seek not to
hear more. I, who know how much you can
console
,
and how greatly you ought of right to suffer
with me, deny you any farther knowledge of my
griefs than this. I would not have you even see
so much. But, at least, I desire that you should
seek to know no more.
XII.
Compelled to be silent, she yet remained
unsatisfied
.
A feverish curiosity was gnawing at her
heart. What could be the matter with Albert?
Were they not secure in their retreat?  was he
impatient so soon of the pleasant fetters which
love and her fond arms had woven around him?
She conjectured, vainly, of a thousand causes for
his suffering, dismissing, as idle, each suggestion
of her mind, as soon as it presented itself. Her
thoughts were sleepless, and they kept her so.
That night she heard strange noises in her
chamber
strange though slight. She had resolved
to keep awake, and yet, even while she strove, it
seemed as if a blessed breeze came about her, in a
murmuring whisper, that glided into song at length,
and filled the air with a slumberous power. She
felt the sleep wrapping her still resisting limbs as
with a garment of melody, and though she strove
to burst its fetters, and her eyes persisted
occasionally
in looking forth, they were at length
compelled
to yield the struggle. Yet, ere they
closed entirely, it appeared as if a red and lovely
light, pointed and raying out like a golden star,
wavered and flickered around the couch where
she slept, fondly clasped in the arms of Albert. It
was not quite dawn when she awakened from
that sleep, and then it seemed as if she had been
awakened by a cold and sudden wind, which
passed
over her face while yet in a state of dim and
doubtful consciousness; she felt the form of Albert,
which before had lain quietly beside her, suddenly
convulsed as if with spasms; and when she turned
to him and met the glance of his eyes, they were
wild beyond description. They glanced sadly,
and almost with an expression of gloom upon her,
and she felt as if he had repulsed her. But when,
under the agony of that thought, she threw her
arms around his neck, he returned her embrace
with a fondness that answered fully, if it did not
exceed, her own.
XIII.
All that day he was absent among the
neighboring
rocks and woods. She had asked to go
forth with him, but he had resolutely, though
gently
,
denied her. Her thoughts, during his absence,
were all given, in spite of her will, to the one
absorbing
subject  the mystery of his sorrows.
By a strange instinct, her mind continually
reverted
to the image of that star, that seemed to cross
the river, and station itself close beside him where
he stood. A next and natural transition of her
thought reviewed the singular sensations which
she had experienced just when sinking into
slumber
,
and when awakening the previous night and
morning; and she now remembered, among other
circumstances which had attended her sleep, that
it had followed soon after the kind kiss which
Albert
had impressed upon her eyes. The more she
meditated this matter, the more perfectly was she
convinced that the kiss of Albert had produced
that obliviousness which she was so very desirous
to avoid; and, as she was resolute, in spite of all
his counsels, to discover what she could of the
occasion of his sorrows, she determined, if
possible
,
to escape the repetition of that kiss upon her
eyelids when, at a future time, she desired that her
eyes might be kept open. It is not difficult for a
woman to effect her object when she aims to do
wrong; and it will be seen that Anastasia was
only too successful in repressing sleep when her
husband desired to impose it on her.
That very night she determined to try her
experiments
;
and accordingly, as a first step, she
aimed to set Albert's mind perfectly at rest as to
the degree of quiet which was in hers. When he
returned to the castle, which he did at early
evening
,
she received him with the fondest and most
satisfying smiles. Her good-humor and
cheerfulness
,
easy but not obtrusive, delighted him, and
she now saw the truth of what he had told her.
He was happy as he saw her happy, and his
sadness
passed away, leaving not the trace of a cloud
upon his brow, as, to his eye, she appeared content
with her condition. Joyfully  ay, with an
intoxication
of joy  he clasped her to his bosom,
and his words were never fonder, and his kisses
never half so sweet. She half resolved, if the
appearance
of contentment on her part could
produce
such a vast improvement on his, to make it
her study to obey him. Alas! why have we not
always the strength to obey good impulses only!
Be ever thus, my Anastasia  be ever thus,
and we are most happy. You will then see no
sorrow on my brow, and I will secure you against
all that might otherwise assail your heart.
I will pray Heaven to be as you wish me,
Albert
.
I have little else to pray for.
She retired for the night, and he promised to
follow her very soon. When she had gone, he
clasped his hands, and his eyes looked up in hope
to the blessed starlight that came shining through
the grated window of the castle. He spoke in
low tones of soliloquy as he looked up to the
wheeling and flickering fires.
Let her but continue thus, and I am safe.
There will then be no more wanderings  no more
flight  no more incertitude. I shall resume my
station  I shall ever more burn with the fixed
fires that the winds move not  that the capricious
seasons check not  beyond the control of the
mortal, beyond the power and caprice of the
immortal
.
Yes, dearest Anastasia, in thy constancy
in thy content  in thy love of thy condition,
clamouring for no change-begetting knowledge, I
shall be secure, and we shall both be happy.
It was not long after this that he retired to the
chamber of his bride.
XIV.
She had played her part to admiration  she
had completely deceived her husband. She little
dreamed of the evils which spring from all
deception
even where the end seems to be most
innocent
,
and where a superficial thought esteems it
praiseworthy. She wished to know his griefs
she persuaded herself because she could then the
better administer to and heal them. This was
her duty; and so regarding it, she entirely forgot
that obedience, in the inferior mind, is a duty also.
Albert was perfectly convinced that Anastasia
was dissatisfied no longer. That conviction
brought back his cheerfulness. His was a
peculiar
destiny; and to be thought happy by her, and
to make her satisfied with his lot, by perfect
happiness
in hers, was, according to the terms of that
destiny, the condition of his own happiness.
Believing
and confiding, with renewed and increased
fondness, he leaned over her, as she seemed to
sleep, and sweet and long was the fond kiss which
he pressed upon her parted lips.
She did not sleep  she was watchful. With a
pertinacity that did not suffer fatigue or pause, she
kept resolutely awake until midnight.
Remembering
the kiss upon her eyelids which her
husband
had usually given her, and to which she
attributed
the deep slumber which always seemed
to have followed it, she contrived so to dispose her
arms as to throw one of them effectually over her
eyes, and thus to prevent the possibility of his lips
pressing upon them. She found the position an
unpleasant and tiresome one after a little while;
but, bent upon her design, she determined to suffer
the annoyance rather than forego her purpose.
When a woman once sets her mind upon any thing,
it is no small matter which is to divert her from it.
Midnight came at last, to her great satisfaction.
She heard the clock of the castle toll forth the
hour with a solemn emphasis, and she could
scarcely
restrain the deep sigh of her heart from forcing
VOL. I. 17
its way to a corresponding sound to her lips.
But she did restrain herself, and in a moment after
she distinctly felt a cold wind rush through the
apartment. At that moment Albert half rose in
the couch, and bent over her. She felt his
breathing
distinctly lift the lighter curls of her hair, and
with a keen ear he listened to her respirations. He
tried with a gentle finger to detach her arm from
its close place over her eyes; but the arm seemed
all at once to have become most obstinately rigid,
and he failed in his efforts, in which he did not
persevere for fear of awaking her. As if satisfied
that she slept, he seemed to turn away; and the
arm, so obstinately immoveable before, was now
slightly lifted, without being removed from her
eyes, and only sufficiently to enable her to give a
single glance around the apartment. As she had
seen before, she now distinctly beheld a shadowy
outline at the foot of the couch, in whose massive
brow a bright pale star shone fixedly and soft. A
moment more had elapsed when the form of
Albert
became suddenly convulsed, and she could
scarcely forbear the fond impulse which prompted
her to forget every precaution, and clasp him in
her arms; but the secret stirred in her mind at that
moment, and she maintained her position and
silence
,
though several convulsions, each successive
one more severe than the preceding, shook his form
as with so many dreadful spasms. They were
scarcely over when a cold breath of air seemed
to pass above her neck, and she distinctly felt the
body of Albert sink down helplessly beside her.
Her heart beat impetuously  she could scarce
suppress her breathing, and nothing but the most
resolute determination enabled her to forbear
shrieking aloud. She did forbear, however; and
once more venturing to look forth, she now
distinctly
beheld two shadowy forms glide through
the apartment, with each a red and similar star
shining brightly upon his forehead.
XV.
Anastasia could bear this no longer,
particularly
when, turning to the side of the couch where
Albert lay, his body was cold, corpse-like, and
immoveable
.
Conviction forced itself upon her
the secret was discovered, and the burden was
insupportable
.
She shrieked aloud in her agony;
she clasped the lifeless body in her arms, while her
eyes, addressing the star-fronted shadows that stood
at the foot of the bed, seemed to appeal to them
once more for the restoration of the inanimate form
beside her. With the first accents of that wild
and fearful shriek, indicating, as it did, the sudden
and startling intelligence which her mind had
received
,
a visible effect was produced upon the
strange aspects before her. While she looked,
she beheld one of the stars rise slowly, and sail
away without obstruction through the spacious
windows, while the other wavered and flickered
about as if in the gusts of an uprising storm. A
storm, indeed, seemed to rage through the
apartment
.
The shadowy figure appeared to expand
into a rolling and tossing cloud, in the midst of
which, as if it were the centre of its action, the
bright star now grew more bright, and of a deeper
red, and shot forth the most angry fires on every
side. Nothing could exceed the terrors of
Anastasia
.
The star seemed now to approach her, and
gust after gust, like the rushing of so many heavy
wings, passed and repassed over the couch where
she lay, lifting and rending its silken drapery.
She cried aloud once more in her apprehension.
Forgive, forgive me, dearest Albert  forgive
me that I have offended. Come to me  be as
thou wert  I will obey thee  I will never offend
thee more.
Too late  too late, cried a voice of sorrow
rather than of anger from the bosom of the cloud,
which now hung, like a dense wreath of vapour,
just above the couch where she lay.
It is too late, dearest Anastasia  I can
return
to thee no more.
Wherefore  wherefore? was the
interrogation
of the terrified woman.
It is the doom! was the hollow answer from
the cloud; and the star that still shone from the
vague form before her seemed to shed drops of
blood, that fell even upon the garments of her
couch, as the mournful voice thus responded to
her inquiry.
Alas! alas! wherefore is this doom! she
cried once more to the shadow and the star.
Thou hast already asked too much. I warned
thee, my Anastasia. Was it not enough to know
that thou wert happy? Why wast thou not
satisfied
with thy condition? Thou hast destroyed the
hope and the happiness of both by thy impatient
thirst after the why and the wherefore.
Alas! and for this are we to be disunited, my
Albert  for so slight a cause as this are we to
lose the blessing we have lived for?
He replied to her in an allegory.
Does the flower please thee?  wherefore
destroy
it to know whence come the scent and the
beauty? The odor flies when thou dost so  and
17*
the beauty fades. This is life  this, always, the
happiness of the mortal. But thou art mortal no
longer, my Anastasia  thou art now destined to
share, even as thou desiredst it, the terrible doom
which is mine!
What meanest thou, Albert? she inquired,
tremblingly, as these fearful words reached her
ears.
Albert no longer, cried the star. Thy
lover was a god!
She sank from the couch where she had lain as
she heard these words, and she now lay extended
along the floor.
Rise, Anastasia, still beloved, though mine no
longer  rise, said the star, and I will tell thee
what is given to thee to know.
She rose  she stood tremblingly in the presence
of that fiery eye that looked down upon her, while
the cloud in which it was imbedded hung over her
like a protecting and mighty shield. How
glorious
,
how fearful, were the words which followed.
XVI.
When I bade thee regard the flight from
heaven of a lovely star but a few nights ago,
Anastasia, I called thee to witness my own fate.
That star was a kindred light with mine, seduced
by me, as I had been seduced, from the sweet and
beautiful abode where it shone, happy and adored,
on high. I had my abode beside it, and was the
worshipped deity of a mighty nation. No eye
brighter then mine looked forth from the eastern
summits  no more pure or peaceful planet gave
light to the returning shepherds. Like the star
whose flight I pointed out to thy regard, I fell from
my place of glory, and the secret of my fall was
in the commission of thy error. I was discontented
with my condition.
The spirit-lover paused, and the hapless
Anastasia
wrung her hands in hopeless misery. He
proceeded
For ages, before the birth of time, had that
lovely abiding-place been the assigned station from
which I shone. Millions of lovely spirits shone
and revolved around me, with a light partly
borrowed
from mine; but oh! how unapproachably
inferior to me. I was beloved  I was worshipped;
but, like thee, Anastasia, I knew not to be content
in my place, and incurred, in a hapless moment,
a doom not unlike, but far more terrible than
thine.
The maiden moaned upon the floor of the a
partment
,
but without the utterance of a single word.
At that moment a pale star sailed along by the
window, and from the dim cloud, of which it was
the centre, she heard a voice crying mournfully
Come!
Albert replied with a promise of compliance,
and the spectre-glory floated away in the distance
from her sight. He proceeded in his narration:
One night  one fatal night  looking down
from my place of watch, I beheld, in undisturbed
quiet and loveliness, the various and the wondrous
worlds around me. A pale form passed hurriedly
along upon one planet, the earth, and it waved its
hands, and it shrieked in agony, and its cries of
sorrow came to my ears, even afar off as was my
dwelling. Thine was that form, Anastasia  thou
wert the mourner.
Alas! alas! cried the hapless woman  but
she could exclaim nothing farther.
Thine was the form, and such was the agony
of thy piercing shriek, that inly I mourned for
thee  I deemed it a cruel injustice that such as
thou shouldst suffer. Thou wert so lovely and so
sorrowful, and the sweetest loves in the thoughts
of the blessed, are those which are most allied to
sadness.
With these words the spirit paused in his
narration
,
and the cloud in which the eye hung and
shone now veered away and approached one of the
windows of the apartment. At the same time,
many stars, floating in like forms, came before the
window, and strange words passed between Albert
and the rest, in tones of the most sweet but subdued
and melancholy music. In a few moments they
floated away like the last, and her companion again
approached and hung above her in the
apartment
.
He continued his narration:
With the thought and the desire which came
to me as I surveyed thee, Anastasia, a dim and
giant form came rushing towards me, from the
piled clouds that lay like so many rocks and
towers
in the northern horizon. His speed was like
that of the lightning; and he made his way among
the stars around-me, obscuring their lustre, and
scorning their obstruction, with the rapid rush of
a mighty tempest. When he approached me, he
lay suspended on his outstretched wings, the
curtain
of which clouded the earth and concealed it
that moment from my sight, and he gazed upon me
with an air of sorrowful pride, mixed with the most
mortifying expression of contempt. `I have heard
thy wish,' he cried  `thou canst dare to regret,
but not to repair. Thou canst see, but thou hast
not the courage to share the suffering which thou
seest. Truly, thou art a generous spirit  noble
in the estimation of the highest, and worthy of the
fixed place which thou holdest.' Such were his
words of scorn, and they touched my pride. `And
what better fortune is thine, dark spirit?' I replied
to the intruder. `What hast thou to boast beyond
me  in what is thy better portion?' He answered
readily, and his voice went through me with a
strange and mighty power, so that I trembled in
the sphere in which I had never before been
shaken.
`I am free,' was his fierce and proud reply.
`I am free.'
I heard his words with a throbbing and
speechless
admiration, and began to feel a fond desire
that I too might be free. I little knew then the
nature of the blessing which I sought. I little
thought that, to be free, I should for ever after be
alone!
But I was not yet free, and I replied to him
still as the appointed servant of my master: `My
state is glorious  my home is one of lights, and
love, and perpetual flowers; and my duty is only
to watch for the Mighty One.' He replied in
greater scorn
`Thy home is one of lights  true  but
they are spies which are set upon thee to report
when thou errest  the love which is given thee
is not given for thyself, but for thy service  and
the flowers of which thou art mad to boast  look,
fool, they are woven into chains. Thou art a
slave but to spy upon others  thou art spied
upon thyself, and held worthy of love only as thou
dost the appointed task of the menial.'
He had spoken to me a dreadful truth  so I
deemed it at the time, and in my thoughts I
wished
myself free  free as the fierce and mighty
form that lay prone like a fearless giant, proud
and scornful in his might, before my eyes. I
wished
for freedom, and with the wish I felt the golden
link melt away that secured me in my station
the bands of flowers, which like a chain had held
me with a spell which no foreign power or agency
could have broken, now, at my single wish, were
relaxed from about me, and a mighty and clear
voice from a world a thousand worlds above me,
came to me like the sudden sound of a trumpet
`Thou art free!'
XVII.
Dreadful freedom! That instant I felt myself
alone. I was detached from the sphere in which
I had borne so small a labour, and enjoyed such a
high and worshipped glory, and I floated away
into a thousand regions, and journeyed with the
mighty spectre which had seduced me to his
sorrows
and my own shame. But ere I had utterly
left the sphere in which I had dwelt so happily
and so long, I heard the sad lament of my
companion
stars, stronger, yet more humble in station
than myself, whom I had left behind me. It was
a strain which told me my destiny, and shaped out
my only future hope, as it detailed my own duty
to myself and to the mighty master.
CHORUS OF THE STAR BRETHREN.
[1]
[1]
Imitated from a chorus of spirits in the
Faust of Goethe
I.
`Wo to us and to thee,
Star most beloved
Thy world and ours
Tumbles, and falls abroad
Thou, in thy weakness,
Brother, most erring
Thou, in thy loneliness,
Thou hast destroy'd it!
II.
`They bear away
They the dark spirits
Whose pleasure is ruin!
They bear away
The hope and the harmony
Wreck'd into nothingness!
While we weep over
The beauty that's lost!
III.
`Mighty among the stars,
Bright one, rebuild it!
In thy own bosom
Rebuild it again!
Begin a new being
With spirit unshaken,
Then shall new music
Unite the now sunder'd!'
Such was the mournful anthem which my
brethren sang in sorrow at my departure and fall,
and whose strains followed me afar, and still
follow
me. I hear them now; and thou too, dearest
Anastasia, with whom I had commenced that new
being, and through whose beloved agency I had
hoped for my restoration, with thee beside me,
partaking my immortality and glory in that high
place  thou too mayst hear them now.
And she did hear, for a gust of the breeze, that
seemed full of perfume, floated that moment by
the window, and her ears distinctly noted the last
words of the melancholy and imploring anthem:
VOL. I. 18
Mighty among the stars,
Bright one rebuild it!
In thy own bosom
Rebuild it again!
Begin a new being
With spirit unshaken,
Then shall new music
Unite the now sunder'd!
I had commenced that new being with thee,
my Anastasia, and hoped to have succeeded in my
labours; but the very danger which I feared, and
against which I strove to counsel thee, has wrecked
the fond hope within my bosom, and now drives
me forth once more, alone, to commence my toils
anew. Thou wast not content with thy condition
or with mine  thou hast committed mine own
error.
And is there no forgiveness, Albert?  let me
but be tried once more, my beloved
Thou shalt be tried, Anastasia  this is thy
doom, no less than mine. Thou hast striven to
know  it is now thy destiny  thou art now
doomed to partake of mine.
Ah! happy  happy shall I be, Albert, if so
permitted.
Alas! Anastasia, thou knowest not what it is
thou canst not dream of its terrors, was the
mournful answer of the spirit to the fond
assurances
of the devoted woman. Thou deemest that,
to share my destiny, thou wilt still remain with
me.
And will it not be so, my Albert?
Alas! no! was the sad reply. It is my
doom of loneliness which thou art to share  my
doom of isolation. Thou wilt not go with me,
nor I with thee, yet we must both go forth. Thou
hast to seek, as well as myself, for that condition
among the mortal which is borne without repining,
and with no desire of change. Make thyself
kindred to such a spirit, and thou livest with me
when I rejoin the stars.
She lay shrieking at the foot of the cloud, which
now slowly descended, and seemed to encircle her.
Come! exclaimed a sober and sad, yet soft
accent, at the window; and there, in her sight,
floated once more the kindred star which had
followed
her lover; she felt herself lifted from the
ground, and enveloped in a fold of the softest and
the sweetest air, while the bright eye of Albert,
starlike and pure, came close to her forehead.
What wouldst thou? demanded Anastasia,
in her bewilderment.
Impress upon thee my immortality with my
doom, was the answer; and that moment she
felt the star pressing like ice upon her forehead.
It seemed to sink, cold and chilling, into her very
brain, and she shrieked with the momentary agony
of that feeling. In another instant she was
released
from his embrace, and, whirling round with
a motion not her own, she now found herself
wrapped in an airy mantle like that of her
companion
,
and she was conscious, while floating away
away into the fathomless abysses of the air
that she shone from the centre of a cloud like the
star which had personified her lover. Her next
feeling was that of utter isolation. She beheld the
beautiful star, which she had loved as a mortal,
sailing along, with a slow and steady light, above
the rocks and the river, and she strove to follow
and rejoin it. But a power restrained her
movements
and checked her will, and she now felt
herself
borne unresistingly in an opposite direction.
Then, for the first time, did she feel the horrible
nature
of that destiny which she had so passionately
desired to share with him. The fearful truth which
he had uttered came like a knell of agony to her
suffering soul, as she felt and feared, in that
desolate
moment, that she was destined for ever after
to remain alone!
18*
ONEA AND ANYTA.
I.
The
Yemassee was no longer the great nation.
They had set their fortunes upon a cast, and the
throw was fatal. Civilization triumphed. The
Carolinians, in spite of the sudden massacres under
which they had suffered at the beginning of the
war, were at length successful; and at
Coosawhatchie
,
or the town of refuge, the
Yemassees
lost their best leaders. With these, they lost
all spirit, and their surviving warriors were unequal
to the task of restoring their fortunes. Scattered
and without counsel, they yet fled, as if by a
common
instinct, to their sacred town of Pocota-ligo,
where, in the presence of their priests and the
protection
of their gods, they had faint hopes yet of
effecting by prayers and superstitious ceremonies,
what, hitherto, their own fearless valor had utterly
failed to accomplish. Their resources were now
nearly exhausted  their villages in flames; and
relying
as they had done, upon the hope of
obtaining
possession of the chief city and provisions of
the whites, their fields had, in the greater number
of cases, been left without cultivation. Their
Spanish allies, always deceitful, after stimulating
them to war, had left them to contend with it single
handed. On hearing of the defeat and slaughter
of the Yemassees, such of them as had been sent
from St. Augustine to their succor, returned to the
shelter of its walls, under the influence of a sudden
panic. The neighboring Indian tribes followed
the base example, and either returned to their
forests
,
or made concessions, and bound themselves
by treaty to the conquerors, giving hostages for
their future good behavior. Not so with the
unhappy
Yemassees. They were still too proud to
beg for that peace, which they yet needed more
than all, and which alone could save them from
extermination
.
They were too brave to desire peace
when their slain brothers remained unavenged.
They resolved, therefore, to carry on the struggle
to the last; and, crowding into the holy town of
Pocota-ligo, they proceeded to strengthen
themselves
in their position, as well as they might,
there to await the approach of the Carolinians.
They fortified the town, somewhat after the fashion
of the European settlers, with the trunks of trees
and the larger branches, rudely bedded together.
This done, divided between hopes and fears, they
passed the brief time which elapsed between their
preparations and the assault. They had not long to
wait. Their defences, which, manned by
Europeans
,
and against savages, might have proved
adequate to their purposes, proved no barrier
against the pursuer. The impetuous onset of their
sanguine assailants could not be withstood by those,
made already apprehensive by previous experience,
of the result; and their frail bulwarks were stormed,
and Pocota-ligo in flames, in the same fearful hour
of assault. The scene was terrible; but, though
despairing, the Indians did not think of flight.
The men fell, and the women filled their places.
A dreadful massacre ensued: naked and howling,
but tearing and rending as they ran, men, women,
and children, darted to and from the blazing
dwellings
,
shrieking for that revenge which they could
obtain in part only. They neither gave nor asked
for quarter; and in the darkness of night and the
confusion of the scene, they were enabled to
protract
the conflict with the success which must
always
follow courage, and the valor of men fighting
fearlessly for their homes. Through the night the
battle lasted, but as soon as the day broke upon
them, the struggle was over. The first glimpses
of the morning found the bayonet at the heart of
the few surviving warriors, who still lived, but only
at the mercy of those to whom in all their successes
they had shown no mercy. But few of them
escaped
.
Before sunrise, the fight was ended, and
the great nation of the Yemassees was stricken from
existence.
II.
On the eastern banks of the Isundiga, or
Savannah
river, there is a lofty tumulus, which the
insidious waters of the stream have long since
begun
to undermine. On the summit of this
tumulus
,
the morning after the termination of this fatal
combat, stood a Yemassee warrior. The blood
upon his visage  his torn garments and broken
instruments of war, sufficiently testified to the
recent
strifes in which he had been engaged. It
was Echotee, a valiant chief, who stood upon the
tumulus. His limbs were weary with toil and
flight  his eye was dim, and the melancholy
sadness
of the Indian mouth was heightened into hate
and anguish. He busied himself in fitting new
sinews to his bow, and sharp flint heads to his
arrows
.
The hunting shirt which he wore  a finely
dressed buckskin of the brightest yellow,
fantastically
inwrought with shells and beads  such
decorations
as the tasteful woman, Hiwassee, his wife,
had fondly chosen for the purpose  was torn in
many places, and spots of the darkest red were
contrasted with the bright yellow of the garment.
Wounded, lone, and sorrowing, yet Echotee did
not despair. His eye had exile in it, but not fear;
neither did he despond. Firmness and manly
resolution shared with sorrow the habitations of
his soul. Anxiously, at moments, he looked
towards
the forests behind him, as if in expectation;
but their dark intricacies uttered no sound or
voice, and he turned his eyes away in
disappointment
.
Then, after a brief pause, taking his way
down from the tumulus, he moved to a little
streamlet
that trickled at the foot of the mound, and
passing
partially through it, at length made its way to the
bosom of the Isundiga. Stooping to the stream,
he drank freely of its waters; then, returning
hastily
to the mound, he proceeded, with a slender
shingle, with which he had provided himself, to dig
an opening in the hillock, as if contemplating a
place of sepulture. While he dug, he sang in a
low but unsubdued tone, a chant, in which he
lamented
the fortunes of his fellows:
They are gone, and the night covers them.
My feet have no companion in the chase  the
hollow woods speak to me with the voices of
shadows  there is no life in their sounds. Where
art thou, Washattee  where speedest thou, whom
none yet has overtaken. On the far hills that rise
blue at the evening I see thee  thou hast found the
valley of joy, and the plum-groves that are ever in
bloom. But who, brother, shall gather thy bones
who take care of thy spirit  where shall the
children look, when they seek for thy grave. Thou
art all untended in the green valleys, and the ghosts
of the slain bend over thee with many frowns.
Comes she, the maid of thy bosom, to dress the
board of the hunter? Brings she at evening thy
venison? When the night is dark, and the brown
vulture stoops on thy path, and snuffs up blood of
thy spilling, I fear for thee, my brother. Thou
canst not sit in the green valley, for the warrior
lives who has slain thee, and mine arrow may reach
him not. Yet will I sing for thee, Washattee  I
will sing for thee thy death-song, and tell the ghosts
who frown, of thy many victories; thou wert mighty
in the chase  the high hills did not overcome
thee. Thy boyhood was like the manhood of
VOL. I. 19
other men  thou didst not creep in thy childhood.
From the first, thy feet were strong to walk, and
what speed of the warrior was like unto thine?
Well did they call thee the young panther  the eye
and the might of the young panther's mother was
thine. The strong tide, when thou swammest,
bore thee not back  thou didst put it by like an
infant. In the chase, thou wert an arrow which
laughs at the bird's wing  in the battle, thou wert
a keen tooth that goes deep in the heart. Thus
said the Muscoghee, when his eyes swam in the
cloud as he lay under thy knee  thus said the
Catawba, when thy hand struck through the long
willows by the lake of Sarattay. The ghosts of
the Muscoghee and the Catawba shall wait for thy
coming, and meet thee to serve, when thine eye
opens upon the green valley, and thy shadow darts
forward on the silent chase. But thou, oh
Yemassee
thou of the broad arrow and the big wing
it is sad for thee when none but Echotee may
stand up for thy people. Thy wing is down
among the reeds that lie beside the river  thy
broad arrow is broken on the plain. Thy shadow
grows small upon thy tumulus, and I speak thy
name in a whisper. Opitchi-manneyto looks on
thee in wrath. He joyed in the last cry of
Sanutee
he joyed when the death-song came thick
from the lips of Chigilli  he joyed when the pale
faces cut the sinews in thy thousand arms. Who
shall sing thy greatness, Yemassee  what warrior
to come after? What woman with long hair shall
creep through the forest, looking in the evening
for thy scattered bones? Who shall scare the
wolf from thy carcass, as he tears thy flesh beneath
the moon. The fox burrows under the hearth of
the hunter, and there is no fire to drive him away.
Silence lives lonely in thy dwelling. Thou art
gone. Spirit of many ages! thy voice is sunk
into a whisper; and thy name, it is an echo on the
hill tops. Thy glories are the graves of many
enemies, but thy own grave is unknown.
The death-chant of the warrior was broken. A
sudden cry of sorrow reached his ears from the
neighboring woods, and was immediately
succeeded
by the appearance of about thirty other
Indians, of both sexes, emerging from the shadowy
umbrage. These were all that were left of his
nation. Echotee looked on them for an instant
with sudden interest, but his eyes were again as
instantly
dropped upon the ground, and his hands
continued to labor upon the grave which he had
begun. Meanwhile the Indians advanced, bearing
along with them, from the woods, the dead body
of a warrior. This was Washattee, the warrior
whose death-song had been just sung by his
brother
.
Beside this, Echotee gave no other sign of
sorrow. No trace of that grief which might be
supposed natural to his uttered lamentations, was
visible in his action or face. His words seemed
to fall from lips of marble. His was the majesty
of wo, without its weakness.
Washattee had fled with the few survivors from
the fatal field of Pocota-ligo; but his wounds were
fatal, and he only fled from a quick to a protracted
form of death. He perished in the forests when
no longer in danger from the pursuing foe. They
were now to bury him. The ceremonies of burial
among the savages are usually simple. The
warriors
,
as they assisted to deposite their comrade in
the grave, chanted over him a song, not unlike
that which has already been recited. They
enumerated
his victories over the Catawba, the
Muscoghee
,
and other nations  his particular successes
in the chase; and their only and common regret
was, that his death had not been avenged in the
blood of the victor. While they sang, Echotee,
who remained silent all the while, placed beside
him, in the grave, his bow, his arrows, knife, pipe,
and a plentiful supply of flint arrow-heads, to meet
the emergencies of the chase in the shady vallies,
to which, according to their faith, his steps were
already bending. This done, and the soft mould
heaped upon him, after a brief consultation, they
stepped one by one into the order of march known
as the Indian file, making but one footstep for the
eyes of the pursuer, and followed, at equal
distances
,
the guidance of the brave Echotee. By the
side of the latter, came, in tears, the young and
beautiful Hiwassee, the maiden who, but a little
time before, had broken with him the wand of
marriage  the sacred wand of Checkamoysee.
To the deeper western forests they bent their way,
and the shadows of evening soon sank behind them
like a wall, separating them forever from their
native
homes.
III.
Many years had now elapsed, and men ceased to
remember the once noble nation of the Yemassees
once the most terrible and accomplished people
of the southern forests. They had even gone out
of the memories of their ancient enemies, the
Creeks; and the Carolinians, while in the full
enjoyment
of the fertile lands which had been their
heritage, had almost entirely forgotten the hard
toils and fearful perils by which they had been
acquired
.
19*
It was in the morning of a bright day in
October, that a small Indian canoe might have
been seen ascending the river St. Mary, up to its
source in the Okeefanokee swamp, a dismal region,
which lies between the Ockmulgee and Flint rivers,
in the state of Georgia.
There were but two persons in the canoe, both
Indian hunters of the Creek nation; a gallant
race, well known for high courage among the
tribes, and distinguished not less by their wild
magnanimity and adventure, than by their daring
ferocity. The warriors were both young, and
were numbered, and with strict justice, among the
lite
of their people. At peace, for the first time
for many seasons, with all around them, they gave
themselves up to the pleasures of the chase, and
sought, in the hardy trials of the hunt for the bear
and the buffalo, to relieve the inglorious and
unwelcome
ease which this novel condition of things
had imposed upon them. Our two adventurers,
forsaking the beaten track, and with a spirit
tending
something more than customary to that which
distinguishes civilization, had undertaken an
exploring
expedition into the recesses of this vast
lake and marsh, which, occupying a space of
nearly
three hundred miles in extent, and in very rainy
seasons almost completely inundated, presented,
amidst the thousand islands which its bosom
conceals
,
fruitful and inviting materials for inquiry
and adventure. Girt in with interminable forests,
the space of which was completely filled up with
umbrageous vines and a thick underwood, the trial
was one of no little peril, and called for the
exercise
of stout heart, strong hand, and a world of
fortitude and patience. It was also the
abiding-place
of the wild boar and the panther  the
southern crocodile howled nightly in its recesses
and the coiled snake, ever and anon, thrust out its
venomous fangs from the verdant bush. With
words of cheer and mutual encouragement, the
young hunters made their way. They were well
armed and prepared for all chances; and fondly
did they anticipate the delight which they would
entertain, on relating their numerous adventures
and achievements, by field and flood, to the
assembled
nation, on the return of the ensuing spring.
They took with them no unnecessary
incumbrances
.
The well tempered bow, the chosen and
barbed arrows, the curved knife, suited to a
transition
the most abrupt, from the scalping of the
enemy
to the carving of the repast, and the hatchet,
fitted to the adroit hand of the hunter, and ready
at his back for all emergencies, were the principal
accoutrements of the warriors. They troubled
themselves not much about provisions. A little
parched corn supplied all wants, and the dried
venison in their pouches was a luxury, taken on
occasion only. They knew that, for an Indian,
the woods had always a pregnant store; and they
did not doubt that their own address, in such
matters
,
would at all times enable them to come at it.
Dreary, indeed, was their progress. An
European
would have despaired entirely, and given up
what must have appeared, not merely a visionary
and hopeless, but a desperate and dangerous
pursuit
.
But the determination of an Indian, once
made, is unchangeable. His mind clothes itself
in a seemingly habitual stubbornness, and he is
inflexible and unyielding. Though young,
scarcely
arrived at manhood, our warriors were too well
taught in the national philosophy, to have done
any thing half so womanlike as to turn their backs
upon an adventure, devised coolly, and commenced
with all due preparation. They resolutely pursued
their way, unfearing, unswering, unshrinking.
The river narrowed at length into hundreds of
diverging
rivulets, and, after having run their canoe
upon the sands, they were compelled to desert it,
and pursue their farther way on foot. They did
not pause, but entered at once upon the new labor;
and now climbing from tree to bank  now wading
along the haunts of the plunging alligator, through
pond and mire  now hewing with their hatchets
a pathway through the thickest branches, they
found enough to retard, but nothing to deter them.
For days did they pursue this species of toil,
passing
from island to island  alternately wading and
swimming  until at length, all unexpectedly, the
prospect opened in strange brightness and beauty
before them. They came to a broad and
lovely
lake, surrounded on all sides by the forest,
through a portion of which they had passed with
so much difficulty, and to which the storms never
came. It lay sleeping before them with the calm
of an infant, and sheltered by the wood, the wild
vine, and a thousand flowers. In the centre rose
a beautiful island, whose shores were crowned with
trees bearing all species of fruit, and emitting a
most grateful fragrance. The land was elevated
and inviting, and, as they looked, the young
warriors
conceived it the most blissful and lovely spot
of earth. Afar in the distance, they beheld the
white habitations of the people of the strange land,
but in vain did they endeavor to reach them.
They did not seek to adventure into the broad and
otherwise inviting waters; for occasionally they
could behold the crocodiles, of the largest and
fiercest class, rising to the surface, and seeming to
threaten them with their unclasped jaws, thickly
studded with their white sharp teeth. While in
this difficulty, they beheld a young maiden waving
them on the opposite bank; and Onea, the
youngest
of the two hunters, attracted by the
incomparable
beauty of her person, would have leapt
without
scruple into the lake, and swam to the side on
which she stood, but that his more grave and
cautious
companion, Hillaby, restrained him. They
observed her motions, and perceived that she
directed
their attention to some object in the distance.
Following her direction, they found a small canoe
tied to a tree, and sheltered in a little bay. Into this
they entered fearlessly, and putting out their
paddles
,
passed in a short time to the opposite shore,
the beauty of which, now that they had reached
it, was even more surpassingly great than when
seen afar off. Nor did the young Indian maiden,
in the eye of the brave Onea, lose any of those
charms, the influence of which had already
penetrated
his inmost spirit. But now she stood not
alone. A bright young maiden like herself
appeared
beside her, and, taking the warriors by the
hand, they sung sweet songs of pleasure in their
ears, and brought them the milk of the cocoa to
refresh them, and plucked for them many of the
rich and delightful fruits which hung over their
heads. There were oranges and dates, and cakes
made of corn and sugar, baked with their own
hands, which they cordially set before them.
Many
were the sweet glances and precious sentences
which they gave to the young warriors, and soon
did the gallant Creeks understand, and gladly did
they respond to their kindness. Long would they
have lingered with these maidens, but, when their
repast had ended, they enjoined them to begone
to fly as quickly as possible, for that their people
were cruel to strangers, and the men of their
nation
would certainly destroy them with savage
tortures
,
were they to return from the distant chase
upon which they had gone, and find the intruders.
But will they not give you, said the fearless
Onea, to be the bride of a brave warrior? I shame
not to speak the name of my nation. They are
men, and they beg not for life. I, myself, am a
man among my people, who are all men. They
will give you to fill my wigwam. I will do battle
for you, Anyta, with the knife and the bow; I
will win you by the strong arm, if the strange
warriors stand in the path. Alas, said the
young girl, you know not my people. They
are tall like the pine trees, which rise above other
trees; they look down upon your tribe as the
prairie
grass that the buffalo tramples down, and the
flames wither. The sun is their father  the earth
their mother  and we are called the daughters of
the sun. They would dash you into the flames, if
you told them of a lodge in the Creek wigwam
for a maiden of our tribe.
The Creek is a warrior and a chief, Anyta,
and he will not die like a woman. He can pluck
out the heart of his foe while he begs upon the
ground. I fear not for your people's anger, but I
love the young maid of the bright eye and sunny
face, and would take her as a singing-bird into the
lodge of a great warrior. I will stay in your cabin
till the warriors come back from the hunt. I am
no fox to burrow in the hill side.
You will stay to see me perish, then, Onea,
said the girl  a gleam of melancholy shining
from her large dark eyes  for my people will
not let me live, when I speak for your life.
See you not my bow and arrows, Anyta? Is
not the tomahawk at my shoulder? Look, my
knife is keen  the sapling may speak.
Your arm is strong, and your heart true, you
would say to Anyta; but what is one arm, and what
are thy weapons, to a thousand? You must not
linger, Onea; we will put forth in the little canoe.
I will steer to a quiet hollow, and when thou art
in safety I will leave thee, and return to thee
again.
IV.
It
was with difficulty the hot-headed Onea was
persuaded to comply with the suggestions of
prudence
,
and nothing but a consideration for the
safety of the maiden had power to restrain his
impetuosity
.
But, assured that, in the unequal
contest
of which she spoke, his own individual zeal
and valor would prove unavailing, he submitted,
though with evident ill grace, to her directions.
A like scene had, in the meanwhile, taken place
between Hillaby and Henamarsa, Anyta's lovely
companion, which was attended with pretty nearly
the same results. A mutual understanding had the
effect of providing for the two warriors in the same
manner. Entering once more the canoe in
company
with, and under the guidance of their
mistresses
,
they took their way down the lake, until
they lost sight of the island on which they had
first met. They kept on, until, far away from the
main route to the habitations of the tribe, they
came to a beautiful knoll of green, thickly covered
with shrubbery and trees, and so wrapt from the
VOL. I. 20
passing glance of the wayfarer, by the circuitous
bendings of the stream, as to afford them the
safety
and secrecy they desired. The maidens
informed
them that they alone were in possession of
the fact of its existence, having been cast upon it
by a summer tempest, while wandering over the
rippling waters in their birchen canoe. They
found it a pleasant dwelling-place. The wild
fruits and scented flowers seemed to have
purposely
embellished it for the habitation of content and
love, and the singing birds were perpetually
carroling
from the branches. The vines, thickly
interwoven
above their heads, and covered with
leaves, afforded them the desired shelter; and
gladly did they appropriate, and sweetly did they
enjoy, its pleasures and its privacies. But the day
began to wane, and the approaching evening
indicated
the return of the fierce warriors from the
chase. With many vows, and a tender and sweet
sorrow, the maidens took their departure for the
dwellings of their people, leaving the young
chiefs to contemplate their new ties, and the novel
situation in which they had placed themselves.
Nor did the maidens forget their pledges, or prove
false to their vows. Day after day did they take
their way in the birchen bark, and linger till
evening in the society of their beloved. The
hours passed fleetly in such enjoyments, and happy
months of felicity only taught them the beauty
of flowers and their scents, and the delights of an
attachment before utterly unknown. But the wing
of the halcyon ceased to rest on the blessed island.
Impatient of inactivity, the warrior Hillaby came
one day to the vine-covered cabin of Onea; his
looks were sullen, and his language desponding.
He spoke thus:
It is not meet, Onea, that the hawk should be
clipped of his wings, and the young panther be
caged like a deer; let us go home to our people.
I am growing an old woman. I have no strength
in my sinews  my knees are weak.
I would go home to my people, replied
Onea, but cannot leave the young fawn who has
taken shelter under my protection. And will
Hillaby depart from Henamarsa?
Hillaby will depart from Henamarsa, but
Hillaby
has the cunning of the serpent, and can
burrow
like the hill-fox. He will no longer take the
dove to his heart, dreading an enemy. He will
go home to his people  he will gather the young
men of the nation, and do battle for Henamarsa.
Onea is a brave warrior  will he not fight for
Anyta?
Onea would die for Anyta, but he would not
that Anyta should perish too. Onea would not
destroy the people of his wife.
Would they not destroy Onea? They would
hang his scalp in the smoke of their wigwams
they would shout and dance about the stake when
his death-song is singing. If Onea will not depart
with Hillaby, he will go alone. He will bring
the young warriors; and the dogs who would keep
Henamarsa from his wigwam  they shall perish
by his knife, and the wild boar shall grow fat upon
their carcasses.
Thus spoke the elder of the two warriors, and
vain were the entreaties and arguments employed
by Onea to dissuade him from his purpose. The
Indian habit was too strong for love, and his sense
of national, not less than individual pride, together
with the supineness of his present life, contrasted
with that restless activity to which he had been
brought up and habituated, rendered all
persuasion
fruitless, and destroyed the force of all
arguments
.
Deep, seemingly, was the anguish of
Henamarsa, when she learned the departure of
her lover. A settled fear, however, took
possession
of the bosom of the gentle Anyta, and she
sobbed upon the breast of the brave Onea. She
felt that their happiness was at an end  that the
hope of her people was insecure  that the home
of her fathers was about to suffer violation. She
saw at once all the danger, and did not hesitate
to whisper it in the ear of Onea. All her hope
rested in the belief, that Hillaby would never
succeed
in tracing his way back through the
intricacies
of the swamp to his own people; or if he did,
that he would not succeed in guiding them to the
precise point in its recesses, in which her tribe had
found its abode. But Onea knew better the
capacities
of a warrior among his people. He seized
his bow and equipments, and would have taken
the path after Hillaby, determined to quiet the
fears of his beloved, even by the death of his late
friend and companion; but the maiden restrained
him. She uttered a prayer to the great spirit, for
the safety of herself and people, and gave herself
up to the wonted happiness of that society for
which she was willing to sacrifice every thing.
V.
A new trial awaited Onea. One day Anyta
came not. The canoe was paddled by
Henamarsa
alone. She sought him in his wigwam.
She sought to take the place of his beloved in his
affections, and would have loaded him with caresses.
20*
Where is Anyta? asked the young warrior.
She is no longer the bride of Onea, was the
reply. She has gone into the wigwam of a
warrior
of her tribe  Henamarsa will love Onea, in
the place of Anyta.
Onea will love none but Anyta, was the
reply.
But she is now the wife of Echotee, the young
chief. She can no longer be yours. You will
never see her more.
I will tear her from the cabin of the dog  I
will drive my hatchet into his skull,  said the
infuriated warrior. He rejected all the
blandishments
of Henamarsa, and taunted her with her
infidelity
to Hillaby. She departed in anger from
his presence, and he lay troubled with his
meditations
as to the course he should pursue with regard
to Anyta. His determination was adopted, and
at midnight, in a birchen canoe prepared through
the day, he took his way over the broad lake to
the island. It lay, but not in quiet, stretched out
beautifully under the twinkling stars that shone
down sweetly upon it. These, however, were not
its only lights. Countless blazes illuminated the
shores in every direction  and the sound of lively
music came upon his ear, with an influence that
chafed still more fiercely the raging spirit in his
heart. There were shouts and songs of
merriment
and the whirling tread of the impetuous
dancers bespoke a feast and a frolic, such as are
due, among the Indians, to occasions only of the
highest festivity.
Drawing his bark quietly upon the shore,
without
interruption, he went among the
revellers
.
No one seemed to observe  no one
questioned
him. Dressed in habiliments the most
fantastic
and irregular, his warlike semblance did not
strike the minds of the spectators as at all
inconsistent
with the sports they were pursuing, and he
passed without impediment or check to the great
hall, from whence the sounds of most extravagant
merriment proceeded. He entered with the throng,
in time to witness a solemn ceremonial. There
came, at one side, a gallant chief, youthful,
handsome
,
and gracefully erect. He came at the head
of a chosen band of youth of his own age, attired
in rich furs taken from native animals. Each of
them bore a white wand, the symbol of marriage.
On the other side came a like party of
maidens, dressed in robes of the whitest cotton,
and bearing wands like the men. What bright
creature is it that leads this beautiful array? Why
does the young Muscoghee start  wherefore the
red spot on the brow of Onea? The maiden who
leads the procession, is his own, the gentle Anyta.
Grief was in her face; her eyes were dewy and
sad, and her limbs so trembled that those around
gathered to her support. The first impulse of
Onea was to rush forward and challenge the array
to seize upon the maiden in the presence of the
assembly; and, by the strength of his arm, and
the sharp stroke of his hatchet, to assert his claims
to the bride in the teeth of every competitor. But
the warrior was not less wise than daring. He
saw that the maiden was sick at heart, and a fond
hope sprung into his own. He determined to
witness
the progress of the ceremony, trusting
something
to events. They dragged her forward to
the rite, passive rather than unresisting. The
white wands of the two processions, males and
females
,
were linked above the heads of Echotee and
Anyta  the bridal dance was performed around
them in circles, and, agreeable to the ritual of the
tribe to which they belonged, the marriage was
declared complete. And now came on the
banqueting
.
The repast, fruitful of animation,
proceeded
,
and the warriors gathered around the
board, disposed alternately among the maidens,
Echotee and Anyta presiding. Onea stood apart.
Who is he who despises our festival  why
does the young man stand away from the board?
The brave man may fight and rejoice  he wears
not always the war paint  he cries not for ever
the war-whoop  he will come where the singing
birds gather, and join in the merriment of the
feast.
Thus cried a strong voice from the company,
and all eyes were turned upon Onea. The youth
did not shrink from reply
The warrior says what is true. It is not for
the brave man to scorn the festival  he rejoices
at the feast. But the stranger comes of a far tribe,
and she who carries the wand must bid him
welcome
,
or he sits not at the board with the
warriors
.
Anyta slowly rose to perform the duty imposed
upon her. She had already recognised the form
of her lover, and her step was tremulous and her
advances slow. She waved the wand which she
held in her hands, and he approached,
unhesitatingly
,
to her side. The Indians manifested little
curiosity  such a feature of character being
inconsistent
,
in their notion, with the manliness
indispensable
to the warrior. Still there was something
marked in the habit worn by Onea, which taught
them to believe him a stranger. At such a time,
however, the young men, intriguing with their
dusky
loves, rendered disguises and deceptions so
frequent
,
less notice ensued than might otherwise have
been the case, and the repast proceeded without
farther
interruption. Then followed the bridal
procession
to the future dwelling of the couple. The
whole assembly sallied forth, to the sound of
discordant
music, each with a flaming torch within
his hand. They frolicked with wild halloos in the
train of the bridal pair, waving their flaming
torches in every direction. A small stream,
consecrated
by a thousand such occurrences, rippled
along their pathway, upon approaching which,
they hurled the lights into its hissing waters,
leaving
the entire procession in darkness. This was
one part of the wonted and well known frolic.
The transition from unaccustoned light to solemn
darkness, producing the profoundest confusion,
the merriment grew immense. One party
stumbled
over the other, and all were playing at
contraries
and cross purposes. Shouts of laughter in
every direction, broke the gloom which occasioned
it, and proved the perfect success of the jest.
But, on a sudden, a cry arose that the bride was
missing. This, perhaps, contributed more than
any thing beside to the good humor of all but the
one immediately concerned, and the complaint and
clamor of the poor bridegroom met with no
sympathy
.
His appeals were unheeded  his
asseverations
received with laughter and shouts of the
most deafening description. All mirth, however,
must have its end; and the joke grew serious.
The bride was really missing, and every thing
was in earnest and unmitigated confusion.
Vainly
did the warriors search  vainly did the
maidens call upon the name of Anyta. She
was far beyond the reach of their voices,
hurrying
down the quiet lake with Onea, to the green
island of their early loves and unqualified
affections
.
There was one who readily guessed the mystery
of Anyta's abduction. The heart of Henamarsa
had long yearned for that of Onea. The
rejection
of her suit by the scrupulous warrior had
changed its temper into bitterness; and a more
vindictive feeling took possession of her breast.
She determined to be revenged.
The warrior lay at sunset in the quiet bower,
and he slept with sweet visions in his eyes. But
why shrieks the young maiden, and wherefore is the
strong hand upon him? Who are they that bind
with thongs the free limbs of the warrior? Vainly
does he struggle for his release. Many are the
foes around him, and deadly the vengeance which
they threaten. He looks about for Anyta  she
too is bound with thongs. Above him stood the
form of Henamarsa, and he well knew who had
betrayed
him, yet he uttered no reproach. She looked
upon him with an eye of mingled love and triumph,
but he gave her no look in return. He knew her not.
They took him back to the island, and added
to his bonds. They taunted him with words of
scorn, and inflicted ignominious blows upon his
limbs. They brought him food and bade him eat
for the sacrifice; for that, at the close of the moon,
just begun, he should be subjected, with the gentle
Anyta, to the torture of fire and the stake. A
Creek warrior will teach you how to die, said
Onea. You are yet children; you know
nothing
,
and he shook his chains in their faces,
and spat on them with contempt.
VI.
That night a voice came to him in his dungeon.
Though he saw not the person, yet he knew that
Henamarsa was beside him.
Live, said the false one  live, Onea, and
I will unloose the cords about thy limbs. I will
make thee free of thy keepers  I will carry thee
to a quiet forest, where my people shall find thee
never. The warrior spake not, but turned his
face from the tempter to the wall of his prison.
Vainly did she entreat him, nor forego her prayers,
until the first glimmerings of the day light urged
her departure. Rising, then, with redoubled fury
from his side, where she had thrown herself, she
drew a knife before his eyes. The blade gleamed
in his sight, but he shrunk not.
What, said she, if I strike thee to the
heart, thou that art sterner than the she-wolf, and
colder than the stone house of the adder? What
if I strike thee for thy scorn, and slay thee like a
fox even in his hole?
Is there a mountain between us, woman, and
canst thou not strike? said the warrior. Why
speakest thou to me? Do thy will, and hiss no
more like a snake in my ears. Thou hast lost
thy sting  I should not feel the blow from thy
knife.
Thou art a brave warrior, said the intruder,
and I love thee too well to slay thee. I will seek
thee again in thy captivity, and look for thee to
listen.
The last night of the moon had arrived, and
the noon of the ensuing day was fixed for the
execution
of Onea and Anyta. Henamarsa came
again to the prison of the chief, and love had full
VOL. I. 21
possession of her soul. She strove to win him to his
freedom upon her own conditions. She then
proffered
him the same boon upon his own terms; but he
disdained and denied her. Deep was her affliction,
and she now deplored her agency in the captivity
of the chief. She had thought him less inflexible
in his faith; and, judging of his, by the yielding
susceptibilities of her own heart, had falsely
believed
that the service she offered would have
sanctioned his adoption of any conditions which
she might propose. She now beheld him ready
for death, but not for dishonor. She saw him
prepared for the last trial, and she sunk down in
despair.
The hour was at hand, and the two were bound
to the stake. The torches were blazing around
them  the crowd assembled  the warrior
singing
his song of death, and of many triumphs. But
they were not so to perish. Relief and rescue
were at hand; and looking forth upon the lake,
which his eyes took in at a glance, Onea beheld a
thousand birchen canoes upon its surface, and
flying
to the scene of execution. He knew the
warriors
who approached. He discerned the war
paint of his nation; he counted the brave men, as
they urged forward their vessels, and called them
by their names. The warriors who surrounded him
rushed, in a panic, for their arms  but how could
they contend with the choice men of the Creeks
the masters of a hundred nations? The conflict
was brief, though hotly contended. The people of
Onea were triumphant, and the chief and the
beautiful
Anyta rescued from their perilous situation.
The people whom they had conquered were bound
with thongs, and the council deliberated upon their
destiny. Shall they go free? shall they die?
were the questions  somewhat novel, it is true,
in the history of the Indians, whose course of
triumph was usually marked with indiscriminate
massacre. The voice of Onea determined the
question, and their lives were spared.
Will you be of us and of our nation? asked
the conquerors of the conquered.
We are the children of the sun, was the proud
reply  and can mingle with no blood but our
own.
Our young men will not yield the fair lake,
and the beautiful island, and the choice fruits.
They are worthy of women and children only,
and to these we leave them. We will seek
elsewhere
for the habitations of our people  we will
go into other lands. It is nothing new to our
fortunes
that we should do so now. The spoiler has
twice been among us, and the places that knew us
shall know us no more. Are we free to depart?
Let not your young men follow to spy out our new
habitations. Let them take what is ours now, but
let them leave us in quiet hereafter.
You are free to go, was the response, and
our young men shall not follow you.
The old chiefs led the way, and the young
followed
,
singing a song of exile, to which they
claimed to be familiar, and calling themselves the
Seminole  a name, which, in their language, is
supposed to signify, the outcast. All departed,
save Anyta, and she dwelt for long years after in
the cabin of Onea.
END OF VOLUME I.